Impact of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) on surgical decision-making in upper gastrointestinal tract cancer: an international multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is an integrated part of the pretherapeutic evaluation program for patients with upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract cancer. Whether the clinical impact of EUS differs between surgeons from different countries is unknown. The same applies to the potential clinical influence of EUS misinterpretations. The aim of this study was to evaluate the interobserver agreement on predefined treatment strategies between surgeons from four different countries, with and without EUS, and to evaluate the clinical consequences of EUS misinterpretations.One hundred patients with upper GI tract cancer were randomly selected from all upper GI tract cancer patients treated at Odense University Hospital between 1997 and 2000. Based on patient records and EUS database results, a case story was created with and without the EUS result for each patient. Four surgeons were asked to select the relevant treatment strategy in each case, at first without knowledge of the EUS and thereafter with the EUS result available. Interobserver agreement and impact of EUS misinterpretations were evaluated using the actual final treatment of each patient as reference.Three of four or all four surgeons agreed on the same treatment strategy for nearly 60% of the patients with and without the EUS results. Treatment decisions were changed in 34% based on the EUS results, and the majority of these changes were toward nonsurgical and palliative treatments (85%). Interobserver agreement was relatively low, but overall EUS increased kappa values from 0.16 ("poor") to 0.33 ("fair"), thus indicating increased overall agreement after the EUS results were available. EUS conclusion regarding stage or resectability was wrong in 17% of the cases, but only one serious event would have been the clinical result of EUS misinterpretations.Despite being used in different ways by different surgeons, EUS did change patient management in one third of the cases. The impact of EUS misinterpretations seemed very low, and this study confirmed one of the strongest clinical possibilities of EUS, i.e., the ability to detect nonresectable cases. EUS is an important imaging modality for oncosurgeons from different countries.Influence of tumor characteristics on the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography in staging cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the most accurate method of assessing the locoregional extent of cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction. The aim of this study was to evaluate the influence of tumor-related factors such as length and location on the accuracy of EUS in staging these tumors.Between January 1997 and September 2002, 280 consecutive patients underwent preoperative EUS for staging cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction. The influence of histopathology, the presence of Barrett's dysplasia or stenosis, and the location and length of the primary tumor on the accuracy of EUS for T, N, and M staging were studied.The overall accuracy rates of EUS for assessing the T, N, and M stages were 73 %, 80 %, and 78 %, respectively. The influence of the tumor's histopathology and the presence of Barrett's dysplasia or stenosis was minimal. The accuracy of EUS was greater in tumors 5 cm or less in size than in tumors larger than 5 cm (82 % vs. 52 % for the T stage, P < 0.05; 88 % vs. 59 % for the N stage, P < 0.05; and 92 % vs. 56 % for the M stage, P < 0.001). The low accuracy of T staging in larger tumors may be due to the exclusion of patients with local unresectability or distant metastases. EUS was also significantly better in esophageal tumors, particularly for identifying celiac trunk metastases (93 % vs. 63 %; P < 0.001).The accuracy of EUS for staging esophageal cancer is lower in tumors larger than 5 cm and in esophagogastric junction tumors than in tumors 5 cm in size or less and in esophageal tumors. These findings should be considered when treatment decisions are being taken.EUS staging of upper GI malignancies: results of a prospective randomized trial.Electronic 270 degrees transverse-array EUS (TA-EUS) provides high-quality cross-sectional images but cannot guide FNA. Linear EUS (L-EUS) provides longitudinal images of malignancies and the ability to guide FNA.We conducted a prospective randomized comparison of TA-EUS and L-EUS for the staging of upper-GI (UGI) malignancies.Forty-three patients underwent L-EUS immediately followed by TA-EUS (N = 27, 63%) or TA-EUS immediately followed by L-EUS (N = 16, 37%).Forty-three subjects (mean age, 64 years; 37 men) with an UGI malignancy (4 stomach and 38 esophageal) were evaluated with both TA-EUS and L-EUS.Abnormal lymph nodes were sampled by FNA for cytology.There was agreement on the T stage by linear and radial techniques in 38 of 43 subjects (88%). Twenty-seven of 43 patients (63%) had abnormal lymph nodes by linear or transverse-array imaging. L-EUS demonstrated 66 abnormal lymph nodes in 27 subjects (average of 2.4 nodes/subject). TA-EUS demonstrated 90 abnormal lymph nodes in 27 subjects (average of 3.3 nodes/subject, P = .009, compared with L-EUS). In 16 of the 27 subjects, an FNA was performed, which was positive in 13 cases (81%) and negative in 3 cases (10%) for malignancy.TA-EUS and L-EUS provide similar results of T staging of UGI malignancies. However, the number of abnormal lymph nodes detected by TA-EUS was more than by L-EUS. These findings suggest that radial or transverse-array EUS imaging should be the primary method for staging of UGI malignancies.Local staging and assessment of resectability in carcinoma of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum by endoscopic ultrasonography.Eighty-eight patients with carcinoma of the esophagus (N = 44), stomach (N = 41), and duodenum (N = 3) who underwent surgery were pre-operatively examined by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The ability of EUS to accurately predict the T stage and the N stage was 82% and 70% for esophageal carcinoma, 71% and 75% for gastric cancer, and 100% and 66% for duodenal malignancy. In esophageal carcinoma, the accuracy of T staging was only slightly lower in cases with non-traversable tumor stenoses (77%) compared with traversable carcinomas (84%). This was probably due to the fact that all non-traversable tumors were either in stage T3 or T4. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the stages T1 to T3, which correspond to R0 resectability (no macroscopic or microscopic tumor remains), was 92% for adenocarcinoma of the distal esophagus and 85% for gastric cancer. However, in squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus, R0 resection was possible in only 66% of all cases, whereas EUS predicted an 84% R0 resection rate. In adenocarcinoma of the distal esophagus and stomach, EUS prediction of stages T1 to T3 correlated well with the actual rate of R0 resection. These results show that EUS is a reliable diagnostic method for the local staging of upper gastrointestinal cancer. Its impact on treatment and hence on prognosis of patients with these malignancies has yet to be determined.[Electronic sectorial ultrasound endoscopy in benign and malignant tumoral pathology of the stomach. Results in 30 patients].From October 1991 to July 1992, endoscopic ultrasound examination (EUS) was performed preoperatively in 30 patients with gastrointestinal disease with a new forward-view fiber optic gastroscope with a 5 and 7.5 MHz curved-array linear transducer mounted directly behind the lens. Before EUS examination, endoscopy with biopsy had established the diagnosis of gastric disease in 22 cases: 16 adenocarcinoma, 4 lymphoma, 1 carcinoid tumor and 1 gastric metastasis of a chorionic tumor. In the 8 other cases, endoscopic diagnosis with non productive biopsy was gastric ulcer (1 case), submucosal tumor (5 cases), and large fold gastritis (2 cases). EUS established a correct diagnosis in 6 of these 8 cases (2 leiomyoma, 1 lipoma, 1 lymphoma, 2 gastric linitis). Correct preoperative TN staging was accomplished by EUS in 83.3% and correct preoperative staging for N was accomplished by EUS in 90%. This study shows that EUS a curved-array transducer is useful in preoperative TN staging of gastric tumors.An early gastric carcinoma treatment strategy based on analysis of lymph node metastasis.Newly developed therapies for early gastric carcinoma attempt to consider patients' quality of life, but the applicability and effectiveness of these treatments remain undetermined.Clinicopathologic data of 612 consecutive patients with early gastric carcinoma, all of whom were treated by D1 and D2 gastrectomy, were analyzed. Patients with and without lymph node metastases were compared in relation to age and gender distributions, surgical procedures, histopathology of the tumors, 5-year prognosis, and in reference to the preoperative and intraoperative assessments.The overall incidence of lymph node metastases was 5.7%. Tumor depth and size were related to lymph node metastases judged by univariate and multivariate analyses. Patients with mucosal tumors showed no relation between metastatic rate and tumor size, whereas those with submucosal tumors showed an increasing metastatic rate with tumor size. In all cases but one, lymph node metastases were confined to lymph node stations defined as Group 1 locations. Preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography showed a 55% diagnostic accuracy in determining tumor depth and a 15% sensitivity in diagnosing lymph node metastases.Patients with early gastric carcinoma may be candidates for endoscopic mucosal resection if their tumor is confined to the mucosa and measures < 1 cm in greatest dimension. Other limited resections including D1 gastrectomy or standard D2 gastrectomy based on tumor depth and size are appropriate. Based on the current study findings, the authors propose a useful algorithm for managing such patients.Endoscopic ultrasound in the staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastro-oesophageal junction.Modern management of upper gastro-intestinal cancer demands accurate pre-operative staging. In continental Europe and Japan, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is established as the investigation of choice for local staging of these cancers, but British experience with this technique is limited.A retrospective review of the medical records of patients with oesophageal or gastro-oesophageal junction tumours during our first 3.5 years' experience with EUS was undertaken and the findings at EUS correlated with the pathology of the resected specimen.A total of 124 patients (86 males), with a mean age of 64.5 years, underwent EUS: 84 had adenocarcinoma and 26 squamous cell carcinoma. There were 3 failed EUS examinations, 42 patients did not have surgery for a variety of reasons, and 10 patients had pre-operative chemoradiotherapy. In the remaining 69 patients, correlation for T stage showed an accuracy of EUS of 80% and for N staging of 54% overall. Comparison of the initial 2 years with the final 18 months showed no change in the T staging accuracy but an improvement in the N staging accuracy from 50% to 60%.Once initial experience has been gained, EUS is an accurate procedure for T and N staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastro-oesophageal junction. It should be included with other imaging modalities, such as CT scanning, in the pre-operative assessment of these tumours.Enlarged lymph nodes: malignant or not?Prospective controlled data of lymph node evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound in esophageal, gastric and pancreatic cancer is presented. Lymph node pattern, changes of boundaries and echogenicity were considered. Preoperative findings of endoscopic ultrasound were classified according to TNM staging. Only those cases with subsequent histologic examination of the resected specimen were entered into the study. Sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was 90% for esophageal and 87% for gastric cancer. The specificity was 72% and 88%, respectively. In spite of the overall satisfactory results of EUS in evaluation of lymph nodes, further improvement in detection and differentiation of benign and malignant nodes is required.Endoscopic ultrasound and gastric lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is useful in assessing gastric lesions found on endoscopy. EUS can assess the 5 layers of the gastric wall and is the most useful modality for staging tumors of the stomach, including adenocarcinoma and lymphoma. For subepithelial gastric lesions, EUS can assess the echogenicity of a lesion, which layer of the gastric wall is involved, and assess for the presence of blood flow with Doppler ultrasound. These characteristics help to determine the likely etiology of the lesion. Fine needle aspiration may also provide additional information, especially when mucosal biopsies are nondiagnostic.Analysis of gastric carcinoma growth by endoscopic ultrasonography.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed preoperatively in 82 patients with gastric carcinoma (40 with early and 42 advanced malignancy). Measurements of wall thickness were performed in each case and showed good correlation with histological findings. Wall thickening was found to consist of both tumorous and accompanying ulcerous tissue. Thus, increasing wall thickness, as demonstrated by EUS, may not necessarily mean progressive tumor growth. The EUS features of gastric carcinoma were analyzed and four distinct growth patterns found: predominantly intramural (IM) or intraluminal (IL) growth with preservation (Type 1) or destruction (Type 2) of the submucosal echo-rich layer. All early carcinomas displayed the IL-type growth pattern on EUS (98% IL1-type) and 81% of advanced tumors showed IM-type features. EUS was able to differentiate between early and advanced carcinoma in 98% of cases. The EUS pattern of submucosal destruction (type IM2 or IL2) corresponded to the expanding type tumor according to Ming's histopathological classification. On the other hand, 24 of 26 infiltrative tumors according to Ming were found on EUS to have an intramural growth pattern with preservation of the submucosa (type IM1). It is concluded that EUS is highly sensitive in predicting the tumor growth pattern in gastric carcinoma, providing important additional information to the currently used TNM staging system. Measurements of wall thickness are reliable but differentiation between tumorous growth and peritumorous changes is not possible.Endoscopic ultrasound for esophageal and gastroesophageal junction cancer: Impact of increased use of primary neoadjuvant therapy on preoperative locoregional staging accuracy.Initial treatment of locally advanced esophageal and gastroesophageal junction (GEJ) malignancies for selected patients at some institutions has recently changed from surgical resection to neoadjuvant therapy. The aim of this study is to evaluate the impact of this change in treatment strategy on both the overall disease profile and locoregional endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) staging accuracy for a cohort of patients managed with primary surgical resection over a 10-year period at our institution. All subjects at our institution who underwent primary esophagectomy from 1993 to 2002 following preoperative EUS for known or suspected esophageal and/or GEJ cancers were identified. Patients with dysplasia alone, prior upper gastrointestinal tract surgery, preoperative neoadjuvant therapy, cancer of the gastric cardia or recurrent malignancy were excluded. EUS findings and staging results were compared to surgical pathology following resection. The impact of the gradually increased use of primary chemoradiation during the second half of the study was assessed. Of the 286 operations performed, 184 subjects were excluded. The remaining 102 underwent primary surgical resection a median of 18 days following EUS staging for adenocarcinoma (88%) or squamous cell carcinoma (12%) of the esophagus (69%) or GEJ (31%). Overall EUS locoregional T and N staging accuracy was 72% and 75% respectively; accuracy for T1, T2, T3 and T4 cancer was 42%, 50%, 88% and 50% respectively. Despite an increased frequency of pathologically confirmed T1 and T2 cancers (P = 0.005) and an insignificant trend toward increased N0 malignancy (P = 0.05) during the second half of the study period, no statistically significant changes in T (P = 0.07) or N (P = 0.82) staging accuracies for EUS or disease characteristics were noted between the first and second half of the study period. Despite both inaccurate radial EUS staging and increased relative use of primary surgery for early cancers, recent increased use of primary neoadjuvant therapy did not change overall disease characteristics and accuracy of locoregional EUS staging of esophageal and GEJ cancers managed with primary surgical resection.Pre-operative TN staging of gastric cancer using a 15 MHz ultrasound miniprobe.The aim of the study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with a new endoscopically guided ultrasound miniprobe, used for pre-operative staging of gastric cancers. 59 cases of gastric cancer were prospectively examined with a 15 MHz ultrasound miniprobe. The results of the ultrasound imaging were compared with the histological findings of the resected specimens. The accuracy of the miniprobe for depth of invasion (T category) was 61% for all tumours, and 72% and 40%, respectively, for T1 and T2 to T4 lesions. If indeterminate cases due to ultrasound attenuation were excluded, the accuracy was improved to 82% for T1 and 57% for T2 to T4 tumours, respectively. The accuracy of the miniprobe for nodal staging (N category) was 69% overall, and 86%, 25% and 14% for stages N0, N1 and N2, respectively. In tumours classified on the basis of endoscopic types, the miniprobe staged early type gastric cancers (T category = 73%, N category = 80%) significantly (p < 0.01) more accurately than advanced ones (T category = 21%, N category = 36%). This study suggests that the miniprobe is indicated for pre-operative TN staging when endoscopy reveals an early gastric cancer.Usefulness and problems of endoscopic ultrasonography in prediction of the depth of tumor invasion in early gastric cancer.The objectives of this study were to evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in local and regional staging of early gastric cancer, to analyze the factors influencing the accuracy of EUS, and to reveal the usefulness and problems of EUS in pre-treatment staging of gastric cancer. We examined 105 lesions in 104 patients with histologically confirmed gastric cancer and retrospectively evaluated them with EUS. The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS were determined by comparing the pre-treatment EUS with the postoperative histopathological findings. The overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS for the depth of cancer invasion was 86%. The overall sensitivity and specificity were 60% and 96%, respectively. The accuracy significantly declined in lesions located in the upper-third of the stomach (70%). Type 0-I lesions tended to be over-staged (12&), and the upper-third lesions tended to be under-staged (23%). The accuracy significantly declined in differentiated adenocarcinoma with massive submucosal invasion (56.5%). EUS is useful for evaluating the depth of gastric cancer invasion which determines the feasibility of endoscopic treatment. However, it is noteworthy that the diagnostic accuracy of the invasion depth diminished for lesions in the upper third of the stomach.Regional lymph node metastasis in gastric cancer: evaluation with endoscopic US.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) was performed in 83 patients with gastric cancer to evaluate regional lymph node metastasis. Histopathologic findings were compared with preoperative EUS findings in a total of 1,519 resected lymph nodes. In lymph node staging, the prevalence of metastatic adenopathy was 31.3% (26 of 83 patients); EUS had an accuracy of 83.1% (69 of 83 patients), sensitivity of 53.8% (14 of 26 patients), specificity of 96.5% (55 of 57 patients), positive predictive value of 87.5% (14 of 16 patients), and negative predictive value of 82.1% (55 of 67 patients). The greater the maximum diameter of the node with metastasis, or the larger the ratio of the metastatic area to the cross-sectional area of the node, the higher the detection rate. In tumors classified on the basis of depth of invasion according to the 1987 TNM system, the rate of detection of metastasis in individual nodes was 0% in pT1 tumors (none of five nodes), 20% in pT2 tumors (17 of 85 nodes), 29% in pT3 tumors (20 of 70 nodes), and 10% in pT4 tumors (three of 31 nodes). It is concluded that the most important use of EUS will be in diagnosis of regional lymph node metastasis.Preoperative assessment of tumor location and station-specific lymph node status in patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction.In esophageal cancer patients preoperative staging will determine the type of surgical procedure and use of neoadjuvant therapy. Tumor location and lymph node status play a pivotal role in this tailored strategy. The aim of the present study was to prospectively evaluate the accuracy of preoperative assessment of tumor location according to the Siewert classification and lymph node status per station with endoscopy/endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT).In 50 esophagectomy patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction (GEJ), tumor location according to Siewert and N-stage per nodal station as determined preoperatively by endoscopy/EUS and CT were compared with the histopathologic findings in the resection specimen.Overall accuracy in predicting tumor location according to the Siewert classification was 70 % for endoscopy/EUS and 72 % for CT. Preoperative data could not be compared with the pathologic assessment in 11 patients (22 %), as large tumors obscured the landmark of the gastric folds. The overall accuracy for predicting the N-stage in 250 lymph node stations was 66 % for EUS and 68 % for CT. The accuracy was good for those stations located high in the thorax, but poor for celiac trunk nodes.Given the frequent discrepancy between the endoscopic and pathologic location of the GEJ and the common problem of advanced tumors obscuring the landmarks used in the assessment of the Siewert classification, its usefulness is limited. The overall accuracy for EUS and CT in predicting the N-stage per station was moderate.Multi-institutional trial of preoperative chemoradiotherapy in patients with potentially resectable gastric carcinoma.In the West, curative (R0) resection is achieved in approximately 50% of patients with localized gastric carcinoma, and more than 60% die of cancer following an R0 resection. A multi-institutional study of preoperative chemoradiotherapy was done to assess the R0 resection rate, pathologic complete response (pathCR) rate, safety, and survival in patients with resectable gastric carcinoma.Operable patients with localized gastric adenocarcinoma were eligible. Staging also included a laparoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Patients received up to two 28-day cycles of induction chemotherapy of fluorouracil, leucovorin, and cisplatin, followed by 45 Gy of radiation plus concurrent fluorouracil. Patients were then staged and surgery was attempted.Thirty-four patients were registered at three institutions. One ineligible patient was excluded. Most patients had a promixal cancer and EUST3N1 designation. Twenty-eight (85%) of 33 patients underwent surgery. The R0 resection rate was 70% and pathCR rate was 30%. A pathologic partial response (< 10% residual carcinoma in the primary) occurred in eight patients (24%). EUS T plus N and postsurgery T plus N correlation showed significant downstaging (P = <.01). The median survival time for 33 patients was 33.7 months. Patients achieving a pathCR or pathPR had a significantly longer median survival time (63.9 months) than those achieving less than pathPR (12.6 months; P =.03). There were two treatment-related deaths.Our data suggest that the three-step strategy of preoperative induction chemotherapy followed by chemoradiotherapy resulted in substantial pathologic response that resulted in durable survival time. This strategy is worthy of a direct comparison with postoperative adjuvant chemoradiotherapy.The multidisciplinary team meeting improves staging accuracy and treatment selection for gastro-esophageal cancer.The object of this article is to assess current staging accuracies for individual modalities and to investigate the influence of the multidisciplinary team (MDT) on clinical staging accuracies and treatment selection for patients with gastro-esophageal cancer. Patients newly diagnosed with gastric or esophageal cancer and who were deemed suitable for surgical resection by the MDT were studied. Patients were staged with a combination of computerized tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Additionally, the MDT determined an overall clinical stage for each patient after discussion at the MDT meeting. Treatments were selected according to this final clinical stage. Final histopathological staging (pTNM) was available for all patients and was used as the gold standard for determining staging accuracy. Suitability of treatment selection was assessed once final pTNM was available. One hundred and eighteen patients were studied. Endoscopic ultrasound was the most accurate individual staging modality for the loco-regional assessment of esophageal tumors (T stage accuracy 78%, N stage accuracy 70%). Laparoscopic ultrasound was the most accurate modality in T staging of gastric cancers (91%). The MDT stage was more accurate than each individual staging modality for T and N staging for both gastric and esophageal cancers (accuracy range: 88-89%) and was better for the assessment of nodal disease than each individual modality (CT P < 0.001, EUS P < 0.01, LUS P < 0.01). Overall staging accuracy as determined at the MDT meeting was increased and resulted in only 2/118 (2%) patients being under-treated. The MDT significantly improves staging accuracy for gastro-esophageal cancer and ensures that correct management decisions are made for the highest number of individual patients.Computed tomography or endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric and esophageal tumors.Accurate preoperative staging of tumors of the esophagus and stomach is important in selecting treatment and determining prognosis. To date, no exact preoperative test has been useful in assessing stage of these tumors. Until recently, computed tomographic (CT) scanning has been the most frequently used examination to predict operative findings. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a relatively new modality used by some centers to assess extramural anatomy of tumors in these two locations.We described 28 patients with tumors involving the esophagus and gastroesophageal junction, and the stomach, who underwent both EUS and CT before surgical exploration. We compared these two tests with the final pathologic interpretation and paid particular attention to presence of lymph nodes and wall penetration by primary tumor.For wall penetration by an esophageal-gastroesophageal junction carcinoma, EUS was 85% accurate versus 15% for CT. For absence of nodal spread by these tumors, EUS was 100% accurate versus 67% for CT. In the presence of nodal spread EUS was 60% accurate versus 50% for CT. For wall penetration by a gastric carcinoma, EUS was 71% accurate versus 0% for CT. In the absence of nodal spread EUS and CT were both 100% accurate. In the presence of nodal spread EUS was 50% accurate versus 25% for CT.EUS is more accurate than CT in the preoperative staging of upper gastrointestinal malignancies.Clinical outcomes of endoscopic submucosal dissection for undifferentiated early gastric cancer.Early gastric cancer (EGC) with undifferentiated histology has not been generally accepted as an indication for endoscopic treatment. This study was designed to evaluate the outcomes and clinicopathological factors associated with the complete resection of undifferentiated EGC using endoscopic submucosal dissection (ESD).A retrospective analysis of prospectively collected data was performed on consecutive patients who underwent ESD. Among the 456 EGCs treated using ESD at the Seoul National University Hospital, Seoul, Korea, between April 2005 and June 2008, 60 lesions (13.2%) were diagnosed as undifferentiated gastric cancer (poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma or signet ring cell carcinoma).En bloc resection was performed in all lesions without significant complications. The size discrepancy between the pretreatment endoscopy and the resected specimen was significantly higher in undifferentiated EGCs than differentiated EGCs (p = 0.002). The complete resection rate was significantly lower for undifferentiated EGC (55%) cases than differentiated EGC cases (84.1%; p < 0.001). Independent risk factors for incomplete resection of undifferentiated EGC included tumor size >20 mm, submucosal invasion, and presence of ulceration. During a mean observation time of 16 months, no recurrence developed in any of the patients with undifferentiated EGCs thought to be completely resected by ESD.ESD might be considered an alternative treatment modality in carefully selected cases of undifferentiated EGC.Endoscopic ultrasound can improve the selection for laparoscopy in patients with localized gastric cancer.The majority of newly diagnosed patients with gastric cancer have disease that is not resectable because of local extension or metastatic (M1) disease. Laparoscopy is a recommended staging evaluation to identify occult peritoneal metastatic disease. We determined if endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) could improve the selection of patients for laparoscopy.Gastric cancer patients being screened for a preoperative chemotherapy clinical trial were prospectively examined. Patients underwent standard preoperative assessment. Those without obvious metastatic disease were referred for EUS and laparoscopy. EUS divided patients into risk categories for metastatic disease: low risk (T1-2, N0) and high risk (T3-4, N+, or both). Laparoscopy categories were M1 and M0. The ability of EUS to predict subradiographic peritoneal metastatic disease was evaluated.Ninety-four patients were studied. The majority were EUS high risk (72%). Occult metastatic disease was identified in 19 patients, 18 of whom had high-risk EUS stage. The yields of identifying M1 disease by laparoscopy in EUS high- and low-risk patients were 25% (95% CI, 15% to 37%) and 4% (95% CI, 0.1% to 20%), respectively. The negative predictive value of low-risk EUS for laparoscopy and pathologic M0 was 96% (exact 95% CI, 80% to 100%).This study suggested that laparoscopy can be avoided in patients with EUS early-stage gastric cancer. Patients with more advanced disease are at higher risk of occult peritoneal disease and require laparoscopy. Validation with greater numbers is warranted, but, based on these data, we propose a new staging algorithm allowing EUS low-risk patients to proceed directly to resection.A comparison of computerised tomography, laparoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound in the preoperative staging of oesophago-gastric carcinoma.Oesophago-gastric carcinoma is associated with a poor prognosis despite advances in diagnosis and treatment. Accurate preoperative staging of gastro-oesophageal carcinoma is, therefore, essential in order to determine patient selection for potentially curative resection. The aim of this study was to evaluate and compare the role of computerised tomography (CT), laparoscopic ultrasound (LapUS) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the staging of oesophago-gastric carcinoma.Thirty-six patients with histologically proven carcinoma of the oesophagus or stomach who were considered fit for surgical resection were identified from a prospectively collected database. All patients underwent spiral CT, LapUS and EUS as part of their preoperative staging investigations. RESULTS from the staging modalities were compared retrospectively with final histopathology where available and to intraoperative findings where the tumour was irresectable.Locally advanced tumours (T3/T4) were accurately identified by CT in 15/16 (94%) and by EUS in 14/16 (88%). LapUS was unable to detect 11 tumours (of which five were T3/T4) because they were above the diaphragm, but in the locally advanced cases where the tumour could be seen the accuracy was 10/12 (83%). EUS was the best modality for assessing early tumours and locoregional nodal involvement with accuracies of 8/13 (62%) and 21/29 (72%), respectively. EUS accuracies rose to 64, 92 and 83% for T1/T2, T3/T4 and N staging with the exclusion of those patients (n=6) in whom strictures prevented full assessment. LapUS had a specificity of 100%, compared to 90% for CT and was more accurate than CT for assessing distant metastases (accuracy of 26/32 (81%) compared to 23/32 (72%) for CT).Although this study is small it has confirmed that CT, EUS and LapUS act in a complimentary manner to provide the most complete preoperative staging for patients with oesophago-gastric cancer.You get what you expect? A critical appraisal of imaging methodology in endosonographic cancer staging.After an initial period of excellent results with newly introduced imaging procedures, the accuracy of most imaging methods declines in later publications. This effect may be due to various methodological factors involved in the research. Using the example of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), this study aimed to elucidate one of the factors possibly concerned--namely, the extent to which the examiners are adequately blinded.Well documented videotapes of EUS examinations of 101 patients with resected tumours of the oesophagus (n=32), stomach (n=33), or pancreas (n=36) were evaluated in three different ways: firstly, retrospective analysis under routine clinical conditions; secondly, evaluation of EUS videotapes in a strictly blinded fashion; and thirdly, evaluation of the same videotapes but with additional information from the video endoscopic appearance (oesophageal/gastric cancer) or from computed tomography results (pancreatic cancer). Histopathological T staging was used as the reference method.The accuracy of EUS in T staging was 73% under routine conditions. This value fell significantly to 53% for the blinded evaluation but increased again to 62% for the unblinded evaluation. The sensitivity of staging T1/T2 tumours was 72% (routine EUS), 59% (blinded EUS), and 70% (unblinded EUS). The respective values for advanced tumours were 85%, 74%, and 72%.The accuracy of EUS for T staging in clinical practice appears to be lower than has previously been reported. In addition, blinded analysis produced significantly poorer results, which improved when another test was added. It may be speculated that better results with routine EUS obtained in a clinical setting are due to additional sources of information.Positron emission tomography using 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose for response monitoring in locally advanced gastroesophageal cancer; a comparison of different analytical methods.To determine the ability of 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) to monitor response in locally advanced gastroesophageal cancer (LAGEC). Additionally, optimal FDG-PET methods for response monitoring were selected.Sequential dynamic FDG-PET scans were performed in 13 patients with LAGEC (T2-3N0-1M0-1a) treated with neoadjuvant cisplatin and gemcitabine plus granulocyte macrophage colony stimulating growth factor at a three weekly schedule. The standard FDG-PET method, nonlinear regression (NLR), was compared with computed tomography (CT), endoscopic-ultrasound (EUS), and histopathology as well as with 21 simplified analytical FDG-PET methods.Five out of 12 operated tumors responded histopathologically with less than 10% residual tumorcells (42%). These had a higher decrease in FDG uptake compared with nonresponders (P=0.008). Early (after two cycles) and late (after completed induction therapy) response evaluation showed a specificity of 86% and 100%, respectively, and a sensitivity of 100%. Both FDG-PET and EUS were superior to CT. From 21 methods analyzing FDG uptake, the quantitative Patlak analysis, the simplified kinetic method (SKM), and the semiquantitative standardized uptake value corrected for bodyweight (SUV-BW) seemed to correlate best with NLR.FDG-PET reliably predicted response in LAGEC. FDG-PET measurements using Patlak analysis or the more clinical applicable SKM and SUV-BW were acceptable alternatives to NLR.The Japanese experience with endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer.The Japanese experience with endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer is reviewed and compared with Western results. Various graphic classifications for prediction of the depth of transmural penetration characterize the Japanese approach. Differentiation of early gastric cancers from advanced cancers has been emphasized, with the concordance rate of the ultrasonographic interpretation and the pathology exceeding 90%. When pre-operative staging by the TNM system was attempted, results were similar to the reports from the West, with overall concordance rate for tumor depth of greater than 80%. The Japanese system of classification may be useful in differentiating advanced cancers from early gastric cancers with co-existing ulceration and fibrosis. The reliability of endoscopic ultrasonography in the pre-operative staging of gastric cancer in Japan is similar to that in the West.Clinical stage after preoperative chemoradiation is a better predictor of patient outcome than the baseline stage for localized gastric cancer.For patients with localized gastric cancer (LGC) who are receiving preoperative chemoradiation (CTRT), the postsurgical pathologic stage predicts overall survival (OS) better than the baseline stage. The authors hypothesized that presurgical (postCTRT) stage would also correlate better with patient outcome than the baseline stage.The authors analyzed 74 LGC patients treated with preoperative CTRT receiving similar treatment. Patients were staged with baseline endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and laparoscopy. Patients received induction chemotherapy, then CTRT (45 Gy), and had an attempted surgery. After CTRT, patients had complete preoperative staging including EUS in 35 patients.Thirty-five had all 3 sets of staging, baseline, presurgical, and postsurgical. Baseline stage did not associate with OS (P = .16) nor disease-free survival (DFS; P = .13). However, presurgical stage was associated with OS (P = .01), and DFS (P = .05). OS was also associated with postsurgical stage and was longer for stages 0 and I than for stages III and IV (P = .01 and .04, respectively). Similarly, DFS was longer in postsurgical pathologic stages 0, I, and II than in stage III or IV (P < .001, <.001, and <.01, respectively). Baseline staging did not correlate with the proportion of patients alive at 4 years; however, presurgical staging did. Patients with stage I or II survived longer than those with stage III or IV (81% vs 25%; P < .01).Heterogeneity in clinical biology of LGC is best reflected after CTRT in presurgical and postsurgical pathologic stages rather than by the baseline stage. Correlation of outcome with presurgical staging may facilitate strategies to individualize therapy for LGC.[Progress in image diagnosis: endoscopic ultrasonography].Endoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of invasive gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonographic (EUS) images of 174 cases of gastric cancer were examined to assess the depth of tumor invasion. Comparison was made between the depth of the changes shown in the multi-layered image produced by ultrasonography and the actual depth of invasion. Cases showing ultrasonographic changes extending deeper than the actual tumor were found to have fibrosis associated with peptic ulceration within the tumor focus. In such cases the echo images chiefly depicted the form and nature of the fibrosis, and the images were so characteristic that they could be classified into patterns. In the other cases the depth of tumor invasion could be almost precisely determined by detecting to which layer the changes shown by EUS extended.[Endoscopic ultrasound in routine clinical practice for staging adenocarcinomas of the stomach and distal esophagus].Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an important diagnostic tool for determining the best therapeutic strategy (primary resection, neoadjuvant therapy or palliation only) to offer esophageal or gastric cancer patients.In the present study (1992-2001),we evaluated the accuracy of EUS in adenocarcinomas of the distal esophagus and stomach and compared our results with pathologists findings as the gold standard.Of the 222 patients studied, the precise examination of 11% EUS was not completely possible due to severe tumor stenosis. The accuracy of EUS with respect to T, N+/- and TN+/- amounted to 51%, 65% and 34% in 131 patients with adenocarcinomas of the esophageal gastric junction and to 50%, 66% and 37% in 91 patients with adenocarcinomas located in the fundus, corpus or antrum of the stomach respectively. With respect to T-stage, the overstaging of tumors was more common than understaging, especially in pT2b-carcinomas. The subgroup analysis of the 131 EGJ adenocarcinoma patients showed that the results obtained by EUS were slightly better in type I (distal esophageal cancer) than in type II and III cardia carcinomas (proximal gastric cancer).When comparing two observation periods (1992-1996 and 1997-2001), the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound staging was very similar in both periods for T-category (51% vs 49%) and N-category (63% vs 64%) as well as for combined TN-staging (36% vs 35%) respectively.In clinical routine examinations of adenocarcinomas of the stomach and the distal esophagus, the accuracy of EUS is not as good as the excellent results in the past--mostly obtained under study conditions--may suggest.Endosonography and endosonography-guided biopsy of upper-GI-tract tumors using a curved-array echoendoscope.The purpose of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with a curved-array transducer and to determine the value of endosonography-guided biopsy.EUS was performed in 162 consecutive patients for preoperative staging of gastric or esophageal cancer (n = 122) or for EUS-guided biopsy (n = 40). All patients were examined using a flexible echoendoscope (Pentax FG32-UA) equipped with a 7.5-MHz curved-array transducer. A specially designed fine needle was used for EUS-guided biopsy of submucosal or extrinsic lesions.Surgery was performed in 19 of 48 patients with esophageal cancer and 60 of 74 patients with gastric cancer. The accuracy in the assessment of the infiltration depth of esophageal cancer and in the determination of lymph node involvement was 84% and 88%, respectively. In gastric cancer the tumor infiltration depth was assessed correctly in only 65% of the patients. The identification of early gastric cancer proved to be a major problem. The accuracy in the detection of lymph node involvement was 73%. Obstructing tumors were examined in 17 patients with carcinoma of the esophagus or the gastric cardia. The accuracy of EUS in determining the T-stage and the N-stage of stenotic tumors was 88% and 86%, respectively. Endosonography-guided needle biopsy was successfully performed in all 40 patients. Histologic analysis revealed malignancy in 50% of the patients. Only two biopsy specimens contained nonrepresentative material (accuracy: 95%). No complications were observed related to the procedure.EUS with a curved-array transducer provides high accuracy rates in staging of esophageal carcinoma. Evaluation of gastric cancer with this technique appears to be more difficult than with radial transducers. A major advantage of the linear transducer is the ability to perform EUS-guided biopsies of submucosal or extamural lesions.Prospective comparison of endoscopy, endosonography and computed tomography for staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia.Local and multimodal therapeutic strategies for tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia, require precise preoperative staging. Endosonography is considered the most accurate staging method, while computed tomography (CT) has limitations especially in the evaluation of local infiltration. Macroscopic endoscopic evaluation was reported to be accurate in selected series, but no study has yet compared all three staging modalities.One hundred and seventeen unselected patients with tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia were prospectively staged first by the endoscopic macroscopic appearance and then by endosonography. All patients had preoperative CT scans, however, only the 36 patients receiving the scans at our institution were included in the study. The preoperative staging results were then compared to postoperative histology which was available as the gold standard in all included patients. Kappa statistics were used to exclude chance agreement of the clinical staging results with the pathohistological findings. Differences between the resulting kappa values for the different staging modalities were analysed with a jack-knife test.Endoscopic macroscopic staging and endosonography (accuracy 67 and 69%, weighted kappa 0.78 and 0.84) were significantly more accurate than CT (accuracy 33%, weighted kappa 0.44) for determination of the T category (p = 0.006 and p = 0.001). After exclusion of tumours of the cardia (n = 33), the accuracy of macroscopic and endosonographic staging (accuracy 72 and 75%, weighted kappa 0.86 and 0.88) increased and remained more accurate than CT (accuracy 50%, weighted kappa 0.62). The main pitfall in our series in staging the T category was the overestimation of T2 tumours in the cardia as T3 or even as T4 tumours due to the inability to visualise the serosa. The accuracy of predicting lymph node metastasis was 68% for macroscopic endoscopic, 79% for endosonographic, and 67% for CT staging. Only endosonographic staging was significantly different from chance agreement with histology (weighted kappa = 0.56). Endosonographic staging was significantly more accurate than endoscopic macroscopic and CT staging (p = 0.03).Endosonography is the most accurate staging modality for overall preoperative staging of oesophageal and cardial tumours. Endoscopic macroscopic staging allows a reasonably accurate assessment of the T category.Pre-operative staging of gastro-oesophageal junction carcinoma: comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography.Fifteen patients with carcinoma of the gastro-oesophageal junction were pre-operatively staged with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT). The accuracy of tumour and nodal staging using both modalities was compared to the final histological staging of the resected specimens. In staging depth of tumour growth, EUS was significantly more accurate (87% of lesions correctly staged) than CT (40% correctly staged). In staging nodal involvement, EUS was again significantly more accurate (73% correctly staged) than CT (33%). Two-thirds of the lesions were traversable with the endoscopic probe, but most of the nontraversed lesions were correctly staged on EUS. In this study, CT has performed poorly as a staging modality for carcinoma at the gastro-oesophageal junction. Other studies have shown CT to be less accurate at this location than at other oesophageal sites. The orientation of the gastro-oesophageal junction, lack of surrounding fat planes, proximity of adjacent organs and patient motion contribute to the poor staging performance of CT at this location. In contrast, EUS has been an accurate staging modality at the gastro-oesophageal junction in this study and compares well with other studies evaluating EUS in the more proximal oesophagus. Endoscopic ultrasound is therefore a necessary modality if accurate pre-operative staging of gastro-oesophageal junction carcinoma is to be achieved.[How accurate is preoperative staging as a basis for treatment decisions in gastric carcinoma?].The treatment of advanced gastric carcinoma by various neoadjuvant and adjuvant multimodal therapy regimes is under current investigation to improve the poor outcome of these patients. Therefore, pretherapeutic tumor staging according to the TNM classification is essential for the optimal application of various therapeutic modalities. According to recent studies, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the most sensitive technique in measuring tumor infiltration (T-staging). In addition, although less reliable compared to the T-staging, the sensitivity of EUS in assessing lymph node status (N-staging) is superior to computed tomography and conventional ultrasound. Pretherapeutic laparoscopic investigation may give additional important information about tumor stage. This overview describes the significance of various diagnostic techniques that can be applied in tumor staging investigations.Invasion assessment in gastric carcinoma - imagistic and histopathologic combined study.Imagistic examinations have an essential role in the assessment of gastric cancer both in earlier and advanced stages. Among these, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) especially contributes to the diagnosis by direct visualization of the tumor and to the staging and prognosis assessment through the evaluation of the gastric wall and regional lymph nodes. Computer tomography (CT) examination also has an important role, especially in advanced stages, in the assessment of the prognosis, contributing to TNM staging. The aim of this study is a comparative assessment of tumor invasion degree by these two imagistic methods and the correlation of the imagistic diagnosis with histopathologic assessment results on surgical specimens.The basis of the study was represented by a group of 38 patients with gastric carcinoma investigated both by endoscopic ultrasound and computer tomography from which 15 cases with surgical excision of the tumor followed by microscopic examination were selected. Studied material was represented by: patients' medical charts, registers for ultrasound endoscopy and CT investigation, endoscopic and CT images, surgical excision samples and pathology reports. Tumor fragments were processed by classical histological techniques (fixation and paraffin wax embedding) and staining (HE).Comparing the CT examination with ultrasound endoscopy results showed that CT examination overestimated the invasion grade of the gastric wall (T) but accurately defined the grade of lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M). Comparing the results of ultrasound endoscopic examination with those from histopathological examination showed that the first method underestimated the grade of invasion of the gastric wall (T) while the latter correctly defined the grade of lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M). Comparing CT examination results with histopathological ones showed that CT overestimated both the grade of invasion of the gastric wall (T), lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M).In the preoperative assessment of the invasion stage of gastric carcinoma (TNM), ultrasound endoscopy is the elective imagistic investigation for predicting the grade of invasion of the gastric wall while CT examination is a more accurate assessment of lymph node extension and metastases, the precise definition of invasion stage being only the result of histopathological examination on surgical specimens.Multimodal imaging of esophagus and cardia cancer before and after treatment.Prognosis and treatment of esophagus and cardia cancer (ECC) depend on the precision with which the disease is staged according to the American Joint Committee of Cancer (AJCC) criteria. Imaging modalities normally used in clinical staging are esophagography, esophagoscopy, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), computed tomography (CT) and positron emission tomography- CT fusion (CT-PET). The combination of these methods is crucial in determining not only the right diagnosis but also the stage and follow-up after multimodal treatment. The purpose of our investigation was to define the role of each imaging modality in determining the most appropriate treatment options in patients with ECC.Fifty-six patients with ECC diagnosed by X-ray of the upper digestive tract, endoscopy and biopsy were staged using EUS, chest and abdomen CT scan, and CT-PET. Thirty-four patients in stage II and 18 patients in stage III underwent surgery after neoadjuvant chemotherapy; four patients in stage IV were treated with the positioning of an endoprosthesis after chemoradiotherapy. In the 52 patients who had surgery, follow-up included digestive tract X-ray, endoscopy and CT of the chest and abdomen every 6-8 months for the first 3 years. CT-PET was only performed in patients with a clinical suspicion of recurrence and/or CT findings suspicious of persistent disease (12 cases).In all 56 patients, endoscopy, EUS, CT and CT-PET in combination were crucial in determining the site of disease, locoregional extent and depth of esophageal wall penetration (T), and any involvement of the mediastinal lymph nodes (N1), extrathoracic lymph nodes (M1) or hepatic metastases. In the locoregional staging of ECC before chemotherapy, we were able to differentiate T2-T3 from T4 in 40 patients; T4 disease was found in 12 potentially resectable cases. We were able to distinguish N0 from N1 in 12 patients. In four cases, the presence of small lymph node and/or liver metastases prompted positioning of an endoprosthesis. The specificity of CT in detecting small lymph nodes in the mediastinum was less than 50% while for CT-PET, it was more than 80%; EUS revealed sensitivity higher than 90% but a low specificity in seven cases. Only CT-PET revealed metastatic subdiaphragmatic lymph nodes (diameter <15 mm) in three cases. Presurgical restaging of the 18 patients (stage III) who had chemotherapy was based on endoscopy, EUS, CT of the chest and abdomen and CT-PET (only in suspected cases) and was compatible with surgery. Anastomotic recurrence was diagnosed in 16 patients by endoscopy with associated biopsy; any intramediastinal spread from anastomotic recurrences was evaluated by chest CT, and CT-PET in suspected cases.X-ray of the upper digestive tract and chest and abdomen CT scan are useful in preliminary evaluation of ECC. Endoscopy is particularly indicated for evaluating tumour morphology, taking biopsies for a histological diagnosis and the early diagnosis of anastomotic recurrences. EUS is indicated mainly for evaluating T stage before and after chemotherapy or chemoradiotherapy. CT-PET is extremely useful in identifying small mediastinal metastatic lymph nodes (N1) or extrathoracic lymph nodes (M1) and hepatic metastases (</=1 cm), which may escape multislice CT. PET alone is useful for identifying residual or recurrent tumour in the esophageal wall when an endoprosthesis is in place.Morphometric analysis of regional lymph nodes with and without metastasis from early gastric carcinoma.To the authors' knowledge detailed morphometric changes in lymph nodes with and without metastasis in patients with early gastric carcinoma remain undocumented.Histologic slides of 1847 lymph nodes dissected from 115 consecutive patients who underwent gastrectomy for early gastric carcinoma were examined histologically and measured using computer morphometry with the public domain National Institutes of Health Image program. Quantitative data were analyzed in relation to preoperative and intraoperative clinical assessments and postoperative pathologic diagnosis.Metastasis was found in 11 lymph nodes (0.6%) from 8 patients (7.0%). Metastatic lymph nodes showed a mean maximum dimension of 4.8 mm, a mean area of 14.4 mm(2), and a mean ratio of maximum/minimum dimension of 1.36; the corresponding values for nonmetastatic lymph nodes were 4.7 mm (P = 0.45), 13.2 mm(2) (P = 0. 13), and 1.66 (P = 0.10), respectively. The lymph node with a metastasis was not necessarily the largest of the dissected lymph nodes from each patient, and histologically each lymph node with a metastasis showed pericancerous fibrosis in > 10% of its area. The sensitivities of preoperative computed tomography, abdominal ultrasonography (US), endoscopic US, and intraoperative assessments to diagnose metastasis were 0%, 13%, 0%, and 13%, respectively, and the sensitivities of these modalities to detect lymph nodes > 10 mm in dimension were 18%, 10%, 3%, and 10%, respectively.Digital quantitative analysis is useful and widely applicable to clinicopathologic evaluation. The diagnostic sensitivity of lymph node metastasis in patients with early gastric carcinoma in the current study was very low with preoperative and intraoperative assessments because lymph node metastases were small and showed subtle histologic changes of pericancerous fibrosis.A new diagnostic method for early gastric cancer: volume measurement by 3-dimensional endoscopic ultrasonography in early gastric cancer and its clinical significance.The objective of the present study was to measure the volume of early gastric cancer using 3-dimensional endoscopic ultrasonography (3D-EUS) and to ascertain the clinical significance of this new diagnostic method.The study comprised 100 patients with early gastric cancer who underwent preoperative 3D-EUS followed by surgical resection. The relationships of lymph node metastasis to 10 clinicopathological factors (gender, age, tumor location, ulcer, depth, macroscopic type, tumor histology, lymphatic invasion and venous invasion) and preoperative tumor volume (log tumor volume) as measured by 3D-EUS were determined.Median tumor volume was 414.75 mm3 (range, 7.8-2,683.8 mm3) and median log tumor volume was 2.617 (range, 1.444-3.429). Univariate analyses showed that three factors (lymphatic invasion, p=0.0001; venous invasion, p=0.0216; log tumor volume, p=0.0121) correlated significantly with lymph node metastasis. Multivariate analysis showed only two factors (lymphatic invasion, p=0.011, regression coefficient=0.104; log tumor volume, p=0.020, regression coefficient=30.414) representing independent predictors for lymph node metastasis.Tumor volume as measured by 3D-EUS represents an independent risk factor for lymph node metastasis in early gastric cancer. This new method can be used as a reliable diagnostic tool for early gastric cancer.Comparison of the efficacy of endoscopic ultrasonography and submucosography in diagnosing the depth of gastric cancer invasion.Diagnosis of the depth of the cancer invasion is necessary to select the indication of endoscopic treatment. We used endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and Submucosography (SMG) to diagnose the depth of cancer invasion and compared their efficacy against 63 lesions in 60 cases of gastric and esophageal cancers. SMG could diagnose the invasion correctly in 97% of m (mucosa) cancers, 88% of sm (submucosa) cancers and 100% of advanced cancers. On the other hand, linear-type EUS could diagnose the cancer invasion correctly in 60% of the m cancers, 83% of the sm cancers and 100% of advanced cancers. The results of the comparison of radial-type EUS and SMG showed similar results. Both EUS and SMG are appropriate for the judgement of endoscopic treatments. However, for the selection of the indication of endoscopic treatment which is applied to relatively small sized lesions in general, SMG appears to be superior to EUS in both resolution power and accuracy in shooting.Staging of gastric cancer with endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic mucosal resection.Since it was found that the gastrointestinal wall is visualized as a five-layered structure corresponding to the histological layers of the wall, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has become recognized clinically as the most accurate method for diagnosing and assessing the local staging of gastric cancer. However, some problems have remained, including how to differentiate between cancer invasion and ulcer fibrosis, how to detect microinvasion, and how to recognize malignant lymph nodes. Using the pattern analysis for depressed-type gastric cancer, it is usually possible to distinguish between cancer invasion and ulcer fibrosis, except in cases of microinvasion into ulcer fibrosis or inadequate scanning. However, the sensitivity of EUS for evaluating metastatic lymph nodes is still problematic. Endoscopic mucosal resection (EMR) for early gastric cancer has been widely accepted as a standard treatment in Japan due to its minimal invasiveness. According to our data, the overall rate of radical resection was 68.3% (168 of 246), and 31.7% of the remaining patients additionally received laser treatment, surgery, or heater-probe treatment. There were no deaths owing to gastric cancer. Some lesions in which there was microinvasion of the submucosa were incorrectly diagnosed by EUS. It may be possible to solve this problem using three-dimensional EUS (3D-EUS) in the near future.Preoperative assessment of tumor location and station-specific lymph node status in patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction.In esophageal cancer patients preoperative staging will determine the type of surgical procedure and use of neoadjuvant therapy. Tumor location and lymph node status play a pivotal role in this tailored strategy. The aim of the present study was to prospectively evaluate the accuracy of preoperative assessment of tumor location according to the Siewert classification and lymph node status per station with endoscopy/endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT).In 50 esophagectomy patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction (GEJ), tumor location according to Siewert and N-stage per nodal station as determined preoperatively by endoscopy/EUS and CT were compared with the histopathologic findings in the resection specimen.Overall accuracy in predicting tumor location according to the Siewert classification was 70 % for endoscopy/EUS and 72 % for CT. Preoperative data could not be compared with the pathologic assessment in 11 patients (22 %), as large tumors obscured the landmark of the gastric folds. The overall accuracy for predicting the N-stage in 250 lymph node stations was 66 % for EUS and 68 % for CT. The accuracy was good for those stations located high in the thorax, but poor for celiac trunk nodes.Given the frequent discrepancy between the endoscopic and pathologic location of the GEJ and the common problem of advanced tumors obscuring the landmarks used in the assessment of the Siewert classification, its usefulness is limited. The overall accuracy for EUS and CT in predicting the N-stage per station was moderate.Accuracy of linear-array EUS for preoperative staging of gastric cardia cancer.The feasibility of a less invasive operation for early stage cancer of the gastric cardia with a low frequency of lymph node involvement has been previously demonstrated by us. Precise discrimination among mucosal, submucosal, and advanced cancers, as well as accurate evaluation of the proximal tumor margin are prerequisites for such stage-specific treatment. EUS is considered the most reliable staging modality. However, there is no EUS study specifically of cardia cancer.Forty-five patients with gastric cardia cancer who underwent gastrectomy with at least first-tier lymphadenectomy were retrospectively analyzed. The results of preoperative linear-array echoendoscopy (7.5 MHz) with respect to cancer depth, lymph node involvement, and esophageal invasion were compared with postoperative histopathologic findings.Overall diagnostic accuracy for depth of invasion was 71%. Sensitivity for T1, T2, and T3 lesions was 100%, 31% and 75%, respectively. Overstaging of T2 cancers was the main diagnostic error. Mucosal (pT1-m) and submucosal (pT1-sm) cancers were correctly discriminated in 81% of patients. Diagnostic accuracy for lymph node involvement was 80%. EUS had positive and negative predictive values of 90% and 80%, respectively, for esophageal invasion.For gastric cardia cancer, the linear-array echoendoscope yielded satisfactory results with respect to depth of invasion, lymph node involvement, and esophageal invasion evaluation. The information obtained is useful to the performance of stage-specific treatment.Pretreatment staging of endoscopically early gastric cancer with a 15 MHz ultrasound catheter probe.The usefulness of and problems associated with an ultrasound catheter probe in the pretreatment staging of endoscopically early gastric cancer remain unexplored.Endoscopic ultrasonography using a 15 MHz catheter probe of 2.6 mm diameter was performed in a prospective study to determine the pretherapy staging of endoscopically early gastric cancer in 78 patients. The results of the ultrasound images were compared with the histologic findings of the specimens obtained by endoscopic mucosal resection or surgical resection.The accuracy of the catheter probe for depth of invasion of endoscopically early gastric cancers was 67% (52 of 78 patients). The accuracy in determining depth of invasion in relation to endoscopic type was significantly higher for the elevated type (91%) than for the depressed type of early cancer (56%) (p < 0.01). The staging accuracy classified by histologic type was significantly higher for differentiated (86%) than for undifferentiated (18%) cancer (p < 0.01). Staging accuracy decreased as tumor size increased. The accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity for nodal staging were 80%, 17%, and 90%, respectively.A 15 MHz ultrasound catheter probe is most useful for determining depth of invasion when the tumor is histologically differentiated and endoscopically of the small elevated type early gastric cancer, but it is unreliable in the diagnosis of metastatic lymph nodes.Transendoscopic ultrasound of esophageal and gastric cancer using miniaturized ultrasound catheter probes.The aim of this study was to investigate the value of miniaturized ultrasound catheter probes (miniprobes) for preoperative staging of esophageal and gastric cancer.Fifty-one patients with esophageal (n = 21) and gastric cancer (n = 30) underwent endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). All examinations were carried out using mechanical miniprobes (diameter 6F, 12.5 MHz) that were introduced through the instrument channel of the endoscope.EUS with miniprobes was successfully performed in all patients, although stenotic tumors, which could not be traversed with the endoscope, were found in 6 of 21 patients (29%) with esophageal cancer. Miniprobe scanning provided high-resolution images of the gastrointestinal tract. The overall accuracy in the assessment of tumor infiltration depth for esophageal and gastric cancer was 90% and 82%, respectively. However, the value of miniprobe scanning in the assessment of advanced tumors was limited by the imaging depth of the probe (approximately 3 cm). Lymph node involvement was accurately diagnosed in 78% of the patients with esophageal cancer (sensitivity 75%, specificity 80%) and in 80% of the patients with gastric cancer (sensitivity 73%, specificity 89%).EUS with miniprobes can be performed as single-step procedure during diagnostic endoscopy. The 12.5 MHz transducer provides high-resolution imaging and enables accurate staging of tumors with limited infiltration depth.Local staging and assessment of resectability in carcinoma of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum by endoscopic ultrasonography.Eighty-eight patients with carcinoma of the esophagus (N = 44), stomach (N = 41), and duodenum (N = 3) who underwent surgery were pre-operatively examined by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The ability of EUS to accurately predict the T stage and the N stage was 82% and 70% for esophageal carcinoma, 71% and 75% for gastric cancer, and 100% and 66% for duodenal malignancy. In esophageal carcinoma, the accuracy of T staging was only slightly lower in cases with non-traversable tumor stenoses (77%) compared with traversable carcinomas (84%). This was probably due to the fact that all non-traversable tumors were either in stage T3 or T4. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the stages T1 to T3, which correspond to R0 resectability (no macroscopic or microscopic tumor remains), was 92% for adenocarcinoma of the distal esophagus and 85% for gastric cancer. However, in squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus, R0 resection was possible in only 66% of all cases, whereas EUS predicted an 84% R0 resection rate. In adenocarcinoma of the distal esophagus and stomach, EUS prediction of stages T1 to T3 correlated well with the actual rate of R0 resection. These results show that EUS is a reliable diagnostic method for the local staging of upper gastrointestinal cancer. Its impact on treatment and hence on prognosis of patients with these malignancies has yet to be determined.The Japanese experience with endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer.The Japanese experience with endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer is reviewed and compared with Western results. Various graphic classifications for prediction of the depth of transmural penetration characterize the Japanese approach. Differentiation of early gastric cancers from advanced cancers has been emphasized, with the concordance rate of the ultrasonographic interpretation and the pathology exceeding 90%. When pre-operative staging by the TNM system was attempted, results were similar to the reports from the West, with overall concordance rate for tumor depth of greater than 80%. The Japanese system of classification may be useful in differentiating advanced cancers from early gastric cancers with co-existing ulceration and fibrosis. The reliability of endoscopic ultrasonography in the pre-operative staging of gastric cancer in Japan is similar to that in the West.Usefulness of three-dimensional, multidetector row CT (virtual gastroscopy and multiplanar reconstruction) in the evaluation of gastric cancer: a comparison with conventional endoscopy, EUS, and histopathology.The aim of this study was to assess the role of three-dimensional multidetector row CT for detection, precise localization, and staging of gastric cancer by comparison with conventional endoscopy, EUS, and histopathology.Sixty-three patients with gastric cancer (31 early stage, 32 advanced) were evaluated by EGD with biopsies, EUS, and three-dimensional multidetector row CT between January 2003 to August 2003. Three-dimensional multidetector row CT findings were analyzed by a single radiologist blinded to the endoscopic findings. Among 63 patients, the findings were confirmed in 48 at surgery or by EMR. In the remaining cases, the findings were confirmed by EGD and biopsy specimen. The accuracy of three-dimensional multidetector row CT for detection, localization, and staging of gastric cancer was determined, compared with endoscopy, EUS, and histopathology.Among the 63 patients, there were 67 gastric cancers. The overall accuracy of three-dimensional multidetector row CT for detection of gastric lesions was 94% (63/67), with accuracies of 96.7% (30/31) and 100% (32/32) for detection of, respectively, early and advanced stage gastric cancer. The overall accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity for EUS and three-dimensional multidetector row CT in the pre-operative determination of depth of invasion (T stage) were, respectively, 87.5%, 82.4%, and 96%; and 83.3%, 69.1%, and 94.4%. The accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS and three-dimensional multidetector row CT for lymph node staging was, respectively, 79.1%, 57%, and 89.5%; and 75%, 57.4%, and 89.3%.Three-dimensional multidetector row CT, along with virtual gastroscopy is a promising method for pre-operative evaluation of gastric cancer.Usefulness of contrast-enhanced EUS in the diagnosis of upper GI tract diseases.We evaluated the usefulness of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis of upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract diseases.The subjects were 42 patients with upper GI tract diseases: 4 esophageal carcinomas, 30 gastric carcinomas, 5 gastric myogenic tumors, and 3 gastric ulcers. After the lesion was observed by EUS, air-filled albumin (0.22 mL/kg) was intravenously injected at a rate of 1 mL/sec into the right cubital median vein, and observation was continued for 10 minutes.Enhancement of the third and fifth layers was observed in all normal esophageal and gastric walls. No esophageal carcinomas were enhanced. Enhancement was observed in 5 gastric carcinomas that had abundant, enlarged, and winding vascular beds. In all esophageal and the other 25 gastric carcinomas, although the tumors per se were not enhanced, enhancement of the third and fifth layers around the lesions clearly demarcated the tumor boundaries. As a result, accuracy for detection of the depth of gastric carcinoma improved from 76.7% for EUS to 90% for contrast-enhanced EUS. All gastric myogenic tumors were enhanced, and irregularly shaped sonolucent areas within these tumors became clear, but we could not distinguish between leiomyoma and leiomyosarcoma.Contrast-enhanced EUS is a noninvasive, useful diagnostic method for assessment of the depth of invasion of esophageal and gastric carcinomas.Endoscopic ultrasound staging in gastric cancer: Does it help management decisions in the era of neoadjuvant treatment?Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has been shown to be the most accurate test for locoregional staging of upper gastrointestinal tumors; however, recent studies have questioned its accuracy level in daily clinical application. The present retrospective study analyzes the accuracy of EUS in guiding interdisciplinary treatment decisions.123 primarily operated patients (63 % men, mean age 61.4 years) were included; only cases with tumor-free resection margins and without evidence of distant metastases were selected. EUS and histopathological findings were compared. Main outcome parameter was the distinction between tumors to be primarily operated (T1 /2N0) and those to be treated by neoadjuvant or perioperative chemotherapy (T3/4, or any N + ), based on an assumed algorithm for treatment stratification.Overall staging accuracy of EUS was 44.7 % for T and 71.5 % for N status irrespective of tumor location. Overstaging was the main problem (44.9 % for T, 42.9 % for N staging). The overall EUS classification was correct in 79.7 % (accuracy), with a sensitivity 91.9 % and specificity 51.4 %; only 19 out of 37 cases with histopathological T1/2N0 were correctly classified by EUS. Positive and negative predictive values of EUS in diagnosing advanced tumor stage for assignment to neoadjuvant therapy were 81.4 % and 73.1 %, respectively.Whereas EUS has a high sensitivity in the diagnosis of locally advanced gastric cancer, endosonographic overstaging of T2 cancers appears to be a frequent problem. EUS stratification between local (T1 /2N0) and advanced (T3/4 or any N + ) tumors would thus result in incorrect assignment to neoadjuvant treatment in half of cases.Epidemiology, surgical management and early postoperative outcome in a cohort of gastric cancer patients of a tertiary referral center in relation to multi-center quality assurance studies.The aim of the study was to analyze epidemiologic parameters, treatment-related data and prognostic factors in the management of gastric cancer patients of a university surgical center under conditions of routine clinical care before the onset of the era of multimodal therapies. By analyzing our data in relation with multi-center quality assurance trials [German Gastric Cancer Study - GGCS (1992) and East German Gastric Cancer Study - EGGCS (2004)] we aimed at providing an instrument of internal quality control at our institution as well as a base for comparison with future analyses taking into account the implementation of evolving (multimodal) therapies and their influence on treatment results.Retrospective analysis of prospectively gathered data of gastric cancer patients treated at a single institution during a defined 10-year time period with multivariate analysis of risk factors for early postoperative outcome.From 04/01/1993 through 03/31/2003, a total of 328 gastric cancer patients were treated. In comparison with the EGGCS cohort there was a larger proportion of patients with locally advanced and proximally located tumors. 272 patients (82.9%) underwent surgery with curative intent; in 88.4% of these an R0 resection was achieved (EGGCS/GGCS: 82.5%/71.5%). 68.2% of patients underwent preoperative endoluminal ultrasound (EUS) (EGGCS: 27.4%); the proportion of patients undergoing EUS increased over the study period. Diagnostic accuracy of EUS for T stage was 50.6% (EGGCS: 42.6%). 77.2% of operated patients with curative intent underwent gastrectomy (EGGCS/GGCS: 79.8%/71.1%). Anastomotic leaks at the esophagojejunostomy occurred slightly more frequently (8.8%) than in the EGGCS (5.9%) and GGCS (7.2%); however, postoperative morbidity (36.1%) and early postoperative mortality (5.3%) were not increased compared to the multi-center quality assurance study results (EGGCS morbidity, 45%); EGGCS/GGCS mortality, 8%/8.9%). D2 lymphadenectomy was performed in 72.6% of cases (EGGCS: 70.9%). Multivariate analysis revealed splenectomy as an independent risk factor for postoperative morbidity and ASA status 3 or 4 as an independent risk factor for early postoperative mortality. The rate of splenectomies performed during gastric cancer surgery decreased substantially during the study period.Preoperative diagnostics were able to accurately predict resectability in almost 90% of patients which is substantially more than the corresponding results of both the EGGCS and the GGCS. In the future, more wide-spread use of EUS will play an increasing role as stage-dependent differentiation of therapeutic concepts gains acceptance. However, diagnostic accuracy of EUS needs to be improved. Our early postoperative outcome data demonstrate that the quality standard of gastric cancer care established by the EGGCS is being fulfilled at our institution in spite of distinct characteristics placing our patients at higher surgical risk. Besides being a valuable instrument of internal quality control, our study provides a good base for comparison with ongoing analyses on future developments in gastric cancer therapy.Diagnosis of the invasion depth of gastric cancer using MDCT with virtual gastroscopy: comparison with staging with endoscopic ultrasound.The objectives of this study were to retrospectively evaluate the lesion detection rate of gastric cancer using only virtual gastroscopy generated from MDCT images and the accuracy of invasion depth diagnosis (T staging) using virtual gastroscopy together with contrast-enhanced MDCT with multiplanar reconstruction (MPR) images (virtual gastroscopy with MPR), and to compare the diagnostic performance between virtual gastroscopy with MPR images and endoscopic ultrasound.The subjects consisted of 175 patients with a total of 186 endoscopically proven gastric cancer lesions. All patients underwent dynamic MDCT (arterial and venous phase) for preoperative staging and underwent surgery or endoscopic treatment. In 129 patients (135 lesions) who were also examined using endoscopic ultrasound, the T staging accuracy was also compared between the two modalities. Two endoscopists independently evaluated the lesion detection rate on virtual gastroscopy images alone and determined the T stage on virtual gastroscopy with MPR images. The T staging included the ability to differentiate T1a from T1b lesions.The overall lesion detection rate was 67.7% (126/186). The detection rates of T1a, T1b, and T2 or deeper were 37.8% (28/74), 75.0% (39/52), and 98.3% (59/60), respectively, showing statistically significant differences (p < 0.001). The T staging accuracies were 82.2% (111/135) using virtual gastroscopy with MPR images and 83.7% (113/135) using endoscopic ultrasound, showing no statistically significant difference (p = 0.850). The main causes of over- and understaging were an ulcer or ulcer scar and poorly differentiated adenocarcinomas, non-solid type, respectively.Virtual gastroscopy with MPR imaging is a useful modality in the T staging of gastric cancer.Double contrast-enhanced ultrasonography for the preoperative evaluation of gastric cancer: a comparison to endoscopic ultrasonography with respect to histopathology.This study was designed to compare the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with double contrast-enhanced ultrasound (DCUS) in the staging of gastric malignancies. DCUS is a transabdominal ultrasound technique using both intravenous and intraluminal contrast to enhance sonographic visualization.This retrospective study included 162 patients with biopsy-proven gastric cancer who underwent DCUS and EUS preoperatively with the ultrasound results compared with the pathologic findings of the resected specimens.The overall accuracy of DCUS and EUS for tumor (T) staging was 77.2% and 74.7%, respectively. Comparison of ultrasound techniques for T staging revealed that DCUS was superior to EUS only for a tumor depth of T3 (chi-square, P = .025). Lymph nodes were staged correctly with DCUS and EUS in 78.4% and 57.4% of cases, respectively (chi-square, P = .001).DCUS offers a noninvasive approach for the staging of gastric cancer. DCUS was comparable to EUS in tumor depth evaluation but offered an advantage in lymph node detection.Endosonographic tumor staging for treatment decision in resectable gastric cancer.Neoadjuvant preoperative chemotherapy is the standard of care in locally advanced resectable gastric cancer. Therefore, accurate locoregional staging is essential for treatment decision. EUS is believed to be the most performant diagnostic method for locoregional staging. However, it is questionable, if results from centers of excellence can be maintained in clinical routine.We retrospectively analyzed the data of 62 resectable gastric cancers staged by EUS during routine clinical work-up. Preoperative variables (tumor size and site, histological differentiation) were compared with the postoperative pathology.19 locally limited (T1-2, N0), and 43 locally advanced (T3-4, or N+ irrespective of T stage) were analyzed. The sensitivity of EUS for the detection of locally advanced disease was 93%, with a specificity of 78%.Even in daily routine practice, differentiation of locally limited and advanced disease with EUS can be performed with high sensitivity and good specificity. Therefore, EUS is an essential part of the diagnostic procedure in patients with gastric cancer.Usefulness and problems of endoscopic ultrasonography in prediction of the depth of tumor invasion in early gastric cancer.The objectives of this study were to evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in local and regional staging of early gastric cancer, to analyze the factors influencing the accuracy of EUS, and to reveal the usefulness and problems of EUS in pre-treatment staging of gastric cancer. We examined 105 lesions in 104 patients with histologically confirmed gastric cancer and retrospectively evaluated them with EUS. The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS were determined by comparing the pre-treatment EUS with the postoperative histopathological findings. The overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS for the depth of cancer invasion was 86%. The overall sensitivity and specificity were 60% and 96%, respectively. The accuracy significantly declined in lesions located in the upper-third of the stomach (70%). Type 0-I lesions tended to be over-staged (12&), and the upper-third lesions tended to be under-staged (23%). The accuracy significantly declined in differentiated adenocarcinoma with massive submucosal invasion (56.5%). EUS is useful for evaluating the depth of gastric cancer invasion which determines the feasibility of endoscopic treatment. However, it is noteworthy that the diagnostic accuracy of the invasion depth diminished for lesions in the upper third of the stomach.Invasion assessment in gastric carcinoma - imagistic and histopathologic combined study.Imagistic examinations have an essential role in the assessment of gastric cancer both in earlier and advanced stages. Among these, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) especially contributes to the diagnosis by direct visualization of the tumor and to the staging and prognosis assessment through the evaluation of the gastric wall and regional lymph nodes. Computer tomography (CT) examination also has an important role, especially in advanced stages, in the assessment of the prognosis, contributing to TNM staging. The aim of this study is a comparative assessment of tumor invasion degree by these two imagistic methods and the correlation of the imagistic diagnosis with histopathologic assessment results on surgical specimens.The basis of the study was represented by a group of 38 patients with gastric carcinoma investigated both by endoscopic ultrasound and computer tomography from which 15 cases with surgical excision of the tumor followed by microscopic examination were selected. Studied material was represented by: patients' medical charts, registers for ultrasound endoscopy and CT investigation, endoscopic and CT images, surgical excision samples and pathology reports. Tumor fragments were processed by classical histological techniques (fixation and paraffin wax embedding) and staining (HE).Comparing the CT examination with ultrasound endoscopy results showed that CT examination overestimated the invasion grade of the gastric wall (T) but accurately defined the grade of lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M). Comparing the results of ultrasound endoscopic examination with those from histopathological examination showed that the first method underestimated the grade of invasion of the gastric wall (T) while the latter correctly defined the grade of lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M). Comparing CT examination results with histopathological ones showed that CT overestimated both the grade of invasion of the gastric wall (T), lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M).In the preoperative assessment of the invasion stage of gastric carcinoma (TNM), ultrasound endoscopy is the elective imagistic investigation for predicting the grade of invasion of the gastric wall while CT examination is a more accurate assessment of lymph node extension and metastases, the precise definition of invasion stage being only the result of histopathological examination on surgical specimens.Endoscopic ultrasound and gastric lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is useful in assessing gastric lesions found on endoscopy. EUS can assess the 5 layers of the gastric wall and is the most useful modality for staging tumors of the stomach, including adenocarcinoma and lymphoma. For subepithelial gastric lesions, EUS can assess the echogenicity of a lesion, which layer of the gastric wall is involved, and assess for the presence of blood flow with Doppler ultrasound. These characteristics help to determine the likely etiology of the lesion. Fine needle aspiration may also provide additional information, especially when mucosal biopsies are nondiagnostic.Endoscopic ultrasonography is valuable for identifying early gastric cancers meeting expanded-indication criteria for endoscopic submucosal dissection.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has become a reliable method for predicting the invasion depth of early gastric cancer (EGC). This study evaluated the accuracy of EUS in identifying lesions meeting expanded-indication criteria for endoscopic submucosal dissection (ESD) and analyzed clinicopathologic factors influencing the diagnostic accuracy of EUS in assessing tumor invasion depth.This study investigated 542 EGCs of 515 patients who underwent EUS pretreatment. The pretreatment EUS-determined diagnosis was compared with the final histopathologic evaluation of resected specimens, and the impact of various clinicopathologic parameters on diagnostic accuracy was analyzed.The diagnostic accuracy of EUS in identifying lesions meeting expanded-indication criteria for ESD was 87.8% (259/295) for differentiated adenocarcinoma (D-type) 30 mm in diameter or smaller, 43.5% (10/23) for D-type tumor larger than 30 mm in diameter, and 75% (42/56) for undifferentiated adenocarcinoma (UD-type) 20 mm in diameter or smaller. Using multivariate analysis, the diagnostic accuracy of EUS in predicting tumor invasion depth was determined to be decreased significantly by ulcerous change and large tumor size (diameter, 30 mm).For patients with EGC, D-type lesions 30 mm in diameter or smaller and UD-type lesions 20 mm in diameter or smaller can be diagnosed with high accuracy by EUS, but larger D-type lesions (diameter, >30 mm) should be considered carefully in terms of EUS-based treatment decisions. Findings of ulceration and large tumors are associated with incorrect diagnosis of tumor invasion depth by EUS.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and conventional endoscopy for prediction of depth of tumor invasion in early gastric cancer.This study aimed to compare the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with that of conventional endoscopy for staging depth of invasion (T staging) in early gastric cancer.A total of 955 patients with suspected early gastric cancer were prospectively registered. EUS staging was carried out prospectively by a single endoscopist using either miniprobe or radial EUS depending on the endoscopic appearance of the tumor. Conventional endoscopy staging was performed retrospectively by consensus between two endoscopists who were blinded to the EUS staging. Conventional endoscopy staging was conducted on the basis of endoscopic features such as surface nodularity and fold convergence. Patients underwent either surgical (n = 586) or endoscopic resection (n = 369) with curative intent. The staging accuracy of each test was compared with the pathological staging of the resected specimen.The presence of a T1m tumor was histologically confirmed in 644 cases (67.4 %) and that of a T1sm tumor in 311 cases (32.6 %). The overall accuracy of EUS staging was 67.4 % (644 / 955) and that of conventional endoscopy staging was 73.7 % (704 / 955) ( P < 0.001). The accuracy of miniprobe EUS was significantly higher than that of radial EUS (79.5 % vs. 59.6 %, P < 0.001), but did not differ significantly from that of conventional endoscopy (79.0 %).EUS does not substantially impact on pretreatment T staging of patients with early gastric cancer compared with conventional endoscopy. Therefore, EUS may not be necessary routinely, and conventional endoscopy may be sufficient for determining the optimal therapeutic strategy, especially in relation to endoscopic resection for early gastric cancer.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative gastric cancer staging: diagnostic yield and therapeutic impact.To evaluate the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasonography in loco-regional staging of gastric cancer in our medium and to determine the impact of this technique on later therapeutic management.This is a retrospective study carried out on patients histologically diagnosed with gastric adenocarcinoma who had been referred for endoscopic ultrasonographic examination. The technique results were compared with those obtained from surgical samples and/or from exploratory laparoscopy- laparotomy. We compared the initial therapeutic decision based on conventional diagnostic techniques with the final therapeutic management based on the endoscopic ultrasonography results.Forty-six patients with gastric adenocarcinoma were included in the study (a reference exploration was available in 36 cases). Diagnostic precision was 70% in stage T, while in stages T1, T2, T3 y T4 was 100, 38, 82, and 100%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity to differentiate T1-2 from T3-4 was 94 and 85%, respectively. We could not identify factors associated with obtaining a correct diagnosis in staging T. Diagnostic precision was 72% for stage N (N0: 58%; Nx 88%). The presence of free perigastric fluid was identified in 7 cases; the presence of peritoneal carcinomatosis was later confirmed in 5 of these. The result of endoscopic ultrasonography led to a modification in the subsequent therapeutic management in 13 patients (28%).Endoscopic ultrasonography is a useful technique for loco-regional staging of gastric adenocarcinoma, which may have important implications in the therapeutic management of these patients.Preoperative staging of gastric cancer by endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector-row computed tomography.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) for the locoregional staging of gastric cancer. EUS and computed tomography (CT) are valuable tools for the preoperative evaluation of gastric cancer. With the introduction of new therapeutic options and the recent improvements in CT technology, further evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of EUS and MDCT is needed.In total, 277 patients who underwent EUS and MDCT, followed by gastrectomy or endoscopic resection at Bundang Hospital, Seoul National University, from July 2006 to April 2008, were analyzed. The results from the preoperative EUS and MDCT were compared to the postoperative pathological findings.Among the 277 patients, the overall accuracy of EUS and MDCT for T staging was 74.7% and 76.9%, respectively. Among the 141 patients with visualized primary lesions on MDCT, the overall accuracy of EUS and MDCT for T staging was 61.7% and 63.8%, respectively. The overall accuracy for N staging was 66% and 62.8%, respectively. The performance of EUS and MDCT for large lesions and lesions at the cardia and angle had significantly lower accuracy than that of other groups. For EUS, the early gastric cancer lesions with ulcerative changes had significantly lower accuracy than those without ulcerative changes.For the preoperative assessment of individual T and N staging in patients with gastric cancer, the accuracy of MDCT was close to that of EUS. Both EUS and MDCT are useful complementary modalities for the locoregional staging of gastric cancer.Accuracy of high-frequency catheter-based endoscopic ultrasonography according to the indications for endoscopic treatment of early gastric cancer.The development of endoscopic treatment, such as endoscopic submucosal dissection, extends the indications for endoscopic resection in patients with early gastric cancer (EGC). Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the first-choice imaging modality for determining the depth of invasion of gastric cancer. The aim of the present study was to prospectively assess the accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of EGC, according to the accepted/extended indications.We prospectively included a total of 181 lesions in 178 patients, with an endoscopic diagnosis of EGC, who underwent EUS for staging the depth of tumor invasion using a 20-MHz catheter probe. We investigated the accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of endoscopically-suspected EGC and then analyzed the difference in the accuracy of EUS according to the accepted/extended indications.Of the 178 patients, five patients were dropped because of the absence of final histological results. For the 176 lesions in 173 patients, the accuracy of EUS assessment for the depth of tumor invasion was 80.7% (142 of 176 lesions). The accuracy of EUS for the lesions with accepted indications and with extended indications was 97.6% (40 of 41 lesions) and 83.6% (46 of 57 lesions), respectively (P = 0.040). Of the lesions with extended indications, the accuracy of EUS decreased especially for the lesions with ulceration and those with minute submucosal invasion (79.2% and 42.9%, respectively).The accuracy of EUS for the lesions with the extended indications was lower than that for the lesions with the accepted indications. In particular, lesions with ulceration and minute submucosal invasion should be carefully considered prior to endoscopic treatment by pretreatment EUS staging.Clinical outcomes of endoscopic submucosal dissection for undifferentiated early gastric cancer.Early gastric cancer (EGC) with undifferentiated histology has not been generally accepted as an indication for endoscopic treatment. This study was designed to evaluate the outcomes and clinicopathological factors associated with the complete resection of undifferentiated EGC using endoscopic submucosal dissection (ESD).A retrospective analysis of prospectively collected data was performed on consecutive patients who underwent ESD. Among the 456 EGCs treated using ESD at the Seoul National University Hospital, Seoul, Korea, between April 2005 and June 2008, 60 lesions (13.2%) were diagnosed as undifferentiated gastric cancer (poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma or signet ring cell carcinoma).En bloc resection was performed in all lesions without significant complications. The size discrepancy between the pretreatment endoscopy and the resected specimen was significantly higher in undifferentiated EGCs than differentiated EGCs (p = 0.002). The complete resection rate was significantly lower for undifferentiated EGC (55%) cases than differentiated EGC cases (84.1%; p < 0.001). Independent risk factors for incomplete resection of undifferentiated EGC included tumor size >20 mm, submucosal invasion, and presence of ulceration. During a mean observation time of 16 months, no recurrence developed in any of the patients with undifferentiated EGCs thought to be completely resected by ESD.ESD might be considered an alternative treatment modality in carefully selected cases of undifferentiated EGC.Endoscopic ultrasound can improve the selection for laparoscopy in patients with localized gastric cancer.The majority of newly diagnosed patients with gastric cancer have disease that is not resectable because of local extension or metastatic (M1) disease. Laparoscopy is a recommended staging evaluation to identify occult peritoneal metastatic disease. We determined if endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) could improve the selection of patients for laparoscopy.Gastric cancer patients being screened for a preoperative chemotherapy clinical trial were prospectively examined. Patients underwent standard preoperative assessment. Those without obvious metastatic disease were referred for EUS and laparoscopy. EUS divided patients into risk categories for metastatic disease: low risk (T1-2, N0) and high risk (T3-4, N+, or both). Laparoscopy categories were M1 and M0. The ability of EUS to predict subradiographic peritoneal metastatic disease was evaluated.Ninety-four patients were studied. The majority were EUS high risk (72%). Occult metastatic disease was identified in 19 patients, 18 of whom had high-risk EUS stage. The yields of identifying M1 disease by laparoscopy in EUS high- and low-risk patients were 25% (95% CI, 15% to 37%) and 4% (95% CI, 0.1% to 20%), respectively. The negative predictive value of low-risk EUS for laparoscopy and pathologic M0 was 96% (exact 95% CI, 80% to 100%).This study suggested that laparoscopy can be avoided in patients with EUS early-stage gastric cancer. Patients with more advanced disease are at higher risk of occult peritoneal disease and require laparoscopy. Validation with greater numbers is warranted, but, based on these data, we propose a new staging algorithm allowing EUS low-risk patients to proceed directly to resection.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography in determining the depth of invasion and indication for endoscopic treatment of early gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a useful method for visualizing features of gastric cancer. However, a previously reported classification system tended to result in overstaging. We investigated the usefulness of EUS for evaluation of the depth of gastric cancer invasion and indications for endoscopic treatment.Accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of invasion and incidences of a positive basal margin were assessed in 235 patients who underwent endoscopic treatment or surgery for gastric cancer. The EUS-determined depth of invasion was classified as follows: EUS-M (lesion confined to sonographic layers 1 and 2); EUS-M/SM border (lesion with changes in sonographic layer 3 but no deeper than 1 mm); EUS-SM (lesion with changes in sonographic layer 3 deeper than 1 mm); or EUS-AD (lesion with changes in sonographic layer 4 or 5).Accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of invasion was as follows: EUS-M, 99% were M and SM1 lesions; EUS-M/SM border, 87% were M and SM1 lesions; EUS-SM, 91% were SM2 lesions; EUS-AD, 100% were muscularis propria or deeper lesions. There was no EUS-M or EUS-M/SM border lesion for which endoscopic treatment resulted in a positive basal margin.EUS is useful for accurately determining the depth of invasion of gastric cancer. When there are no endoscopically determined ulcerous changes, endoscopic treatment should be considered for EUS-M and EUS-M/SM border lesions, and EUS-SM lesions should be treated surgically.Diagnostic accuracy of T and N stages with endoscopy, stomach protocol CT, and endoscopic ultrasonography in early gastric cancer.Preoperative accurate diagnosis of the T and N stages in early gastric cancer (EGC) is important in determining the application of various limited treatments. The aim of this study is to analyze the accuracy of T and N staging of EGC with esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), Stomach protocol CT (S-CT), and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), and the factors influencing the accuracy.Four hundred and thirty-four patients preoperatively diagnosed as EGC using EGD or S-CT and undergoing curative gastrectomy at Seoul National University Hospital in 2005 were included. The T and N stage reviewed by experienced personnel were compared with the surgical pathology.The predictive values for EGC of EGD, S-CT, and EUS were 87.4%, 92.2%, and 94.1%, respectively. The predictive values for node negativity of S-CT, and EUS were 90.1% and 92.6%, respectively. The factors leading to underestimation of T stage with EGD were the upper third location, the size greater than 2 cm, and diffuse type of tumor. Those with S-CT were female sex, the upper third location and lesion size greater than 2 cm.Before applying limited treatment for EGC, a surgeon should consider the risk factors of underestimation of T stage with EGD or S-CT.CT and endoscopic ultrasound in comparison to endoluminal MRI: preliminary results in staging gastric carcinoma.To prospectively compare diagnostic parameters of a newly developed endoluminal MRI (endo-MRI) concept with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and hydro-computer tomography (Hydro-CT) in T-staging of gastric carcinoma on one patient collective.28 consecutive patients (11 females, 17 males, age range 46-87 years, median 67 years) referred for surgery due to a gastric malignancy were included. Preoperative staging by EUS was performed in 14 cases and by Hydro-CT in 14 cases within a time frame of 2 weeks. Ex vivo endo-MRI examination of gastric specimens was performed directly after gastrectomy within a time interval of 2-3h. EUS data were acquired from the clinical setting whereas Hydro-CT and endo-MRI data were evaluated in blinded fashion by two experienced radiologists and one surgeon well experienced in EUS on gastric carcinomas.Histopathology resulted in 4 pT1, 17 pT2, 3 pT3 and 2 pT4 carcinomas with 2 gastric lymphomas which were excluded. Overall accuracy for endo-MRI was 75% for T-Staging of the 26 carcinomas. EUS achieved 42.9% accuracy; endo-MRI in this subgroup was accurate in 71.4%. Hydro-CT was correct in 28.6%, accuracy for endo-MRI in this subgroup was 71.4%.The direct comparison of all three modalities on one patient collective shows that endo-MRI is able to achieve adequate staging results in comparison with clinically accepted methods like EUS and Hydro-CT in classifying the extent of tumor invasion into the gastric wall. However the comparison is limited as we compared in vivo routine clinical data with experimental ex vivo data. Future investigations need to show if the potential of endo-MRI can be transferred into a clinical in vivo setting.A new diagnostic method for early gastric cancer: volume measurement by 3-dimensional endoscopic ultrasonography in early gastric cancer and its clinical significance.The objective of the present study was to measure the volume of early gastric cancer using 3-dimensional endoscopic ultrasonography (3D-EUS) and to ascertain the clinical significance of this new diagnostic method.The study comprised 100 patients with early gastric cancer who underwent preoperative 3D-EUS followed by surgical resection. The relationships of lymph node metastasis to 10 clinicopathological factors (gender, age, tumor location, ulcer, depth, macroscopic type, tumor histology, lymphatic invasion and venous invasion) and preoperative tumor volume (log tumor volume) as measured by 3D-EUS were determined.Median tumor volume was 414.75 mm3 (range, 7.8-2,683.8 mm3) and median log tumor volume was 2.617 (range, 1.444-3.429). Univariate analyses showed that three factors (lymphatic invasion, p=0.0001; venous invasion, p=0.0216; log tumor volume, p=0.0121) correlated significantly with lymph node metastasis. Multivariate analysis showed only two factors (lymphatic invasion, p=0.011, regression coefficient=0.104; log tumor volume, p=0.020, regression coefficient=30.414) representing independent predictors for lymph node metastasis.Tumor volume as measured by 3D-EUS represents an independent risk factor for lymph node metastasis in early gastric cancer. This new method can be used as a reliable diagnostic tool for early gastric cancer.Prospective comparison of endosonography, computed tomography, and histopathological stage of junctional oesophagogastric cancer.To assess the strength of agreement between the perceived preoperative stage of Siewert II (oesophagogastric junction) and Siewert III (proximal gastric tumours) as determined by computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), both alone and in combination, with histopathological stage.Forty-four patients with Siewert II (n=18) and III (n=26) adenocarcinomas of the oesophagogastric junction underwent preoperative CT at their local hospitals followed by specialist EUS, and the strengths of the agreement between the radiological stages and the histopathological stages were determined by the weighted Kappa statistic (Kw).Kw for Siewert II T and N stages was 0.491 (p=0.016) and 0.4 (p=0.087) for CT compared with 0.852 (p=0.0001) and 1 (p=0.0001) for EUS. Kw for Siewert III T and N stages was 0.181 (p=0.206) and 0.121 (p=0.376) for CT compared with 0.173 (p=0.195) and 0.263 (p=0.031) for EUS.Siewert II tumour T and N stages were more accurately predicted by EUS than CT, but Siewert III tumour T and N stages were more difficult to assess, arguably because of anatomical constraints at the oesophagogastric junction. CT and EUS are complimentary techniques, and these results highlight the importance of multidisciplinary discussion in planning treatment.Current utilization and performance status of endoscopic ultrasound in a community hospital.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an essential tool for cancer staging and investigating gastrointestinal diseases. Although it is not a widespread skill, as its expanded indications became much more advanced so did its popularity and hospital acceptance. We aimed to study the utilization and indications of upper EUS in a Hong Kong community hospital. The secondary aim was to assess our accuracy in staging of esophageal and gastric cancer and in evaluating submucosal tumors.All patients who had undergone upper EUS in Tuen Mun Hospital from January 2002 to December 2006 were recruited. Their background data, indications, radiological investigations, upper endoscopy and operation records and histopathologic results were retrieved for analysis. The accuracy of EUS in esophageal cancer staging, gastric cancer staging and evaluating submucosal tumors was assessed by comparing surgical and histopathologic findings.A total of 645 upper EUS examinations were performed and there has been a steady increase in EUS utilization in our hospital. The most common indications were evaluating submucosal tumors and staging esophageal and gastric cancer. The accuracy of T and N staging of esophageal cancer was 71.2 and 79.7%, respectively and for gastric cancer was 64.0 and 74.7%, respectively. Endoscopic ultrasound was 70% accurate in identifying lesions arising from the submucosal layer and 100% accurate in identifying lesions from the muscularis propria.Endoscopic ultrasound is an accurate method and its demand is increasing. The performance in a community hospital can be further improved and its utilization should expand to other indications.Clinicopathologic factors influence accurate endosonographic assessment for early gastric cancer.EUS has become a valuable tool for the selection of patients who are suitable for EMR of early gastric cancer (EGC). The aim of this study was to evaluate the various clinicopathologic factors affecting the diagnostic accuracy of EUS in EGC.A retrospective, single-center study.A total of 206 patients suspected of EGC endoscopically who underwent EUS examination and curative treatment for EGC at Severance Hospital, Seoul, Korea, from October 2001 to May 2005 were included.We reviewed the medical records of 206 patients and compared preoperative EUS staging with final histopathologic staging of the resected specimen according to the clinicopathologic parameters.The diagnostic accuracy of EUS for predicting tumor invasion depth was significantly affected by the histopathologic differentiation and the size of tumor. The differentiated cell types were associated with higher diagnostic accuracy in predicting the tumor invasion. Lesions located in the mid one third of the stomach larger than 3 cm had significantly higher probability of overstaging. Poorly differentiated histologic diagnosis had a significantly higher probability of understaging. There was no significant factor associated with the endosonographic prediction of lymph node metastasis.EGC with undifferentiated histopathologic features or large tumor size is more frequently associated with an incorrect diagnosis in tumor invasion depth by EUS. EGC with a size larger than 3 cm and poorly differentiated histologic diagnosis should be cautiously considered in the decision on treatment modality by pretreatment EUS staging.Endoscopic ultrasound predicts outcomes for patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the most accurate locoregional staging tool for gastroesophageal junction (GEJ) adenocarcinoma, and it may allow pretreatment risk stratification. The purpose of this study was to compare preoperative EUS staging with postoperative pathologic staging and to assess the ability of EUS to predict survival after resection for GEJ adenocarcinoma.Patients with GEJ adenocarcinoma, who had preoperative staging with EUS followed by resection, were identified from a prospectively maintained database. Patients receiving neoadjuvant therapy were excluded. EUS stage was compared with pathologic stage. Survival analyses were performed in patients who underwent complete gross resection.From 1985 through 2003, 209 patients underwent preoperative EUS followed by surgery without neoadjuvant therapy for GEJ adenocarcinoma. EUS correlated with pathologic T stage in 128 of 209 (61%) patients and with pathologic nodal stage in 154 of 206 (75%) patients. EUS accurately stratified patients into "early" (T0-2 N0) or "advanced" (T3-4 or N1) disease categories in 173 (83%) patients. Curative (R0) resection was performed in 184 patients: EUS "early" (n=84) and "advanced" (n=122) stages were associated with R0 rates of 100% and 82%, respectively (p=0.001). EUS "early" versus "advanced" stage was highly predictive of outcomes (p < 0.0001). The 5-year disease-specific survival for EUS "early" patients was 65% compared with 34% for EUS "advanced" stage.EUS accurately predicts pathologic stage. In addition, EUS is predictive of outcomes after complete gross resection without neoadjuvant treatment for GEJ adenocarcinoma and identifies a high-risk population that might benefit from preoperative therapy.Clinical stage after preoperative chemoradiation is a better predictor of patient outcome than the baseline stage for localized gastric cancer.For patients with localized gastric cancer (LGC) who are receiving preoperative chemoradiation (CTRT), the postsurgical pathologic stage predicts overall survival (OS) better than the baseline stage. The authors hypothesized that presurgical (postCTRT) stage would also correlate better with patient outcome than the baseline stage.The authors analyzed 74 LGC patients treated with preoperative CTRT receiving similar treatment. Patients were staged with baseline endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and laparoscopy. Patients received induction chemotherapy, then CTRT (45 Gy), and had an attempted surgery. After CTRT, patients had complete preoperative staging including EUS in 35 patients.Thirty-five had all 3 sets of staging, baseline, presurgical, and postsurgical. Baseline stage did not associate with OS (P = .16) nor disease-free survival (DFS; P = .13). However, presurgical stage was associated with OS (P = .01), and DFS (P = .05). OS was also associated with postsurgical stage and was longer for stages 0 and I than for stages III and IV (P = .01 and .04, respectively). Similarly, DFS was longer in postsurgical pathologic stages 0, I, and II than in stage III or IV (P < .001, <.001, and <.01, respectively). Baseline staging did not correlate with the proportion of patients alive at 4 years; however, presurgical staging did. Patients with stage I or II survived longer than those with stage III or IV (81% vs 25%; P < .01).Heterogeneity in clinical biology of LGC is best reflected after CTRT in presurgical and postsurgical pathologic stages rather than by the baseline stage. Correlation of outcome with presurgical staging may facilitate strategies to individualize therapy for LGC.Relationship between preoperative staging by endoscopic ultrasonography and MMP-9 expression in gastric carcinoma.To investigate the relationship between the staging by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and the expression of carcinoma metastasis associated gene in the patients with gastric carcinoma.Sixty-three patients with gastric cancer were diagnosed by electric gastroscopy and EUS. The preoperative staging of gastric cancer was measured by EUS and compared with pathologic staging and MMP-9 expression. Peripheral serum level of MMP-9 was measured with enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), while the expression of MMP-9 protein was tested with immunohistochemistry and hybridization in situ in the gastric carcinoma tissues.The total accuracy of EUS in estimating invasive depth of gastric cancer was 80.95%, while that in estimating lymphatic metastasis was 73.02%. Serum MMP-9 levels were consistent with the expression of MMP-9 protein and MMP-9 mRNA in tissue, a result closely correlated with invasive degree, staging with EUS and lymphatic metastasis in gastric cancer (P<0.05). The total accuracy of estimating invasive depth in gastric cancer was 95.22% using both EUS and MMP-9.The MMP-9 level of preoperative serum presents the reference value for preoperative staging by EUS in the patients with gastric cancer. When serum MMP-9 level in gastric cancer is significantly high, physicians should pay closer attention to the metastasis which reaches the serosa or beyond. Combining EUS and MMP-9 improves the accuracy in deciding the invasion and metastasis in the patients with gastric carcinoma.Clinical correlation of endoscopic ultrasonography with pathologic stage and outcome in patients undergoing curative resection for gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is considered valuable for preoperative staging of gastric cancer and defining patient eligibility for enrollment in neoadjuvant protocols. The aim of this study was to correlate EUS staging with pathologic evaluation and outcome in patients undergoing curative R0 resection for gastric cancer.All patients who underwent preoperative clinical assessment of T/N stage with EUS and subsequent R0 resection for gastric adenocarcinoma between 1993 and 2003 were identified from a prospective database. Patients who received neoadjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. Clinical staging results from preoperative EUS were compared with postoperative pathologic staging results and correlated with clinical outcome.Two hundred twenty-five patients with gastric cancer underwent EUS followed by R0 resection, without preoperative chemotherapy. The accuracy of the individual EUS T stage was 57% (127 of 223) and was 50% for N stage (110 of 218). Although EUS was less able to predict outcome according to individual T stage, patients with lesions <or=T2 on EUS had a significantly better outcome than patients with lesions >or=T3. Preoperative assessment of risk was not predicted by EUS N stage alone. Patients identified as high risk on EUS and those with a combination of serosal invasion and nodal disease had both the highest concordance with pathology and a significantly worse outcome (P = .02).The concordance between EUS and pathologic results was lower than expected for individual T and N stages. Patients with lesions <or=T2 had a significantly better prognosis than patients with more advanced lesions. Individual EUS N stage has limited value in preoperative risk assessment. Combined assessment of serosal invasion and nodal positivity on EUS identifies 77% of patients at risk for death from gastric cancer after curative resection.Impact of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) on surgical decision-making in upper gastrointestinal tract cancer: an international multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is an integrated part of the pretherapeutic evaluation program for patients with upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract cancer. Whether the clinical impact of EUS differs between surgeons from different countries is unknown. The same applies to the potential clinical influence of EUS misinterpretations. The aim of this study was to evaluate the interobserver agreement on predefined treatment strategies between surgeons from four different countries, with and without EUS, and to evaluate the clinical consequences of EUS misinterpretations.One hundred patients with upper GI tract cancer were randomly selected from all upper GI tract cancer patients treated at Odense University Hospital between 1997 and 2000. Based on patient records and EUS database results, a case story was created with and without the EUS result for each patient. Four surgeons were asked to select the relevant treatment strategy in each case, at first without knowledge of the EUS and thereafter with the EUS result available. Interobserver agreement and impact of EUS misinterpretations were evaluated using the actual final treatment of each patient as reference.Three of four or all four surgeons agreed on the same treatment strategy for nearly 60% of the patients with and without the EUS results. Treatment decisions were changed in 34% based on the EUS results, and the majority of these changes were toward nonsurgical and palliative treatments (85%). Interobserver agreement was relatively low, but overall EUS increased kappa values from 0.16 ("poor") to 0.33 ("fair"), thus indicating increased overall agreement after the EUS results were available. EUS conclusion regarding stage or resectability was wrong in 17% of the cases, but only one serious event would have been the clinical result of EUS misinterpretations.Despite being used in different ways by different surgeons, EUS did change patient management in one third of the cases. The impact of EUS misinterpretations seemed very low, and this study confirmed one of the strongest clinical possibilities of EUS, i.e., the ability to detect nonresectable cases. EUS is an important imaging modality for oncosurgeons from different countries.Ulcerous change decreases the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography diagnosis for the invasive depth of early gastric cancer.With the development of endoscopic submucosal dissection, an expansion of the criteria for local treatment was suggested for lesions with ulcerous changes or undifferentiated-type adenocarcinoma.To determine the efficacy of endoscopic ultrasonography for such lesions, we retrospectively analyzed factors that influenced accurate diagnosis by endoscopic ultrasonography of the depth of tumor invasion.We investigated 267 gastric adenocarcinomas for which histopathological results were obtained by endoscopic mucosal resection or gastrectomy. The lesions were divided into four groups by histological type and the presence of ulcerous changes. Five clinicopathological factors were assessed for their possible associations with incorrect diagnosis.The positive predictive value (PPV) for cancer limited within the mucosa (endoscopic ultrasonography, EUS-M) and cancer invaded into the submucosal layer (EUS-SM) were 88.0% (125 of 142 lesions) and 60.0% (30 of 50 lesions), respectively. The lesions diagnosed as EUS-M/SM borderline (37 lesions) included 19 lesions (51.4%) of M cancer and 17 lesions (45.9%) of SM cancer. In logistic analysis, ulcerous changes (p < 0.0001) and macroscopic classification (p = 0.0284) were factors that caused incorrect diagnosis by endoscopic ultrasonography. In the group having differentiated-type adenocarcinoma with ulcerous changes, the PPV of EUS-SM was 25% (3 of 12), and there was a significant difference (p < 0.05) between the EUS-SM of this group and that of the differentiated-type adenocarcinoma without ulcerous changes.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography tumor staging was not sufficient for the lesions with ulcerous changes in our study. Therefore, we should be careful to perform endoscopic submucosal dissection for lesions with ulcerous changes.The multidisciplinary team meeting improves staging accuracy and treatment selection for gastro-esophageal cancer.The object of this article is to assess current staging accuracies for individual modalities and to investigate the influence of the multidisciplinary team (MDT) on clinical staging accuracies and treatment selection for patients with gastro-esophageal cancer. Patients newly diagnosed with gastric or esophageal cancer and who were deemed suitable for surgical resection by the MDT were studied. Patients were staged with a combination of computerized tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Additionally, the MDT determined an overall clinical stage for each patient after discussion at the MDT meeting. Treatments were selected according to this final clinical stage. Final histopathological staging (pTNM) was available for all patients and was used as the gold standard for determining staging accuracy. Suitability of treatment selection was assessed once final pTNM was available. One hundred and eighteen patients were studied. Endoscopic ultrasound was the most accurate individual staging modality for the loco-regional assessment of esophageal tumors (T stage accuracy 78%, N stage accuracy 70%). Laparoscopic ultrasound was the most accurate modality in T staging of gastric cancers (91%). The MDT stage was more accurate than each individual staging modality for T and N staging for both gastric and esophageal cancers (accuracy range: 88-89%) and was better for the assessment of nodal disease than each individual modality (CT P < 0.001, EUS P < 0.01, LUS P < 0.01). Overall staging accuracy as determined at the MDT meeting was increased and resulted in only 2/118 (2%) patients being under-treated. The MDT significantly improves staging accuracy for gastro-esophageal cancer and ensures that correct management decisions are made for the highest number of individual patients.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound staging of gastric cancer in routine clinical practice in Singapore.Endoscopic ultrasound has emerged as the leading modality to assess the T and N stage in gastric cancer. This study aimed to assess the accuracy of TN staging by endoscopic ultrasound in routine clinical practice in Singapore.Over a period of 7 years, 77 patients (male: 70%; median age 62.8 years) with gastric cancer underwent preoperative staging with endoscopic ultrasound. Fifty-seven patients eventually underwent surgery with tissues available for histopathological staging and comparison.The tumor locations were: cardia: 13; corpus: 20; incisura: 19; antrum: 25. The majority was poorly differentiated (57.1%); 26% were moderately differentiated and 16.9% were well differentiated adenocarcinoma. Compared to pathological staging, the overall accuracy of T staging by endoscopic ultrasound was 77.2% (17.5% under-staged: 5.3% over-staged). The staging accuracy of T1 (92.9%) and T3 (81.8%) was higher than T2 (57.1%) and T4. For N staging, the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound was 59.6% (26.3% under-staged; 14% over-staged); this was significantly superior to computer tomography (43.9%).Endoscopic ultrasound is useful for the T staging of gastric cancer, with an overall accuracy rate of 77%, and up to 93% for T1 lesions. Under-staging may occur due to microscopic tumor infiltration, while over-staging may arise due to inflammatory reactions. The accuracy of N staging is lower at 60%, but could be further improved with the use of fine needle aspiration.MRI and endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer.to determine the diagnostic precision of endoscopic ultrasounds (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the preoperative staging of gastric cancer.a prospective, blind study was carried out in 17 patients diagnosed with gastric cancer (GC) using endoscopic biopsy from November 2002 to June 2003. Patients underwent preoperative MRI and EUS. The reference test used was pathology, and laparotomy for non-resectable cases.MRI (53%) was better than EUS in the assessment of gastric wall infiltration (35%). MRI (50%) was also superior to EUS (42%) for N staging. After pooling stages T1-T2 and T3-T4 together, results improved for both MRI (67 and 87.5%, respectively) and EUS (67 and 62.5%, respectively) (p < 0.05). N staging--lymph node invasion--results were correct in 50% for MRI as compared to EUS (42%). In classifying positive and negative lymph nodes EUS was superior to MRI (73 versus 54%).MRI was the best method in the assessment of gastric wall infiltration. EUS was superior to MRI for T1 staging, and in the assessment of lymph node infiltration.EUS staging of upper GI malignancies: results of a prospective randomized trial.Electronic 270 degrees transverse-array EUS (TA-EUS) provides high-quality cross-sectional images but cannot guide FNA. Linear EUS (L-EUS) provides longitudinal images of malignancies and the ability to guide FNA.We conducted a prospective randomized comparison of TA-EUS and L-EUS for the staging of upper-GI (UGI) malignancies.Forty-three patients underwent L-EUS immediately followed by TA-EUS (N = 27, 63%) or TA-EUS immediately followed by L-EUS (N = 16, 37%).Forty-three subjects (mean age, 64 years; 37 men) with an UGI malignancy (4 stomach and 38 esophageal) were evaluated with both TA-EUS and L-EUS.Abnormal lymph nodes were sampled by FNA for cytology.There was agreement on the T stage by linear and radial techniques in 38 of 43 subjects (88%). Twenty-seven of 43 patients (63%) had abnormal lymph nodes by linear or transverse-array imaging. L-EUS demonstrated 66 abnormal lymph nodes in 27 subjects (average of 2.4 nodes/subject). TA-EUS demonstrated 90 abnormal lymph nodes in 27 subjects (average of 3.3 nodes/subject, P = .009, compared with L-EUS). In 16 of the 27 subjects, an FNA was performed, which was positive in 13 cases (81%) and negative in 3 cases (10%) for malignancy.TA-EUS and L-EUS provide similar results of T staging of UGI malignancies. However, the number of abnormal lymph nodes detected by TA-EUS was more than by L-EUS. These findings suggest that radial or transverse-array EUS imaging should be the primary method for staging of UGI malignancies.Multimodal imaging of esophagus and cardia cancer before and after treatment.Prognosis and treatment of esophagus and cardia cancer (ECC) depend on the precision with which the disease is staged according to the American Joint Committee of Cancer (AJCC) criteria. Imaging modalities normally used in clinical staging are esophagography, esophagoscopy, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), computed tomography (CT) and positron emission tomography- CT fusion (CT-PET). The combination of these methods is crucial in determining not only the right diagnosis but also the stage and follow-up after multimodal treatment. The purpose of our investigation was to define the role of each imaging modality in determining the most appropriate treatment options in patients with ECC.Fifty-six patients with ECC diagnosed by X-ray of the upper digestive tract, endoscopy and biopsy were staged using EUS, chest and abdomen CT scan, and CT-PET. Thirty-four patients in stage II and 18 patients in stage III underwent surgery after neoadjuvant chemotherapy; four patients in stage IV were treated with the positioning of an endoprosthesis after chemoradiotherapy. In the 52 patients who had surgery, follow-up included digestive tract X-ray, endoscopy and CT of the chest and abdomen every 6-8 months for the first 3 years. CT-PET was only performed in patients with a clinical suspicion of recurrence and/or CT findings suspicious of persistent disease (12 cases).In all 56 patients, endoscopy, EUS, CT and CT-PET in combination were crucial in determining the site of disease, locoregional extent and depth of esophageal wall penetration (T), and any involvement of the mediastinal lymph nodes (N1), extrathoracic lymph nodes (M1) or hepatic metastases. In the locoregional staging of ECC before chemotherapy, we were able to differentiate T2-T3 from T4 in 40 patients; T4 disease was found in 12 potentially resectable cases. We were able to distinguish N0 from N1 in 12 patients. In four cases, the presence of small lymph node and/or liver metastases prompted positioning of an endoprosthesis. The specificity of CT in detecting small lymph nodes in the mediastinum was less than 50% while for CT-PET, it was more than 80%; EUS revealed sensitivity higher than 90% but a low specificity in seven cases. Only CT-PET revealed metastatic subdiaphragmatic lymph nodes (diameter <15 mm) in three cases. Presurgical restaging of the 18 patients (stage III) who had chemotherapy was based on endoscopy, EUS, CT of the chest and abdomen and CT-PET (only in suspected cases) and was compatible with surgery. Anastomotic recurrence was diagnosed in 16 patients by endoscopy with associated biopsy; any intramediastinal spread from anastomotic recurrences was evaluated by chest CT, and CT-PET in suspected cases.X-ray of the upper digestive tract and chest and abdomen CT scan are useful in preliminary evaluation of ECC. Endoscopy is particularly indicated for evaluating tumour morphology, taking biopsies for a histological diagnosis and the early diagnosis of anastomotic recurrences. EUS is indicated mainly for evaluating T stage before and after chemotherapy or chemoradiotherapy. CT-PET is extremely useful in identifying small mediastinal metastatic lymph nodes (N1) or extrathoracic lymph nodes (M1) and hepatic metastases (</=1 cm), which may escape multislice CT. PET alone is useful for identifying residual or recurrent tumour in the esophageal wall when an endoprosthesis is in place.Does endoscopic ultrasound staging already allow individual treatment regimens in gastric cancer.The aim of our study was to evaluate the accuracy of preoperative TNM staging with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in gastric cancer patients in comparison with the pathohistological stage of the resected specimen, and to determine the possible implications of EUS for individualized treatment of gastric cancer patients at our institution.The study included 82 patients operated for resectable gastric cancer between January 1(st) 2001 and July 1(st) 2003 at the Maribor Teaching Hospital Department of Abdominal and General Surgery. The EUS stage was assessed preoperatively at the Endoscopical Unit, and the pathohistological stage in the resected specimen was determined postoperatively at the Department of Pathologic Morphology according to recommended standards.Comparison of EUS and pathohistological assessments revealed accuracy of EUS staging for locoregional tumor infiltration (category T) in 68% of patients. The accuracy of EUS staging was 68% for T1, 69% for T2, 69% for T3 and 60% for T4. Lymph nodes (category N) were correctly staged with EUS in 57% of cases. The EUS stage was correct for lymph nodes with no metastases (N-) in 40% of cases, and for lymph nodes with metastases (N+) in 90%. There was no significant difference in accuracy of EUS staging with regard to tumor site (P = 0.768) or tumor size (P = 0.766).According to our results the accuracy of EUS staging matched pathohistological staging with regard to tumor infiltration and lymph node stage in 68% and 57% of cases respectively. Underestimation of the final T2 and T3 stages as T1 stage by EUS presents a problem regarding the consistency of EUS examination at our institution, particularly with respect to individual treatment for early gastric cancer. The present uncertainty in EUS stage reliability makes it necessary to have a strategy of radical resection with D2 lymphadenectomy in patients within EUS stages T1-T3, with additional CT examinations in more advanced EUS stages in order to visualize the circumstances of tumor growth. Nevertheless, EUS provides an opportunity for the surgeon to gain more insight into the loco-regional circumstances of the gastric tumor process. For development of individual modes of treatment based on EUS staging, a more reliable assessment of EUS stage is mandatory.Endoscopic ultrasonography for gastric cancer: does it influence treatment?This study aimed to evaluate the utility and shortcomings of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in tumor node metastasis (TNM) staging of gastric cancer and its influence on treatment.The series included 126 patients (65 men and 44 women) with gastric cancer who underwent EUS from July 1997 to June 2003 at the National University Hospital, Singapore. The final analysis included 109 patients ranging in age from 29 to 97 years (mean, 63.13 years).EUS staging for primary disease: Specimen histology was available for 102 of the 109 patients who underwent surgery. The accuracy was 79% for T1, 73.9% for T2, 85.7% for T3, and 72.7% for T4. The overall accuracy was 80.4%. EUS staging for nodes: The sensitivity of EUS for detecting nodal disease was 74.2% for N0, 78% for N1, 53.8% for N2, and 50% for N3. Overall, the N staging by EUS showed a sensitivity of 82.8%, a specificity of 74.2%, a positive predictive value of 85.4%, a negative predictive value of 70.2%, and an accuracy of 77.7%. Radical gastrectomy was proposed for 95 patients on the basis of the staging with EUS and computed tomography (CT) scan, and 87 patients (91.6%) underwent the surgery. Preoperative staging accurately predicted the operative strategy for 89% of the patients. No significant predictor for accuracy was achieved by performing a logistic regression analysis for the correct staging of T stage using EUS and adjusting for tumor location (middle part/distal third/whole stomach vs proximal/cardioesophageal) (p = 0.873), operator (p = 0.546), and subject's sequence (initial 50 vs last 50 cases) (p = 0.06).Ultrasound is the most accurate and reliable method for the preoperative staging of gastric carcinomas, and it is mandatory if a tailored therapeutic approach is planned according to stage.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative TNM staging of gastric cancer.To evaluate the value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the preoperative TNM staging of gastric cancer.Forty-one patients with gastric cancer (12 early stage and 29 advanced stage) proved by esophagogastroduodenoscopy and biopsies preoperatively evaluated with EUS according to TNM (1997) classification of International Union Contrele Cancer (UICC). Pentax EG-3630U/Hitachi EUB-525 echo endoscope with real-time ultrasound imaging linear scanning transducers (7.5 and 5.0 MHz) and Doppler information was used in the current study. EUS staging procedures for tumor depth of invasion (T stage) were performed according to the widely accepted five-layer structure of the gastric wall. All patients underwent surgery. Diagnostic accuracy of EUS for TNM staging of gastric cancer was determined by comparing preoperative EUS with subsequent postoperative histopathologic findings.The overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS in preoperative determination of cancer depth of invasion was 68.3% (41/28) and 83.3% (12/10), 60% (20/12), 100% (5/5), 25% (4/1) for T1, T2, T3, and T4, respectively. The rates for overstaging and understaging were 24.4% (41/10), and 7.3% (41/3), respectively. EUS tended to overstage T criteria, and main reasons for overstaging were thickening of the gastric wall due to perifocal inflammatory change, and absence of serosal layer in certain areas of the stomach. The diagnostic accuracy of metastatic lymph node involvement or N staging of EUS was 100% (17/17) for N0 and 41.7% (24/10) for N+, respectively, and 66% (41/27) overall. Misdiagnosing of the metastatic lymph nodes was related to the difficulty of distinguishing inflammatory lymph nodes from malignant lymph nodes, which imitate similar echo features. Predominant location and distribution of tumors in the stomach were in the antrum (20 patients), and the lesser curvature (17 patients), respectively. Three cases were found as surgically unresectable (T4 N+), and included as being correctly diagnosed by EUS.EUS is a useful diagnostic method for preoperative staging of gastric cancer for T and N criteria. However, EUS evaluation of malignant lymph nodes is still unsatisfactory.Evaluation of Siewert classification in gastro-esophageal junction adenocarcinoma: What is the role of endoscopic ultrasonography?Preoperative assessment of gastro-esophageal junction (GEJ) adenocarcinoma stage and its location according to Siewert are essential for planning the therapeutic approach. The present study was aimed at analyzing the utility of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in evaluating GEJ adenocarcinoma stage and whether this modality added to EGD improves assessment of Siewert type.The results of 51 patients studied by EGD plus EUS (EGD/EUS group) were compared with the results of 54 patients studied by EGD only (EGD group).A differentiation of pT1 tumors was attempted by measurement of the tumor length using 4 cm as a criterion. This goal was not achieved because of a high rate of advanced tumors less than 4 cm (sensitivity and specificity were 81.3% and 34.2%, respectively). Conversely EUS ability in pT1 assessment was very reliable (92%). The accuracy in defining the Siewert type was 72.5% and 64.8% for EGD/EUS and EGD groups, respectively (P = 0.394). Some difficulties in distinguishing between type II and III tumors were observed in both groups with an extremely low specificity (44%) in classifying type II tumors by EGD group.EUS seems to be essential in differentiating pT1 from advanced tumors. It shows an accuracy in defining the Siewert type of 72.5%, with some difficulties in distinguishing from type II and III tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound for esophageal and gastroesophageal junction cancer: Impact of increased use of primary neoadjuvant therapy on preoperative locoregional staging accuracy.Initial treatment of locally advanced esophageal and gastroesophageal junction (GEJ) malignancies for selected patients at some institutions has recently changed from surgical resection to neoadjuvant therapy. The aim of this study is to evaluate the impact of this change in treatment strategy on both the overall disease profile and locoregional endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) staging accuracy for a cohort of patients managed with primary surgical resection over a 10-year period at our institution. All subjects at our institution who underwent primary esophagectomy from 1993 to 2002 following preoperative EUS for known or suspected esophageal and/or GEJ cancers were identified. Patients with dysplasia alone, prior upper gastrointestinal tract surgery, preoperative neoadjuvant therapy, cancer of the gastric cardia or recurrent malignancy were excluded. EUS findings and staging results were compared to surgical pathology following resection. The impact of the gradually increased use of primary chemoradiation during the second half of the study was assessed. Of the 286 operations performed, 184 subjects were excluded. The remaining 102 underwent primary surgical resection a median of 18 days following EUS staging for adenocarcinoma (88%) or squamous cell carcinoma (12%) of the esophagus (69%) or GEJ (31%). Overall EUS locoregional T and N staging accuracy was 72% and 75% respectively; accuracy for T1, T2, T3 and T4 cancer was 42%, 50%, 88% and 50% respectively. Despite an increased frequency of pathologically confirmed T1 and T2 cancers (P = 0.005) and an insignificant trend toward increased N0 malignancy (P = 0.05) during the second half of the study period, no statistically significant changes in T (P = 0.07) or N (P = 0.82) staging accuracies for EUS or disease characteristics were noted between the first and second half of the study period. Despite both inaccurate radial EUS staging and increased relative use of primary surgery for early cancers, recent increased use of primary neoadjuvant therapy did not change overall disease characteristics and accuracy of locoregional EUS staging of esophageal and GEJ cancers managed with primary surgical resection.Influence of tumor characteristics on the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography in staging cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the most accurate method of assessing the locoregional extent of cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction. The aim of this study was to evaluate the influence of tumor-related factors such as length and location on the accuracy of EUS in staging these tumors.Between January 1997 and September 2002, 280 consecutive patients underwent preoperative EUS for staging cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction. The influence of histopathology, the presence of Barrett's dysplasia or stenosis, and the location and length of the primary tumor on the accuracy of EUS for T, N, and M staging were studied.The overall accuracy rates of EUS for assessing the T, N, and M stages were 73 %, 80 %, and 78 %, respectively. The influence of the tumor's histopathology and the presence of Barrett's dysplasia or stenosis was minimal. The accuracy of EUS was greater in tumors 5 cm or less in size than in tumors larger than 5 cm (82 % vs. 52 % for the T stage, P < 0.05; 88 % vs. 59 % for the N stage, P < 0.05; and 92 % vs. 56 % for the M stage, P < 0.001). The low accuracy of T staging in larger tumors may be due to the exclusion of patients with local unresectability or distant metastases. EUS was also significantly better in esophageal tumors, particularly for identifying celiac trunk metastases (93 % vs. 63 %; P < 0.001).The accuracy of EUS for staging esophageal cancer is lower in tumors larger than 5 cm and in esophagogastric junction tumors than in tumors 5 cm in size or less and in esophageal tumors. These findings should be considered when treatment decisions are being taken.Multi-institutional trial of preoperative chemoradiotherapy in patients with potentially resectable gastric carcinoma.In the West, curative (R0) resection is achieved in approximately 50% of patients with localized gastric carcinoma, and more than 60% die of cancer following an R0 resection. A multi-institutional study of preoperative chemoradiotherapy was done to assess the R0 resection rate, pathologic complete response (pathCR) rate, safety, and survival in patients with resectable gastric carcinoma.Operable patients with localized gastric adenocarcinoma were eligible. Staging also included a laparoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Patients received up to two 28-day cycles of induction chemotherapy of fluorouracil, leucovorin, and cisplatin, followed by 45 Gy of radiation plus concurrent fluorouracil. Patients were then staged and surgery was attempted.Thirty-four patients were registered at three institutions. One ineligible patient was excluded. Most patients had a promixal cancer and EUST3N1 designation. Twenty-eight (85%) of 33 patients underwent surgery. The R0 resection rate was 70% and pathCR rate was 30%. A pathologic partial response (< 10% residual carcinoma in the primary) occurred in eight patients (24%). EUS T plus N and postsurgery T plus N correlation showed significant downstaging (P = <.01). The median survival time for 33 patients was 33.7 months. Patients achieving a pathCR or pathPR had a significantly longer median survival time (63.9 months) than those achieving less than pathPR (12.6 months; P =.03). There were two treatment-related deaths.Our data suggest that the three-step strategy of preoperative induction chemotherapy followed by chemoradiotherapy resulted in substantial pathologic response that resulted in durable survival time. This strategy is worthy of a direct comparison with postoperative adjuvant chemoradiotherapy.Endosonography versus helical computed tomography for locoregional staging of gastric cancer.Endosonography (EUS) has been shown to be more accurate than incremental computed tomography (CT) in the local (T) and regional (N) staging of gastric carcinoma; however, EUS has never been compared with helical CT (HCT). The fifth edition of the TNM classification changed the guidelines for N-staging of gastric carcinoma. The accuracy of imaging methods in this new system remains unknown.Staging accuracy of EUS and HCT were compared prospectively with pathological or intraoperative findings in 88 gastric carcinoma patients. Staging was done according to the fourth and fifth editions of the TNM classification. EUS was done with a radial echo endoscope, and HCT with a scanner with two rows of detectors (two-phase contrast-enhanced scanning of a water-filled stomach).The T-staging accuracy of EUS (63 %, CI 52 - 73 %) was superior to the accuracy of HCT (44 %, CI 34 - 55 %; P = 0.021). N-staging accuracy of both methods was similar when the fourth edition of the TNM classification was used (EUS 47 %, CI 34 - 60 %; HCT 52 %, CI 38 - 65 %). However, HCT was more accurate than EUS when the fifth edition of the classification was applied (EUS 30 %, CI 18 - 43 %, HCT 47 %, CI 34 - 60 %; P = 0.044). The accuracy of detection of lymph node metastases was similar for both methods (EUS 67 %, CI 54 - 78 %; HCT 77 %, CI 64 - 86 %).EUS is more accurate than HCT in the T-staging of gastric carcinoma. Both methods are comparable for N-staging, when this is done according to the older, fourth edition of the TNM classification. If the fifth edition is used, EUS is less accurate than HCT.Impact of miniprobe ultrasonography on planning of minimally invasive surgery for gastric and colonic tumors.The use of minimally invasive procedures for the management of gastrointestinal cancer is increasing. The aim of this study was to investigate the role of high-frequency miniprobe endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) for therapeutic decisions making in patients with gastric or colonic tumors.A total of 137 patients underwent EUS with a 12.5-MHz miniprobe for preoperative staging of tumors of the stomach ( n = 49) or colon ( n = 88). After resection, the surgical path was reviewed to analyze the role of preoperative staging with miniprobes.Miniprobe EUS enabled accurate assessment of the infiltration depth of gastric and colonic tumors. The overall accuracy rates were 88% and 87%, respectively. The lymph node status was predicted correctly in 82% of the patients (sensitivity, 61%, specificity, 94%). Based on the results of miniprobe EUS, patients with gastric cancer were accurately selected to undergo endoscopic mucosal resection, laparoscopic resection, or open surgery in 100%, 91%, and 86% of the cases, respectively. In patients with colonic tumors, the treatment decision analysis showed that the stratification was correct in 90% of the patients.Miniprobe EUS is a reliable method for validating treatment decisions for patients undergoing minimally invasive procedures for gastric and colonic tumors. This method is particularly valuable in the management of colon cancer, because endoscopic and laparoscopic resections can be offered to selected patients as an alternative to open surgery.Preoperative staging of gastric adenocarcinoma: comparison of helical CT and endoscopic US.To compare the performance of helical computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (US) in the preoperative staging of gastric cancer.Fifty-one consecutive patients with a primary malignant gastric tumor (stage T2-T4) were preoperatively evaluated with both helical CT and endoscopic US within 3 days. Each tumor was staged according to the TNM classification system with both modalities. All patients subsequently underwent surgery. Results of CT and endoscopic US were compared with histologic staging of tumor invasion depth and regional lymph node metastasis. For comparison of CT and endoscopic US data, the marginal homogeneity test was used, and a P value of less than.05 was determined to indicate statistical significance.In comparison with histologic results, CT achieved correct T staging in 39 patients (76%) and correct N staging in 35 patients (70%). The corresponding results for endoscopic US achieved correct T staging in 44 patients (86%) and correct N staging in 45 patients (90%). There was no significant difference between T staging (P =.55) and N staging (P >.99). Because of challenging detection of wall layers, correct T staging was difficult for CT and endoscopic US in the differentiation of T2 and T3 lesions.Compared with endoscopic US, helical CT focused on the stomach provides valuable results regarding T and N staging in patients with gastric cancer.Positron emission tomography using 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose for response monitoring in locally advanced gastroesophageal cancer; a comparison of different analytical methods.To determine the ability of 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) to monitor response in locally advanced gastroesophageal cancer (LAGEC). Additionally, optimal FDG-PET methods for response monitoring were selected.Sequential dynamic FDG-PET scans were performed in 13 patients with LAGEC (T2-3N0-1M0-1a) treated with neoadjuvant cisplatin and gemcitabine plus granulocyte macrophage colony stimulating growth factor at a three weekly schedule. The standard FDG-PET method, nonlinear regression (NLR), was compared with computed tomography (CT), endoscopic-ultrasound (EUS), and histopathology as well as with 21 simplified analytical FDG-PET methods.Five out of 12 operated tumors responded histopathologically with less than 10% residual tumorcells (42%). These had a higher decrease in FDG uptake compared with nonresponders (P=0.008). Early (after two cycles) and late (after completed induction therapy) response evaluation showed a specificity of 86% and 100%, respectively, and a sensitivity of 100%. Both FDG-PET and EUS were superior to CT. From 21 methods analyzing FDG uptake, the quantitative Patlak analysis, the simplified kinetic method (SKM), and the semiquantitative standardized uptake value corrected for bodyweight (SUV-BW) seemed to correlate best with NLR.FDG-PET reliably predicted response in LAGEC. FDG-PET measurements using Patlak analysis or the more clinical applicable SKM and SUV-BW were acceptable alternatives to NLR.[Endoscopic ultrasound in routine clinical practice for staging adenocarcinomas of the stomach and distal esophagus].Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an important diagnostic tool for determining the best therapeutic strategy (primary resection, neoadjuvant therapy or palliation only) to offer esophageal or gastric cancer patients.In the present study (1992-2001),we evaluated the accuracy of EUS in adenocarcinomas of the distal esophagus and stomach and compared our results with pathologists findings as the gold standard.Of the 222 patients studied, the precise examination of 11% EUS was not completely possible due to severe tumor stenosis. The accuracy of EUS with respect to T, N+/- and TN+/- amounted to 51%, 65% and 34% in 131 patients with adenocarcinomas of the esophageal gastric junction and to 50%, 66% and 37% in 91 patients with adenocarcinomas located in the fundus, corpus or antrum of the stomach respectively. With respect to T-stage, the overstaging of tumors was more common than understaging, especially in pT2b-carcinomas. The subgroup analysis of the 131 EGJ adenocarcinoma patients showed that the results obtained by EUS were slightly better in type I (distal esophageal cancer) than in type II and III cardia carcinomas (proximal gastric cancer).When comparing two observation periods (1992-1996 and 1997-2001), the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound staging was very similar in both periods for T-category (51% vs 49%) and N-category (63% vs 64%) as well as for combined TN-staging (36% vs 35%) respectively.In clinical routine examinations of adenocarcinomas of the stomach and the distal esophagus, the accuracy of EUS is not as good as the excellent results in the past--mostly obtained under study conditions--may suggest.Endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric cancer: determination of tumor invasion depth, nodal involvement and surgical resectability.Current study was aimed to evaluate the usefulness of EUS in TNM staging of gastric cancer by comparing EUS preoperative staging with pathological findings, and the preliminary exploration of possible reasons for overstaging and understaging phenomenon was especially intended.A total of 35 patients with histologically confirmed gastric adenocarcinoma were referred to EUS and staged preoperatively by using the TNM system. The preoperative endosonographic results were compared with the histopathological staging.The overall accuracy of EUS for determination of the T stage was 80.0 %, and for T1, T2, T3, and T4 was 100 %, 71.4 %, 87.5 % and 72.7 %, respectively. For N stage, EUS had the accuracy of 68.6 %, with sensitivity and specificity of 66.7 % and 73.7 %, respectively. Resectability was predicted with sensitivity and specificity of 87.5 % and 100 %, respectively.EUS is an accurate staging modality in most cases, with a few exceptions of overstaging and understaging. Patients with gastric cancers can benefit from preoperative EUS staging for establishing individualized therapy. However, EUS criteria to differentiate benign from malignant nodes still need to be further defined by future studies.Prospective comparison of endoscopy, endosonography and computed tomography for staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia.Local and multimodal therapeutic strategies for tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia, require precise preoperative staging. Endosonography is considered the most accurate staging method, while computed tomography (CT) has limitations especially in the evaluation of local infiltration. Macroscopic endoscopic evaluation was reported to be accurate in selected series, but no study has yet compared all three staging modalities.One hundred and seventeen unselected patients with tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia were prospectively staged first by the endoscopic macroscopic appearance and then by endosonography. All patients had preoperative CT scans, however, only the 36 patients receiving the scans at our institution were included in the study. The preoperative staging results were then compared to postoperative histology which was available as the gold standard in all included patients. Kappa statistics were used to exclude chance agreement of the clinical staging results with the pathohistological findings. Differences between the resulting kappa values for the different staging modalities were analysed with a jack-knife test.Endoscopic macroscopic staging and endosonography (accuracy 67 and 69%, weighted kappa 0.78 and 0.84) were significantly more accurate than CT (accuracy 33%, weighted kappa 0.44) for determination of the T category (p = 0.006 and p = 0.001). After exclusion of tumours of the cardia (n = 33), the accuracy of macroscopic and endosonographic staging (accuracy 72 and 75%, weighted kappa 0.86 and 0.88) increased and remained more accurate than CT (accuracy 50%, weighted kappa 0.62). The main pitfall in our series in staging the T category was the overestimation of T2 tumours in the cardia as T3 or even as T4 tumours due to the inability to visualise the serosa. The accuracy of predicting lymph node metastasis was 68% for macroscopic endoscopic, 79% for endosonographic, and 67% for CT staging. Only endosonographic staging was significantly different from chance agreement with histology (weighted kappa = 0.56). Endosonographic staging was significantly more accurate than endoscopic macroscopic and CT staging (p = 0.03).Endosonography is the most accurate staging modality for overall preoperative staging of oesophageal and cardial tumours. Endoscopic macroscopic staging allows a reasonably accurate assessment of the T category.Is endoscopic ultrasonography indispensable in assessing the appropriateness of endoscopic resection for gastric cancer?Endoscopic resection is increasingly being used in the treatment of early gastric cancer. The aim of the present study was to investigate the accuracy of pretherapeutic staging techniques for assessing the appropriateness of endoscopic resection.Both endoscopy and endosonography were carried out at our institution in the treatment of 234 early gastric cancers, with histological confirmation of malignancy following surgical resection (137 lesions) or endoscopic resection (97 lesions). The accuracy in detecting intramucosal cancer with each of the diagnostic procedures was assessed.The accuracy rates for detecting intramucosal cancer using endoscopy and endosonography were calculated as 84 % (197 of 234) and 78 % (182 of 234), respectively. The accuracy tended to be lower in lesions located in the upper third of the stomach, in those measuring 2 cm or more in diameter, and in those with an undifferentiated histology with ulcer fibrosis. However, there were no significant differences in the accuracy rates between endoscopy and endosonography. Precise staging was achieved by endoscopy alone in 103 of 109 differentiated adenocarcinomas without ulcer fibrosis, where the lesions measured less than 2 cm in diameter.Endoscopic resection is indicated in intramucosal gastric cancer lesions showing differentiated histology, no ulcer fibrosis and a diameter of less than 2 cm. EUS may additionally be used for further evaluation in these patients.Preoperative staging of gastric cancer by endoscopic ultrasound: the prognostic usefulness of ascites detected by endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the standard modality in local preoperative staging of gastric cancers and is reputedly able to detect ascites. However, the association between ascites detected by EUS and local tumor staging, peritoneal carcinomatosis, or survival after surgery is not well documented.To assess the accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS in the preoperative staging and detection of ascites in gastric cancers. We also try to correlate ascites with histologic staging, tumor differentiation, and survival rate of gastric carcinoma after surgery.The retrospective analysis was made in 57 consecutive patients with histologically confirmed gastric adenocarcinomas that underwent EUS before surgery. The accuracy of EUS was compared with the final surgical-pathologic findings. We estimated the prognostic usefulness by analyzing the clinicopathologic features of gastric adenocarcinomas and following up their survival rates.The overall T staging was 88% accurate by EUS. The accuracy for T staging was as follows: T1, 100%; T2, 33%; T3, 93%; and T4, 100%. About 50% of T2 cases were overstaged. The overall accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of detecting lymph node metastasis by EUS were 79%, 79%, and 80%, respectively. One of the seven T1 cancers had regional lymph node metastasis, and it was missed by EUS, although the T classification was precisely staged based on finding submucosal invasion. A total of 22 patients (39%) had ascites detected by EUS; both the sensitivity and specificity of EUS in demonstrating ascites were 100% in our study. Ascites was significantly correlated with the depth of tumor invasion ( = 0.036), lymph node metastasis ( = 0.008), and poor cellular differentiation ( = 0.007), but it was not significantly correlated with macroscopic peritoneal carcinomatosis. The survival rate after surgical treatment was poor in those with gastric cancers with lymph node metastasis, ascites, or poorly differentiated tumors ( < 0.05). However, multivariate analysis showed that lymph node metastasis was the only significant prognostic predictor ( = 0.004).Endoscopic ultrasound is a valuable diagnostic tool in the local staging of gastric cancers and demonstration of ascites. Although the surgical treatment of gastric cancers with lymph node metastasis, ascites, or poor differentiation had poorer survival rate, only lymph node metastasis was proved to be a significant prognostic predictor in multivariate analysis.You get what you expect? A critical appraisal of imaging methodology in endosonographic cancer staging.After an initial period of excellent results with newly introduced imaging procedures, the accuracy of most imaging methods declines in later publications. This effect may be due to various methodological factors involved in the research. Using the example of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), this study aimed to elucidate one of the factors possibly concerned--namely, the extent to which the examiners are adequately blinded.Well documented videotapes of EUS examinations of 101 patients with resected tumours of the oesophagus (n=32), stomach (n=33), or pancreas (n=36) were evaluated in three different ways: firstly, retrospective analysis under routine clinical conditions; secondly, evaluation of EUS videotapes in a strictly blinded fashion; and thirdly, evaluation of the same videotapes but with additional information from the video endoscopic appearance (oesophageal/gastric cancer) or from computed tomography results (pancreatic cancer). Histopathological T staging was used as the reference method.The accuracy of EUS in T staging was 73% under routine conditions. This value fell significantly to 53% for the blinded evaluation but increased again to 62% for the unblinded evaluation. The sensitivity of staging T1/T2 tumours was 72% (routine EUS), 59% (blinded EUS), and 70% (unblinded EUS). The respective values for advanced tumours were 85%, 74%, and 72%.The accuracy of EUS for T staging in clinical practice appears to be lower than has previously been reported. In addition, blinded analysis produced significantly poorer results, which improved when another test was added. It may be speculated that better results with routine EUS obtained in a clinical setting are due to additional sources of information.A comparison of computerised tomography, laparoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound in the preoperative staging of oesophago-gastric carcinoma.Oesophago-gastric carcinoma is associated with a poor prognosis despite advances in diagnosis and treatment. Accurate preoperative staging of gastro-oesophageal carcinoma is, therefore, essential in order to determine patient selection for potentially curative resection. The aim of this study was to evaluate and compare the role of computerised tomography (CT), laparoscopic ultrasound (LapUS) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the staging of oesophago-gastric carcinoma.Thirty-six patients with histologically proven carcinoma of the oesophagus or stomach who were considered fit for surgical resection were identified from a prospectively collected database. All patients underwent spiral CT, LapUS and EUS as part of their preoperative staging investigations. RESULTS from the staging modalities were compared retrospectively with final histopathology where available and to intraoperative findings where the tumour was irresectable.Locally advanced tumours (T3/T4) were accurately identified by CT in 15/16 (94%) and by EUS in 14/16 (88%). LapUS was unable to detect 11 tumours (of which five were T3/T4) because they were above the diaphragm, but in the locally advanced cases where the tumour could be seen the accuracy was 10/12 (83%). EUS was the best modality for assessing early tumours and locoregional nodal involvement with accuracies of 8/13 (62%) and 21/29 (72%), respectively. EUS accuracies rose to 64, 92 and 83% for T1/T2, T3/T4 and N staging with the exclusion of those patients (n=6) in whom strictures prevented full assessment. LapUS had a specificity of 100%, compared to 90% for CT and was more accurate than CT for assessing distant metastases (accuracy of 26/32 (81%) compared to 23/32 (72%) for CT).Although this study is small it has confirmed that CT, EUS and LapUS act in a complimentary manner to provide the most complete preoperative staging for patients with oesophago-gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the preoperative staging of gastric cancer: accuracy and impact on surgical therapy.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a standard procedure in the preoperative staging of patients with gastric carcinomas. Herein we present our experience with EUS and discuss the results and their implications for surgical therapy.A total of 116 patients with histologically confirmed gastric adenocarcinoma were referred to EUS and classified prospectively by the TNM system. The results of the preoperative endosonographic staging were compared with the definitive histopathological results after the operation.The overall accuracy of EUS for determination of the T stage was 78%. The accuracy for the T1 and T2 stages was 80% and 63%, respectively. With 20% and 30%, there was a relatively high rate of overstaging in these cases. The accuracy for T3 and T4 tumors was 95% and 83%, respectively. The accuracy of EUS for determination of the N stage was 77%, with a sensitivity of 91% and a specificity of 84%. Resectability was predicted correctly with a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 83%.Generally accepted standards for the therapy of advanced gastric carcinomas do not exist. In cases where the therapeutic strategy is surgical exploration, no preoperative staging is necessary. In cases with differentiated treatment strategies, the accuracy of EUS is not sufficient for the selection of patients for endoscopic resection. Its accuracy for submucosal cancer invasion and for the detection of lymph node metastases needs to be further enhanced. If only multimodal therapy is considered, EUS staging seems to be absolutely mandatory. Patients classified preoperatively as T1 to T3 can be operated on primarily with sufficient security. In patients where radical resection of the tumor seems doubtful, we recommend that a diagnostic laparoscopy be performed to confirm the diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasound in the staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastro-oesophageal junction.Modern management of upper gastro-intestinal cancer demands accurate pre-operative staging. In continental Europe and Japan, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is established as the investigation of choice for local staging of these cancers, but British experience with this technique is limited.A retrospective review of the medical records of patients with oesophageal or gastro-oesophageal junction tumours during our first 3.5 years' experience with EUS was undertaken and the findings at EUS correlated with the pathology of the resected specimen.A total of 124 patients (86 males), with a mean age of 64.5 years, underwent EUS: 84 had adenocarcinoma and 26 squamous cell carcinoma. There were 3 failed EUS examinations, 42 patients did not have surgery for a variety of reasons, and 10 patients had pre-operative chemoradiotherapy. In the remaining 69 patients, correlation for T stage showed an accuracy of EUS of 80% and for N staging of 54% overall. Comparison of the initial 2 years with the final 18 months showed no change in the T staging accuracy but an improvement in the N staging accuracy from 50% to 60%.Once initial experience has been gained, EUS is an accurate procedure for T and N staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastro-oesophageal junction. It should be included with other imaging modalities, such as CT scanning, in the pre-operative assessment of these tumours.Video-endoscopic ultrasonography in staging gastric carcinoma.Clinical staging of gastric carcinoma is important in designing the strategy of treatment. Early gastric carcinomas can be treated by minimally invasive therapy, whereas advanced gastric carcinomas should be treated by surgery with or without combined chemotherapy. This study was undertaken to evaluate the accuracy and limitations of video type endoscopic ultrasound in preoperative staging of gastric cancer and assessing lymph node metastasis.Seventy-four patients with gastric carcinoma were preoperatively staged using video-endoscopic ultrasonography, performed by the same gastroenterologist.Sixty-three out of the 74 (85%) patients were correctly staged by endoscopic ultrasonography. The diagnostic accuracy rate was 100% for T1, 74% for T2, 87% for T3, and 86% for T4. Overstaging occurred in 11% due to peritumoral inflammation. Understaging occurred in 4% due to microinvasion of carcinomatous tissue or deeper organ invasion. The diagnosis of lymph node metastasis was confirmed in 72% of cases. Sensitivity and specificity was 74% and 86%, respectively.Endoscopic ultrasonography has a high accuracy rate in staging gastric carcinoma but still has its limitations in evaluating regional lymph node metastasis, despite using a new generation video-endoscopic ultrasonography.Morphometric analysis of regional lymph nodes with and without metastasis from early gastric carcinoma.To the authors' knowledge detailed morphometric changes in lymph nodes with and without metastasis in patients with early gastric carcinoma remain undocumented.Histologic slides of 1847 lymph nodes dissected from 115 consecutive patients who underwent gastrectomy for early gastric carcinoma were examined histologically and measured using computer morphometry with the public domain National Institutes of Health Image program. Quantitative data were analyzed in relation to preoperative and intraoperative clinical assessments and postoperative pathologic diagnosis.Metastasis was found in 11 lymph nodes (0.6%) from 8 patients (7.0%). Metastatic lymph nodes showed a mean maximum dimension of 4.8 mm, a mean area of 14.4 mm(2), and a mean ratio of maximum/minimum dimension of 1.36; the corresponding values for nonmetastatic lymph nodes were 4.7 mm (P = 0.45), 13.2 mm(2) (P = 0. 13), and 1.66 (P = 0.10), respectively. The lymph node with a metastasis was not necessarily the largest of the dissected lymph nodes from each patient, and histologically each lymph node with a metastasis showed pericancerous fibrosis in > 10% of its area. The sensitivities of preoperative computed tomography, abdominal ultrasonography (US), endoscopic US, and intraoperative assessments to diagnose metastasis were 0%, 13%, 0%, and 13%, respectively, and the sensitivities of these modalities to detect lymph nodes > 10 mm in dimension were 18%, 10%, 3%, and 10%, respectively.Digital quantitative analysis is useful and widely applicable to clinicopathologic evaluation. The diagnostic sensitivity of lymph node metastasis in patients with early gastric carcinoma in the current study was very low with preoperative and intraoperative assessments because lymph node metastases were small and showed subtle histologic changes of pericancerous fibrosis.Preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography in patients with gastric cancer.There is a need to assess the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and staging of gastric cancer, especially in the early and very advanced stages of the disease when the therapeutic approach is still controversial.A retrospective study was performed on 79 patients with gastric cancer in order to compare the stage defined by preoperative EUS with that assessed histopathologically. All patients underwent laparotomy for final diagnosis, staging, and eventually treatment. The results of EUS were correlated with the histologic findings of the resected specimens.In the uT1 group, which corresponds to early gastric cancer, the diagnosis was histologically confirmed in 85.7% of the cases. In patients with advanced tumors defined as uT3-uT4, i.e., tumors infiltrating the serosa or neighboring structures, the diagnostic concordance was 91.1%. In contrast, concordance for less advanced lesions confined to the muscular layer was only 31.2%. As regards the lymph nodes, they were defined metastatic in 31 patients and confirmed to be histologically involved in 77.4%. In contrast, when the lymph nodes were assessed as negative at EUS, they proved to be metastatic in more than half the cases.From the data it appears that EUS has proven to be valuable in correctly staging most of the patients. EUS shows not only tumor depth and local spread but also the passage from a pathologic to a normal wall and lymph node metastasis. EUS appears to represent an important advance in the staging and follow-up of patients with gastric cancer. Instruments and techniques will continue to evolve, but the next level of research should be designed to show that the improved staging provided by EUS has clinical utility and can affect patient outcome. It is noteworthy that the highest accuracy of EUS has been shown in those conditions (uT1 and uT3-4) which currently are under consideration for a therapeutic approach that differs from the standard one.Experience of endoscopic ultrasound in staging adenocarcinoma of the cardia.The introduction of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has generally resulted in a more accurate assessment of gastrointestinal regional tumour stage. Knowing the stage and the extent of oesophageal involvement is extremely important as a guide to the choice of surgical approach in cardia cancer. The aim of this study was to evaluate the ability of EUS to accurately predict depth of tumour invasion (T), node involvement (N) and the tumour's invasion length along the oesophagus.Thirty-five patients with adenocarcinoma of the cardia were studied by EUS and the EUS pre-operative findings were compared with the pathology findings.The overall accuracy in T staging was 55.2% (16/29 cases). The sensitivity in evaluating T1, T2 and T3 classes was 80%, 38.5% and 70%, respectively. The sensitivity was excellent in evaluating N0 class (100%) (5 cases), but it fell to 66.7% in N1 cases. EUS correctly determined the extent of oesophagus invasion in 75.9% (22/29) of cases; moreover, it had a very high accuracy in distinguishing between tumours with an oesophageal invasion greater or lower than 2 cm (93.1%) (27/29 cases).EUS proved to be useful in pre-operative staging of cardia adenocarcinoma and, in particular, in the pre-operative identification of the extent of oesophageal invasion.The utility of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopy in the endoscopic mucosal resection of early gastric cancer.To clarify the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and endoscopy in the endoscopic mucosal resection (EMR) of early gastric cancer. Patients/Methods-EMR was performed in 61 patients with early gastric cancer over the past five years. The accuracy of the assessment of the depth of cancerous invasion was studied in 49 patients who had EUS before EMR. Forty eight patients were treated with endoscopy alone; in these patients, EUS and endoscopic findings correlated with the clinical course.Forty six patients showed no changes in the submucosal layer or deeper structures on EUS. Pathologically these included 37 patients with mucosal cancer and nine with submucosal cancer showing very slight submucosal infiltration. Three patients showed diffuse low echo changes in the submucosal layer on EUS; pathologically, these included two with submucosal cancer and one with mucosal cancer with a peptic ulcer scar within the tumour focus. Of 48 patients receiving endoscopic treatment alone, 45 showed no tumour recurrence or evidence of metastases on EUS and endoscopy. Three cases of recurrence were observed. Two of these patients had a surgical gastrectomy, and one was re-treated endoscopically. In the former cases, the surgical results correlated well with assessment by EUS and endoscopy. In addition, the latter patient who was re-treated endoscopically after evaluation with EUS and endoscopy has so far had no recurrence.The combined use of EUS and endoscopy is effective in diagnosing the depth of cancerous invasion in patients undergoing EMR as well as in clarifying changes both within and between anatomic levels during follow up.Gastric carcinoma confined to the muscularis propria: how can we detect, evaluate, and cure intermediate-stage carcinoma of the stomach?The most important surgical strategy for advanced gastric cancer is its detection at the curative stage. The aim of this study was to characterize the curable intermediate-stage gastric carcinomas.Of 1120 consecutive patients who underwent gastric resection for primary gastric cancer from 1979 through 1996, 94 patients were histologically diagnosed as having cancer confined to the muscularis propria (mp cancer), analyzed clinicopathologically, and compared with patients with early and serosal cancers.The operative incidence of mp cancer was around 8% among cases of gastrectomy, and the ratio of mp cancer to advanced cancer began to increase in 1991. Mp cancer was at a statistically intermediate stage, between early and serosal cancers in terms of symptoms, surgical curability (96%), size and histology of the tumor, and the rate of lymph node metastasis (46%). Preoperative assessments of tumor depth were unclear using radiology and endoscopy; however, 35% of 31 cases studied were diagnosed precisely by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Accuracy of lymph node metastasis diagnosis was the same (65%) by preoperative EUS and by surgeon; however, sensitivity of the surgeon's assessment was higher (69% vs 38%) and specificity of EUS was higher (83% vs 39%). The 5-yr survival rate was 85%, which was significantly better than that of serosal cancer and similar to that of early cancer. Patient outcome was not affected by lymph node metastasis or macroscopic type of tumor.Mp cancer should be considered an intermediate-stage cancer. Surgery with level 2 lymph node dissection should provide a cure rate similar to that for early cancer.The utility and limitations of an ultrasonic miniprobe in the staging of gastric cancer.To determine the utility and limitations of an ultrasonic miniprobe (UMP) in the staging of gastric cancer, we evaluated 46 patients who underwent endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) using an UMP and who were histologically determined to have gastric cancers. In every case, UMP findings were compared with histopathological findings after treatment. The total accuracy of UMP relative to the depth of tumor invasion was 71.7% (33/46 cases). Accuracy with respect to T1-m tumor diagnosis was 75.7% (22/29 cases), and for T1-sm, 76.9% (10/13 cases), but accuracy for T2 tumor diagnosis was low, due to ultrasound attenuation. When the analysis was carried out based on the size of tumor, the accuracy for UMP was 50.0% (9/18 cases) for all tumors over 20 mm and 85.7% (24/28 cases) for all tumors smaller than 20 mm. We conclude that UMP is suitable for investigation of tumor extension when the lesion is superficial and/or small gastric cancers which do not cause ultrasonic attenuation, but not when the tumor is large or located in certain sites, although conventional EUS is useful in some of these cases.An early gastric carcinoma treatment strategy based on analysis of lymph node metastasis.Newly developed therapies for early gastric carcinoma attempt to consider patients' quality of life, but the applicability and effectiveness of these treatments remain undetermined.Clinicopathologic data of 612 consecutive patients with early gastric carcinoma, all of whom were treated by D1 and D2 gastrectomy, were analyzed. Patients with and without lymph node metastases were compared in relation to age and gender distributions, surgical procedures, histopathology of the tumors, 5-year prognosis, and in reference to the preoperative and intraoperative assessments.The overall incidence of lymph node metastases was 5.7%. Tumor depth and size were related to lymph node metastases judged by univariate and multivariate analyses. Patients with mucosal tumors showed no relation between metastatic rate and tumor size, whereas those with submucosal tumors showed an increasing metastatic rate with tumor size. In all cases but one, lymph node metastases were confined to lymph node stations defined as Group 1 locations. Preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography showed a 55% diagnostic accuracy in determining tumor depth and a 15% sensitivity in diagnosing lymph node metastases.Patients with early gastric carcinoma may be candidates for endoscopic mucosal resection if their tumor is confined to the mucosa and measures < 1 cm in greatest dimension. Other limited resections including D1 gastrectomy or standard D2 gastrectomy based on tumor depth and size are appropriate. Based on the current study findings, the authors propose a useful algorithm for managing such patients.A blind comparison of the effectiveness of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopy in staging early gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography is expected to be useful for invasion depth staging of early gastric cancer. A prospective blind study of the staging characteristics of endoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography for early gastric cancer was performed.Findings of endoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography using a 20 MHz thin ultrasound probe were independently reviewed and the results of 52 early gastric cancer lesions analysed.The overall accuracy rates in invasion depth staging of early gastric cancer were 63% for endoscopy and 71% for endoscopic ultrasonography. No statistically significant differences were observed in overall accuracy. Endoscopic ultrasonography tended to overstage, and lesions that were classified as mucosal cancer by endoscopic ultrasonography were very likely (95%) to be limited to the mucosa on histological examination. All 16 lesions staged as mucosal cancer independently but coincidentally by both methods were histologically limited to the mucosa.Endoscopic ultrasonography is expected to compensate for the understaging of lesions with submucosal invasion that are endoscopically staged as mucosal cancer.Staging of gastric cancer with endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic mucosal resection.Since it was found that the gastrointestinal wall is visualized as a five-layered structure corresponding to the histological layers of the wall, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has become recognized clinically as the most accurate method for diagnosing and assessing the local staging of gastric cancer. However, some problems have remained, including how to differentiate between cancer invasion and ulcer fibrosis, how to detect microinvasion, and how to recognize malignant lymph nodes. Using the pattern analysis for depressed-type gastric cancer, it is usually possible to distinguish between cancer invasion and ulcer fibrosis, except in cases of microinvasion into ulcer fibrosis or inadequate scanning. However, the sensitivity of EUS for evaluating metastatic lymph nodes is still problematic. Endoscopic mucosal resection (EMR) for early gastric cancer has been widely accepted as a standard treatment in Japan due to its minimal invasiveness. According to our data, the overall rate of radical resection was 68.3% (168 of 246), and 31.7% of the remaining patients additionally received laser treatment, surgery, or heater-probe treatment. There were no deaths owing to gastric cancer. Some lesions in which there was microinvasion of the submucosa were incorrectly diagnosed by EUS. It may be possible to solve this problem using three-dimensional EUS (3D-EUS) in the near future.Endoscopic ultrasonography for preoperative locoregional staging and assessment of resectability in gastric cancer.We performed a prospective study from November 1989 to December 1996 to assess the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the locoregional staging and resectability of patients with gastric carcinoma. One hundred and nineteen patients with gastric cancer who received preoperative assessment by EUS underwent subsequent surgery. The endosonographic tumor-node-metastasis (TNM) classification was used for comparison with the histopathologic findings of the resected specimens. The ability of EUS to accurately predict the T stage (depth of tumor invasion) and N stage (involvement of lymph node) was 70% and 65%, respectively. EUS displayed a tendency to overestimate T stage and underestimate N state. The differentiation of early gastric cancer from advanced gastric cancer showed a concordance rate of 89% and underestimation rate of 8% and underestimation rate of 3%. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the stage T1 to T3, which correspond to D0 resectability (no macroscopic or microscopic tumor remains), was 91%. In conclusion, these results revealed EUS as a valuable tool for evaluating the local staging and resectability of gastric cancer. We suggest that EUS should be introduced in the preoperative assessment of patients with gastric cancer.[How accurate is preoperative staging as a basis for treatment decisions in gastric carcinoma?].The treatment of advanced gastric carcinoma by various neoadjuvant and adjuvant multimodal therapy regimes is under current investigation to improve the poor outcome of these patients. Therefore, pretherapeutic tumor staging according to the TNM classification is essential for the optimal application of various therapeutic modalities. According to recent studies, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the most sensitive technique in measuring tumor infiltration (T-staging). In addition, although less reliable compared to the T-staging, the sensitivity of EUS in assessing lymph node status (N-staging) is superior to computed tomography and conventional ultrasound. Pretherapeutic laparoscopic investigation may give additional important information about tumor stage. This overview describes the significance of various diagnostic techniques that can be applied in tumor staging investigations.Endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopy for staging depth of invasion in early gastric cancer: a pilot study.We compared the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for staging depth of invasion of early gastric cancer with that of conventional endoscopy.We assessed the depth of invasion of 108 lesions (104 patients) using EUS with a thin 20 MHz probe and compared the results with those of conventional endoscopy and of histologic examination of endoscopically or surgically resected specimens.The overall accuracy rates for staging depth of invasion for conventional endoscopy and EUS were 72.2% and 64.8%, respectively. Lesions that were classified as limited to the mucosa on both conventional endoscopy and EUS were very likely (92.2%) to be limited to the mucosa on histologic examination. The rates for understaging and overstaging were 16.7% and 11.1%, respectively, for conventional endoscopy; and 7.4% and 24.1%, respectively, for EUS. The highest rate for understaging based on conventional endoscopy occurred for lesions in the gastric body (including cardia, 23.9%).EUS appears to be useful in combination with conventional endoscopy for staging depth of invasion of early gastric cancer. In particular, the two techniques in tandem may accurately predict that a lesion is limited to the mucosa, and EUS may be useful to overcome the potential for understaging by conventional endoscopy, particularly in the gastric body.Pre-operative TN staging of gastric cancer using a 15 MHz ultrasound miniprobe.The aim of the study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with a new endoscopically guided ultrasound miniprobe, used for pre-operative staging of gastric cancers. 59 cases of gastric cancer were prospectively examined with a 15 MHz ultrasound miniprobe. The results of the ultrasound imaging were compared with the histological findings of the resected specimens. The accuracy of the miniprobe for depth of invasion (T category) was 61% for all tumours, and 72% and 40%, respectively, for T1 and T2 to T4 lesions. If indeterminate cases due to ultrasound attenuation were excluded, the accuracy was improved to 82% for T1 and 57% for T2 to T4 tumours, respectively. The accuracy of the miniprobe for nodal staging (N category) was 69% overall, and 86%, 25% and 14% for stages N0, N1 and N2, respectively. In tumours classified on the basis of endoscopic types, the miniprobe staged early type gastric cancers (T category = 73%, N category = 80%) significantly (p < 0.01) more accurately than advanced ones (T category = 21%, N category = 36%). This study suggests that the miniprobe is indicated for pre-operative TN staging when endoscopy reveals an early gastric cancer.Relationship between histological type and endosonographic detection of regional lymph node metastases in gastric cancer.The aim of the study was to compare the ability of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in detecting lymph node metastases in differentiated and undifferentiated gastric adenocarcinoma. EUS was performed in 149 patients with differentiated or undifferentiated gastric cancer. Histopathological findings were compared with pre-operative EUS findings in a total of 2961 resected lymph nodes. The EUS detection rates of metastasis to individual nodes in relation to node size, the ratio of the metastasized area to the cross-sectional area of the node and to the depth of primary tumour invasion, were also investigated. The accuracy and negative predictive values of EUS for detecting metastatic lymphadenopathy in each patient were significantly higher for differentiated (87%, 94%) than for undifferentiated (71%, 71%) tumours. The detection rate of individual node metastasis was higher for differentiated (31%) than for undifferentiated (21%) tumours. For differentiated lesions, EUS detected more small nodal metastases (< 5 mm in diameter) (p < 0.01) and more nodes involved with a relatively small proportion of the metastasized area to the cross-sectional area of the node (< 1/3 involvement) (p < 0.05). In relatively superficial lesions, such as pT1 and pT2, the pre-operative EUS detection rate of metastatic nodes was higher for differentiated than for undifferentiated tumours. In conclusion, the ability of EUS to detect nodal metastases is related to the histological type of gastric cancer.Endosonography and endosonography-guided biopsy of upper-GI-tract tumors using a curved-array echoendoscope.The purpose of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with a curved-array transducer and to determine the value of endosonography-guided biopsy.EUS was performed in 162 consecutive patients for preoperative staging of gastric or esophageal cancer (n = 122) or for EUS-guided biopsy (n = 40). All patients were examined using a flexible echoendoscope (Pentax FG32-UA) equipped with a 7.5-MHz curved-array transducer. A specially designed fine needle was used for EUS-guided biopsy of submucosal or extrinsic lesions.Surgery was performed in 19 of 48 patients with esophageal cancer and 60 of 74 patients with gastric cancer. The accuracy in the assessment of the infiltration depth of esophageal cancer and in the determination of lymph node involvement was 84% and 88%, respectively. In gastric cancer the tumor infiltration depth was assessed correctly in only 65% of the patients. The identification of early gastric cancer proved to be a major problem. The accuracy in the detection of lymph node involvement was 73%. Obstructing tumors were examined in 17 patients with carcinoma of the esophagus or the gastric cardia. The accuracy of EUS in determining the T-stage and the N-stage of stenotic tumors was 88% and 86%, respectively. Endosonography-guided needle biopsy was successfully performed in all 40 patients. Histologic analysis revealed malignancy in 50% of the patients. Only two biopsy specimens contained nonrepresentative material (accuracy: 95%). No complications were observed related to the procedure.EUS with a curved-array transducer provides high accuracy rates in staging of esophageal carcinoma. Evaluation of gastric cancer with this technique appears to be more difficult than with radial transducers. A major advantage of the linear transducer is the ability to perform EUS-guided biopsies of submucosal or extamural lesions.Preoperative endosonographic staging of cancer of the cardia.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of endosonography (ES) in a prospective series of cancer of the cardia.Thirty-five patients with cancer of the cardia were investigated by ES; 29 underwent surgery. ES staging for the surgery patients was compared with histopathologic findings. Tumors were staged according to the 1987 TNM classification.ES had a diagnostic accuracy of 79% for the T category, 79% for the N category, 89% for the M category, and 72% for prognostic TNM staging.ES is an excellent paraclinical modality for the staging of local-regional spread of cancer of the cardia and a useful complement to computed tomography for evaluation of these tumors.Pre-operative staging of gastro-oesophageal junction carcinoma: comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography.Fifteen patients with carcinoma of the gastro-oesophageal junction were pre-operatively staged with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT). The accuracy of tumour and nodal staging using both modalities was compared to the final histological staging of the resected specimens. In staging depth of tumour growth, EUS was significantly more accurate (87% of lesions correctly staged) than CT (40% correctly staged). In staging nodal involvement, EUS was again significantly more accurate (73% correctly staged) than CT (33%). Two-thirds of the lesions were traversable with the endoscopic probe, but most of the nontraversed lesions were correctly staged on EUS. In this study, CT has performed poorly as a staging modality for carcinoma at the gastro-oesophageal junction. Other studies have shown CT to be less accurate at this location than at other oesophageal sites. The orientation of the gastro-oesophageal junction, lack of surrounding fat planes, proximity of adjacent organs and patient motion contribute to the poor staging performance of CT at this location. In contrast, EUS has been an accurate staging modality at the gastro-oesophageal junction in this study and compares well with other studies evaluating EUS in the more proximal oesophagus. Endoscopic ultrasound is therefore a necessary modality if accurate pre-operative staging of gastro-oesophageal junction carcinoma is to be achieved.Endoscopic ultrasonography for preoperative staging of gastric carcinoma.To assess the accuracy and limitation of endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric cancer, we performed a prospective study on 99 patients.Ninety-nine patients with gastric cancer had preoperative staging with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and CT.The depth of infiltration (T parameter) was correctly defined by EUS in 58/65 patients (89%). The lymph node involvement (N parameter) was correctly classified in 44/65 patients (68%), the sensitivity was 74% and the specificity was 54%. The most frequent cause of understaging T parameter was microscopic tumor invasion, whereas overstaging was due to peri-tumor inflammation.We believe that EUS is a reliable method, superior to all diagnostic tools, in the evaluation of locoregional extension of gastric cancer.Computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraoperative assessment in TN staging of gastric carcinoma.In a prospective study from November 1989 to December 1993, the accuracy of computed tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and intraoperative surgical assessment were compared for the evaluation of the depth of invasion (T category) and involvement of lymph nodes (N category) in patients with gastric carcinoma. Sixty-nine consecutive patients who received preoperative CT and EUS underwent subsequent surgery. CT and EUS results were compared with histopathologic staging of tumor invasion depth and regional lymph node metastasis (pT and pN categories). T categories were staged correctly in 42% of the cases by CT, 71% by EUS and 55% by intraoperative surgical assessment. CT correctly staged 49% of N1 and N2 lymph nodes compared with 65% for EUS and 45% for intraoperative surgical assessment. CT was more accurate for advanced cancer but had a tendency to understage the T and N categories. EUS was more accurate for serosal cancer and displayed a tendency to overstage T categories and understage N categories. Intraoperative surgical assessment overstaged early T stages, understaged the T4 stage and had a tendency to overstage N categories. CT and intraoperative surgical assessment of T and N categories were of limited value in the staging of gastric carcinoma compared to EUS. EUS is a valuable form of assessment to evaluate gastric cancer staging before surgery.Computed tomography or endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric and esophageal tumors.Accurate preoperative staging of tumors of the esophagus and stomach is important in selecting treatment and determining prognosis. To date, no exact preoperative test has been useful in assessing stage of these tumors. Until recently, computed tomographic (CT) scanning has been the most frequently used examination to predict operative findings. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a relatively new modality used by some centers to assess extramural anatomy of tumors in these two locations.We described 28 patients with tumors involving the esophagus and gastroesophageal junction, and the stomach, who underwent both EUS and CT before surgical exploration. We compared these two tests with the final pathologic interpretation and paid particular attention to presence of lymph nodes and wall penetration by primary tumor.For wall penetration by an esophageal-gastroesophageal junction carcinoma, EUS was 85% accurate versus 15% for CT. For absence of nodal spread by these tumors, EUS was 100% accurate versus 67% for CT. In the presence of nodal spread EUS was 60% accurate versus 50% for CT. For wall penetration by a gastric carcinoma, EUS was 71% accurate versus 0% for CT. In the absence of nodal spread EUS and CT were both 100% accurate. In the presence of nodal spread EUS was 50% accurate versus 25% for CT.EUS is more accurate than CT in the preoperative staging of upper gastrointestinal malignancies.Endoscopic ultrasonography for early gastric cancer.Endosonography for preoperative locoregional staging of esophageal and gastric cancer.To assess the accuracy and limitations of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the preoperative staging of esophageal and gastric carcinoma, we performed a prospective controlled study over a five year period. Data from 63 patients with esophageal cancer and 147 patients with gastric cancer who underwent surgery were available for comparison of the endosonographic TNM classification to the histophathological findings of the resected specimens. The overall accuracy of EUS in the assessment of tumor infiltration depth was 85.7% and 78% in esophageal and gastric cancer, respectively. The sensitivity of EUS in the detection of regional lymph node metastases was 90% in esophageal and 87% in gastric carcinoma. The most frequent causes of misdiagnoses by endosonography were microscopic tumor invasion and peritumorous inflammatory changes. The inability to traverse a tumor stenosis restricted the endosonographic evaluation in 31.6 and 14% of the cases with esophageal and gastric cancer, respectively.Role of endoscopic ultrasonography in gastric carcinoma.Two hundred and fifty four consecutive patients with gastric adenocarcinoma who underwent surgery were preoperatively evaluated with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The results were compared with the post-operative histo-pathological staging. EUS was correct in determining the T and N stage in 83% and 66%, respectively. Although EUS was accurate in determining the absence of lymph node metastases (accuracy in stage N0: 93%), it was not reliable in determining stages N1 and N2 (64% and 52%, respectively). Since 88% of all T3 and T4 tumors had lymph node metastases, the concomitant T stage may be an important criterion for assessing the nature of endosonographically visualized lymph nodes. The actual R0-resection rate (78%) was almost identical to the rate predicted preoperatively by EUS (81%). We therefore consider EUS a valuable pretherapeutic procedure in patients with gastric carcinoma.[Electronic sectorial ultrasound endoscopy in benign and malignant tumoral pathology of the stomach. Results in 30 patients].From October 1991 to July 1992, endoscopic ultrasound examination (EUS) was performed preoperatively in 30 patients with gastrointestinal disease with a new forward-view fiber optic gastroscope with a 5 and 7.5 MHz curved-array linear transducer mounted directly behind the lens. Before EUS examination, endoscopy with biopsy had established the diagnosis of gastric disease in 22 cases: 16 adenocarcinoma, 4 lymphoma, 1 carcinoid tumor and 1 gastric metastasis of a chorionic tumor. In the 8 other cases, endoscopic diagnosis with non productive biopsy was gastric ulcer (1 case), submucosal tumor (5 cases), and large fold gastritis (2 cases). EUS established a correct diagnosis in 6 of these 8 cases (2 leiomyoma, 1 lipoma, 1 lymphoma, 2 gastric linitis). Correct preoperative TN staging was accomplished by EUS in 83.3% and correct preoperative staging for N was accomplished by EUS in 90%. This study shows that EUS a curved-array transducer is useful in preoperative TN staging of gastric tumors.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of gastric cancer and lymphoma.There is a need to assess the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and staging of gastric cancer and lymphoma.A prospective study was performed on 86 patients with endoscopic gross appearance suspicious for cancer or lymphoma. Biopsies with endoscopic forceps were always carried out before EUS. All patients underwent laparotomy for final diagnosis, staging, and eventually treatment. The results of EUS were correlated with the histologic findings of the resected specimens, when possible, or with the surgical findings. There were 42 gastric cancers and 44 primary gastric lymphomas.EUS made a correct diagnosis of cancer in 35 of 42 patients, with a sensitivity of 83%. Positive predictability was 87%, specificity was 97%, and negative predictability was 96%. Diagnostic accuracy was 95%. In the evaluation of cancer depth invasion, EUS was correct in 91% of cases. EUS displayed perigastric metastatic lymph nodes in 14 of 25 patients, with a sensitivity of 56%. Positive predictive value was 93%, specificity was 93%, and negative predictive value was 54%. Diagnostic accuracy was 69%. EUS made a correct diagnosis of lymphoma in 39 of 44 patients, with a sensitivity of 89%. Positive predictability was 87%, specificity was 97%, and negative predictability was 97%. Diagnostic accuracy was 95%. In the evaluation of lymphoma depth invasion, EUS was correct in 92% of cases. EUS displayed metastatic perigastric lymph nodes in 8 of 18 patients, with a sensitivity of 44%. Positive predictability was 100%, specificity was 100%, and negative predictability was 72%. Diagnostic accuracy was 77%.From these data it appears that in these diseases EUS has demonstrated specific ultrasonographic features that allow correct diagnosis and staging in the majority of patients. In difficult cases EUS may help to achieve the correct diagnosis. EUS also appear to be a useful tool for staging of gastric cancer and lymphoma. It shows not only tumor depth and local spread but also the passage from a pathologic to a normal wall and lymph node metastasis. With this accurate noninvasive staging procedure, in the near future many patients will no longer undergo exploratory laparotomy for surgical staging. Thanks to EUS, the choice of conservative or surgical treatment can be strongly affected. In case of surgery, EUS can orient the kind of surgical approach. Moreover, the use of EUS for evaluation of therapy during follow-up will probably become of major importance.Regional lymph node metastasis in gastric cancer: evaluation with endoscopic US.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) was performed in 83 patients with gastric cancer to evaluate regional lymph node metastasis. Histopathologic findings were compared with preoperative EUS findings in a total of 1,519 resected lymph nodes. In lymph node staging, the prevalence of metastatic adenopathy was 31.3% (26 of 83 patients); EUS had an accuracy of 83.1% (69 of 83 patients), sensitivity of 53.8% (14 of 26 patients), specificity of 96.5% (55 of 57 patients), positive predictive value of 87.5% (14 of 16 patients), and negative predictive value of 82.1% (55 of 67 patients). The greater the maximum diameter of the node with metastasis, or the larger the ratio of the metastatic area to the cross-sectional area of the node, the higher the detection rate. In tumors classified on the basis of depth of invasion according to the 1987 TNM system, the rate of detection of metastasis in individual nodes was 0% in pT1 tumors (none of five nodes), 20% in pT2 tumors (17 of 85 nodes), 29% in pT3 tumors (20 of 70 nodes), and 10% in pT4 tumors (three of 31 nodes). It is concluded that the most important use of EUS will be in diagnosis of regional lymph node metastasis.Enlarged lymph nodes: malignant or not?Prospective controlled data of lymph node evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound in esophageal, gastric and pancreatic cancer is presented. Lymph node pattern, changes of boundaries and echogenicity were considered. Preoperative findings of endoscopic ultrasound were classified according to TNM staging. Only those cases with subsequent histologic examination of the resected specimen were entered into the study. Sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was 90% for esophageal and 87% for gastric cancer. The specificity was 72% and 88%, respectively. In spite of the overall satisfactory results of EUS in evaluation of lymph nodes, further improvement in detection and differentiation of benign and malignant nodes is required.[Preoperative staging of gastric carcinoma using endosonography (EUS)].Accurate staging of gastric malignancy can only be obtained at surgery and after detailed histological examination of the resection specimen. Endoscopic ultrasonography may provide accurate detection and staging of gastric cancer because of its ability to visualize both the intramural and extramural extent of the lesion and any adjacent lymph node involvement. From february 90 to april 91, 29 patients with a gastric carcinoma were studied endosonographically before surgery. All studies were performed with an Olympus EU-M3. Preoperative TNM classification and a prediction of the resectability of gastric cancer were done in every patient. The results were matched with those obtained with the histology of resected specimens according to the TNM classification 1987. Endoscopic ultrasonography was accurate in assessing the extent and depth of tumor infiltration. The overall accuracy rate was 90.5% (19 out of 21 patients). Overstaging occurred in 9.5% of the cases (2 patients); none understaging occurred. EUS was less accurate in assessment of lymph node metastasis; the overall accuracy rate was 57.1%. Distinction between reactive lymph node and small micrometastatic lymph node involvement could be hard. Local resectability was correctly diagnosed with EUS in each of 23 patients; in two patients an intramural mass with a deep infiltration into the surrounding tissue was correctly diagnosed. In our opinion EUS is an essential diagnostic procedure in the clinical staging of the gastric cancer.Preoperative evaluation of gastric cancer by endoscopic ultrasound.The preoperative use of endoscopic ultrasound was evaluated in 74 patients with confirmed gastric cancer. It was used in diagnosing the depth of invasion in the gastric wall, the infiltration to the adjacent organs, and the involvement of the perigastric lymph nodes. Results were compared with histological findings in resected specimens. Accuracy in staging gastric cancer using the T grade of the 1987 TNM system was 81.1% (60 of 74 patients). Endoscopic ultrasound provided excellent results compared with computed tomography and conventional ultrasound, particularly in evaluating perigastric lymph node metastasis and direct infiltration to the adjacent organs. The success rate in detecting lymph node metastasis was 50% (11 of 22 patients); the accuracy in diagnosing direct infiltration to the adjacent organs was 60% (three of five patients). This technique is useful in diagnosing malignant invasion and lymph node metastasis of gastric carcinomas but requires further refinement for use in diagnosing the disease itself. Its preoperative use is recommended for establishing surgical and other treatment plans, as well as in predicting the prognosis of gastric cancer.Preoperative staging of gastric cancer: comparison of endoscopic US and dynamic CT.Fifty consecutive patients with gastric adenocarcinoma proved by means of biopsy underwent preoperative staging with endoscopic ultrasonography (US). Dynamic computed tomography (CT) of the chest and abdomen was performed before surgery in 33 of the patients. In all 50 patients, the TNM classification of the American Joint Committee on Cancer was used to compare the imaging findings with pathologic findings in specimens resected at surgery. When the depth of tumor penetration was evaluated, the findings at endoscopic US and those at pathologic examination were concordant in 46 of 50 patients (92%), and the findings at dynamic CT and those at pathologic examination, in 14 of 33 patients (42%) (P less than .00042). Evaluation of regional lymph node metastases showed a concordance of 78% with endoscopic US and 48% with dynamic CT (P less than .038). Overall determination of stage with both dynamic CT and endoscopic US showed a concordance of 73%, compared with a concordance of 45% for dynamic CT alone (P less than .028).The use of endoscopic ultrasound in determining the depth of cancer invasion in patients with gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed in 110 patients with gastric cancer to examine the depth of cancer invasion. The normal gastric wall has a five-layer structure on EUS. In 19 lesions, changes on EUS were limited to the first and/or second layers, suggesting that invasion was limited within the mucosa. In 91 lesions, changes were evident in the third or deeper layers. Alterations in the EUS appearance could be divided into two types: type A, with destruction of the layered structure and type B with thickening of the layers. The amount of interstitial tissue in cancer was classified as medullary or intermediate in 90% of type A, and as scirrhous in 82% of type B tumor. The EUS diagnosis of invasion was 95% accurate for stage M cancers, 75% for SM, 64% for PM, 100% for SS, 79% for SE, and 100% for SI lesions. The overall accuracy was 81%. Accompanying fibrosis and metastatic perigastric nodes were the main reasons for overestimating the extent of disease.Analysis of gastric carcinoma growth by endoscopic ultrasonography.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed preoperatively in 82 patients with gastric carcinoma (40 with early and 42 advanced malignancy). Measurements of wall thickness were performed in each case and showed good correlation with histological findings. Wall thickening was found to consist of both tumorous and accompanying ulcerous tissue. Thus, increasing wall thickness, as demonstrated by EUS, may not necessarily mean progressive tumor growth. The EUS features of gastric carcinoma were analyzed and four distinct growth patterns found: predominantly intramural (IM) or intraluminal (IL) growth with preservation (Type 1) or destruction (Type 2) of the submucosal echo-rich layer. All early carcinomas displayed the IL-type growth pattern on EUS (98% IL1-type) and 81% of advanced tumors showed IM-type features. EUS was able to differentiate between early and advanced carcinoma in 98% of cases. The EUS pattern of submucosal destruction (type IM2 or IL2) corresponded to the expanding type tumor according to Ming's histopathological classification. On the other hand, 24 of 26 infiltrative tumors according to Ming were found on EUS to have an intramural growth pattern with preservation of the submucosa (type IM1). It is concluded that EUS is highly sensitive in predicting the tumor growth pattern in gastric carcinoma, providing important additional information to the currently used TNM staging system. Measurements of wall thickness are reliable but differentiation between tumorous growth and peritumorous changes is not possible.Comparison of the efficacy of endoscopic ultrasonography and submucosography in diagnosing the depth of gastric cancer invasion.Diagnosis of the depth of the cancer invasion is necessary to select the indication of endoscopic treatment. We used endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and Submucosography (SMG) to diagnose the depth of cancer invasion and compared their efficacy against 63 lesions in 60 cases of gastric and esophageal cancers. SMG could diagnose the invasion correctly in 97% of m (mucosa) cancers, 88% of sm (submucosa) cancers and 100% of advanced cancers. On the other hand, linear-type EUS could diagnose the cancer invasion correctly in 60% of the m cancers, 83% of the sm cancers and 100% of advanced cancers. The results of the comparison of radial-type EUS and SMG showed similar results. Both EUS and SMG are appropriate for the judgement of endoscopic treatments. However, for the selection of the indication of endoscopic treatment which is applied to relatively small sized lesions in general, SMG appears to be superior to EUS in both resolution power and accuracy in shooting.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of invasive gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonographic (EUS) images of 174 cases of gastric cancer were examined to assess the depth of tumor invasion. Comparison was made between the depth of the changes shown in the multi-layered image produced by ultrasonography and the actual depth of invasion. Cases showing ultrasonographic changes extending deeper than the actual tumor were found to have fibrosis associated with peptic ulceration within the tumor focus. In such cases the echo images chiefly depicted the form and nature of the fibrosis, and the images were so characteristic that they could be classified into patterns. In the other cases the depth of tumor invasion could be almost precisely determined by detecting to which layer the changes shown by EUS extended.[Progress in image diagnosis: endoscopic ultrasonography].Endoscopic ultrasonography of the upper gastrointestinal tract.Endoscopic ultrasonography was used for assessment of the extent of tumour invasion of the upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract, including analysis of submucosal tumour and detection of lymph-node metastasis. The normal oesophageal and gastric wall was depicted as five layers by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The outer layer invaded by cancer was defined as the depth of tumour invasion. In 173 cases of oesophageal cancer, the depth of cancer invasion was diagnosed correctly in 88%. In 146 cases of gastric cancer, it was diagnosed correctly in 79%. In submucosal tumours of the GI tract, the site of tumour in the wall was diagnosed correctly in 99% and the histological type of tumour was predicted. EUS can also be used to detect small lymph nodes. According to the criteria, used in this study, EUS had a sensitivity of 84%, a specificity of 88% and an overall accuracy of 88% for detection of lymph-node metastases.Preoperative assessment of tumor location and station-specific lymph node status in patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction.In esophageal cancer patients preoperative staging will determine the type of surgical procedure and use of neoadjuvant therapy. Tumor location and lymph node status play a pivotal role in this tailored strategy. The aim of the present study was to prospectively evaluate the accuracy of preoperative assessment of tumor location according to the Siewert classification and lymph node status per station with endoscopy/endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT).In 50 esophagectomy patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction (GEJ), tumor location according to Siewert and N-stage per nodal station as determined preoperatively by endoscopy/EUS and CT were compared with the histopathologic findings in the resection specimen.Overall accuracy in predicting tumor location according to the Siewert classification was 70 % for endoscopy/EUS and 72 % for CT. Preoperative data could not be compared with the pathologic assessment in 11 patients (22 %), as large tumors obscured the landmark of the gastric folds. The overall accuracy for predicting the N-stage in 250 lymph node stations was 66 % for EUS and 68 % for CT. The accuracy was good for those stations located high in the thorax, but poor for celiac trunk nodes.Given the frequent discrepancy between the endoscopic and pathologic location of the GEJ and the common problem of advanced tumors obscuring the landmarks used in the assessment of the Siewert classification, its usefulness is limited. The overall accuracy for EUS and CT in predicting the N-stage per station was moderate.Accuracy of linear-array EUS for preoperative staging of gastric cardia cancer.The feasibility of a less invasive operation for early stage cancer of the gastric cardia with a low frequency of lymph node involvement has been previously demonstrated by us. Precise discrimination among mucosal, submucosal, and advanced cancers, as well as accurate evaluation of the proximal tumor margin are prerequisites for such stage-specific treatment. EUS is considered the most reliable staging modality. However, there is no EUS study specifically of cardia cancer.Forty-five patients with gastric cardia cancer who underwent gastrectomy with at least first-tier lymphadenectomy were retrospectively analyzed. The results of preoperative linear-array echoendoscopy (7.5 MHz) with respect to cancer depth, lymph node involvement, and esophageal invasion were compared with postoperative histopathologic findings.Overall diagnostic accuracy for depth of invasion was 71%. Sensitivity for T1, T2, and T3 lesions was 100%, 31% and 75%, respectively. Overstaging of T2 cancers was the main diagnostic error. Mucosal (pT1-m) and submucosal (pT1-sm) cancers were correctly discriminated in 81% of patients. Diagnostic accuracy for lymph node involvement was 80%. EUS had positive and negative predictive values of 90% and 80%, respectively, for esophageal invasion.For gastric cardia cancer, the linear-array echoendoscope yielded satisfactory results with respect to depth of invasion, lymph node involvement, and esophageal invasion evaluation. The information obtained is useful to the performance of stage-specific treatment.Pretreatment staging of endoscopically early gastric cancer with a 15 MHz ultrasound catheter probe.The usefulness of and problems associated with an ultrasound catheter probe in the pretreatment staging of endoscopically early gastric cancer remain unexplored.Endoscopic ultrasonography using a 15 MHz catheter probe of 2.6 mm diameter was performed in a prospective study to determine the pretherapy staging of endoscopically early gastric cancer in 78 patients. The results of the ultrasound images were compared with the histologic findings of the specimens obtained by endoscopic mucosal resection or surgical resection.The accuracy of the catheter probe for depth of invasion of endoscopically early gastric cancers was 67% (52 of 78 patients). The accuracy in determining depth of invasion in relation to endoscopic type was significantly higher for the elevated type (91%) than for the depressed type of early cancer (56%) (p < 0.01). The staging accuracy classified by histologic type was significantly higher for differentiated (86%) than for undifferentiated (18%) cancer (p < 0.01). Staging accuracy decreased as tumor size increased. The accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity for nodal staging were 80%, 17%, and 90%, respectively.A 15 MHz ultrasound catheter probe is most useful for determining depth of invasion when the tumor is histologically differentiated and endoscopically of the small elevated type early gastric cancer, but it is unreliable in the diagnosis of metastatic lymph nodes.Transendoscopic ultrasound of esophageal and gastric cancer using miniaturized ultrasound catheter probes.The aim of this study was to investigate the value of miniaturized ultrasound catheter probes (miniprobes) for preoperative staging of esophageal and gastric cancer.Fifty-one patients with esophageal (n = 21) and gastric cancer (n = 30) underwent endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). All examinations were carried out using mechanical miniprobes (diameter 6F, 12.5 MHz) that were introduced through the instrument channel of the endoscope.EUS with miniprobes was successfully performed in all patients, although stenotic tumors, which could not be traversed with the endoscope, were found in 6 of 21 patients (29%) with esophageal cancer. Miniprobe scanning provided high-resolution images of the gastrointestinal tract. The overall accuracy in the assessment of tumor infiltration depth for esophageal and gastric cancer was 90% and 82%, respectively. However, the value of miniprobe scanning in the assessment of advanced tumors was limited by the imaging depth of the probe (approximately 3 cm). Lymph node involvement was accurately diagnosed in 78% of the patients with esophageal cancer (sensitivity 75%, specificity 80%) and in 80% of the patients with gastric cancer (sensitivity 73%, specificity 89%).EUS with miniprobes can be performed as single-step procedure during diagnostic endoscopy. The 12.5 MHz transducer provides high-resolution imaging and enables accurate staging of tumors with limited infiltration depth.Local staging and assessment of resectability in carcinoma of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum by endoscopic ultrasonography.Eighty-eight patients with carcinoma of the esophagus (N = 44), stomach (N = 41), and duodenum (N = 3) who underwent surgery were pre-operatively examined by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The ability of EUS to accurately predict the T stage and the N stage was 82% and 70% for esophageal carcinoma, 71% and 75% for gastric cancer, and 100% and 66% for duodenal malignancy. In esophageal carcinoma, the accuracy of T staging was only slightly lower in cases with non-traversable tumor stenoses (77%) compared with traversable carcinomas (84%). This was probably due to the fact that all non-traversable tumors were either in stage T3 or T4. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the stages T1 to T3, which correspond to R0 resectability (no macroscopic or microscopic tumor remains), was 92% for adenocarcinoma of the distal esophagus and 85% for gastric cancer. However, in squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus, R0 resection was possible in only 66% of all cases, whereas EUS predicted an 84% R0 resection rate. In adenocarcinoma of the distal esophagus and stomach, EUS prediction of stages T1 to T3 correlated well with the actual rate of R0 resection. These results show that EUS is a reliable diagnostic method for the local staging of upper gastrointestinal cancer. Its impact on treatment and hence on prognosis of patients with these malignancies has yet to be determined.The Japanese experience with endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer.The Japanese experience with endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer is reviewed and compared with Western results. Various graphic classifications for prediction of the depth of transmural penetration characterize the Japanese approach. Differentiation of early gastric cancers from advanced cancers has been emphasized, with the concordance rate of the ultrasonographic interpretation and the pathology exceeding 90%. When pre-operative staging by the TNM system was attempted, results were similar to the reports from the West, with overall concordance rate for tumor depth of greater than 80%. The Japanese system of classification may be useful in differentiating advanced cancers from early gastric cancers with co-existing ulceration and fibrosis. The reliability of endoscopic ultrasonography in the pre-operative staging of gastric cancer in Japan is similar to that in the West.Usefulness of three-dimensional, multidetector row CT (virtual gastroscopy and multiplanar reconstruction) in the evaluation of gastric cancer: a comparison with conventional endoscopy, EUS, and histopathology.The aim of this study was to assess the role of three-dimensional multidetector row CT for detection, precise localization, and staging of gastric cancer by comparison with conventional endoscopy, EUS, and histopathology.Sixty-three patients with gastric cancer (31 early stage, 32 advanced) were evaluated by EGD with biopsies, EUS, and three-dimensional multidetector row CT between January 2003 to August 2003. Three-dimensional multidetector row CT findings were analyzed by a single radiologist blinded to the endoscopic findings. Among 63 patients, the findings were confirmed in 48 at surgery or by EMR. In the remaining cases, the findings were confirmed by EGD and biopsy specimen. The accuracy of three-dimensional multidetector row CT for detection, localization, and staging of gastric cancer was determined, compared with endoscopy, EUS, and histopathology.Among the 63 patients, there were 67 gastric cancers. The overall accuracy of three-dimensional multidetector row CT for detection of gastric lesions was 94% (63/67), with accuracies of 96.7% (30/31) and 100% (32/32) for detection of, respectively, early and advanced stage gastric cancer. The overall accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity for EUS and three-dimensional multidetector row CT in the pre-operative determination of depth of invasion (T stage) were, respectively, 87.5%, 82.4%, and 96%; and 83.3%, 69.1%, and 94.4%. The accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS and three-dimensional multidetector row CT for lymph node staging was, respectively, 79.1%, 57%, and 89.5%; and 75%, 57.4%, and 89.3%.Three-dimensional multidetector row CT, along with virtual gastroscopy is a promising method for pre-operative evaluation of gastric cancer.Usefulness of contrast-enhanced EUS in the diagnosis of upper GI tract diseases.We evaluated the usefulness of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis of upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract diseases.The subjects were 42 patients with upper GI tract diseases: 4 esophageal carcinomas, 30 gastric carcinomas, 5 gastric myogenic tumors, and 3 gastric ulcers. After the lesion was observed by EUS, air-filled albumin (0.22 mL/kg) was intravenously injected at a rate of 1 mL/sec into the right cubital median vein, and observation was continued for 10 minutes.Enhancement of the third and fifth layers was observed in all normal esophageal and gastric walls. No esophageal carcinomas were enhanced. Enhancement was observed in 5 gastric carcinomas that had abundant, enlarged, and winding vascular beds. In all esophageal and the other 25 gastric carcinomas, although the tumors per se were not enhanced, enhancement of the third and fifth layers around the lesions clearly demarcated the tumor boundaries. As a result, accuracy for detection of the depth of gastric carcinoma improved from 76.7% for EUS to 90% for contrast-enhanced EUS. All gastric myogenic tumors were enhanced, and irregularly shaped sonolucent areas within these tumors became clear, but we could not distinguish between leiomyoma and leiomyosarcoma.Contrast-enhanced EUS is a noninvasive, useful diagnostic method for assessment of the depth of invasion of esophageal and gastric carcinomas.Endoscopic ultrasound staging in gastric cancer: Does it help management decisions in the era of neoadjuvant treatment?Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has been shown to be the most accurate test for locoregional staging of upper gastrointestinal tumors; however, recent studies have questioned its accuracy level in daily clinical application. The present retrospective study analyzes the accuracy of EUS in guiding interdisciplinary treatment decisions.123 primarily operated patients (63 % men, mean age 61.4 years) were included; only cases with tumor-free resection margins and without evidence of distant metastases were selected. EUS and histopathological findings were compared. Main outcome parameter was the distinction between tumors to be primarily operated (T1 /2N0) and those to be treated by neoadjuvant or perioperative chemotherapy (T3/4, or any N + ), based on an assumed algorithm for treatment stratification.Overall staging accuracy of EUS was 44.7 % for T and 71.5 % for N status irrespective of tumor location. Overstaging was the main problem (44.9 % for T, 42.9 % for N staging). The overall EUS classification was correct in 79.7 % (accuracy), with a sensitivity 91.9 % and specificity 51.4 %; only 19 out of 37 cases with histopathological T1/2N0 were correctly classified by EUS. Positive and negative predictive values of EUS in diagnosing advanced tumor stage for assignment to neoadjuvant therapy were 81.4 % and 73.1 %, respectively.Whereas EUS has a high sensitivity in the diagnosis of locally advanced gastric cancer, endosonographic overstaging of T2 cancers appears to be a frequent problem. EUS stratification between local (T1 /2N0) and advanced (T3/4 or any N + ) tumors would thus result in incorrect assignment to neoadjuvant treatment in half of cases.Epidemiology, surgical management and early postoperative outcome in a cohort of gastric cancer patients of a tertiary referral center in relation to multi-center quality assurance studies.The aim of the study was to analyze epidemiologic parameters, treatment-related data and prognostic factors in the management of gastric cancer patients of a university surgical center under conditions of routine clinical care before the onset of the era of multimodal therapies. By analyzing our data in relation with multi-center quality assurance trials [German Gastric Cancer Study - GGCS (1992) and East German Gastric Cancer Study - EGGCS (2004)] we aimed at providing an instrument of internal quality control at our institution as well as a base for comparison with future analyses taking into account the implementation of evolving (multimodal) therapies and their influence on treatment results.Retrospective analysis of prospectively gathered data of gastric cancer patients treated at a single institution during a defined 10-year time period with multivariate analysis of risk factors for early postoperative outcome.From 04/01/1993 through 03/31/2003, a total of 328 gastric cancer patients were treated. In comparison with the EGGCS cohort there was a larger proportion of patients with locally advanced and proximally located tumors. 272 patients (82.9%) underwent surgery with curative intent; in 88.4% of these an R0 resection was achieved (EGGCS/GGCS: 82.5%/71.5%). 68.2% of patients underwent preoperative endoluminal ultrasound (EUS) (EGGCS: 27.4%); the proportion of patients undergoing EUS increased over the study period. Diagnostic accuracy of EUS for T stage was 50.6% (EGGCS: 42.6%). 77.2% of operated patients with curative intent underwent gastrectomy (EGGCS/GGCS: 79.8%/71.1%). Anastomotic leaks at the esophagojejunostomy occurred slightly more frequently (8.8%) than in the EGGCS (5.9%) and GGCS (7.2%); however, postoperative morbidity (36.1%) and early postoperative mortality (5.3%) were not increased compared to the multi-center quality assurance study results (EGGCS morbidity, 45%); EGGCS/GGCS mortality, 8%/8.9%). D2 lymphadenectomy was performed in 72.6% of cases (EGGCS: 70.9%). Multivariate analysis revealed splenectomy as an independent risk factor for postoperative morbidity and ASA status 3 or 4 as an independent risk factor for early postoperative mortality. The rate of splenectomies performed during gastric cancer surgery decreased substantially during the study period.Preoperative diagnostics were able to accurately predict resectability in almost 90% of patients which is substantially more than the corresponding results of both the EGGCS and the GGCS. In the future, more wide-spread use of EUS will play an increasing role as stage-dependent differentiation of therapeutic concepts gains acceptance. However, diagnostic accuracy of EUS needs to be improved. Our early postoperative outcome data demonstrate that the quality standard of gastric cancer care established by the EGGCS is being fulfilled at our institution in spite of distinct characteristics placing our patients at higher surgical risk. Besides being a valuable instrument of internal quality control, our study provides a good base for comparison with ongoing analyses on future developments in gastric cancer therapy.Diagnosis of the invasion depth of gastric cancer using MDCT with virtual gastroscopy: comparison with staging with endoscopic ultrasound.The objectives of this study were to retrospectively evaluate the lesion detection rate of gastric cancer using only virtual gastroscopy generated from MDCT images and the accuracy of invasion depth diagnosis (T staging) using virtual gastroscopy together with contrast-enhanced MDCT with multiplanar reconstruction (MPR) images (virtual gastroscopy with MPR), and to compare the diagnostic performance between virtual gastroscopy with MPR images and endoscopic ultrasound.The subjects consisted of 175 patients with a total of 186 endoscopically proven gastric cancer lesions. All patients underwent dynamic MDCT (arterial and venous phase) for preoperative staging and underwent surgery or endoscopic treatment. In 129 patients (135 lesions) who were also examined using endoscopic ultrasound, the T staging accuracy was also compared between the two modalities. Two endoscopists independently evaluated the lesion detection rate on virtual gastroscopy images alone and determined the T stage on virtual gastroscopy with MPR images. The T staging included the ability to differentiate T1a from T1b lesions.The overall lesion detection rate was 67.7% (126/186). The detection rates of T1a, T1b, and T2 or deeper were 37.8% (28/74), 75.0% (39/52), and 98.3% (59/60), respectively, showing statistically significant differences (p < 0.001). The T staging accuracies were 82.2% (111/135) using virtual gastroscopy with MPR images and 83.7% (113/135) using endoscopic ultrasound, showing no statistically significant difference (p = 0.850). The main causes of over- and understaging were an ulcer or ulcer scar and poorly differentiated adenocarcinomas, non-solid type, respectively.Virtual gastroscopy with MPR imaging is a useful modality in the T staging of gastric cancer.Double contrast-enhanced ultrasonography for the preoperative evaluation of gastric cancer: a comparison to endoscopic ultrasonography with respect to histopathology.This study was designed to compare the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with double contrast-enhanced ultrasound (DCUS) in the staging of gastric malignancies. DCUS is a transabdominal ultrasound technique using both intravenous and intraluminal contrast to enhance sonographic visualization.This retrospective study included 162 patients with biopsy-proven gastric cancer who underwent DCUS and EUS preoperatively with the ultrasound results compared with the pathologic findings of the resected specimens.The overall accuracy of DCUS and EUS for tumor (T) staging was 77.2% and 74.7%, respectively. Comparison of ultrasound techniques for T staging revealed that DCUS was superior to EUS only for a tumor depth of T3 (chi-square, P = .025). Lymph nodes were staged correctly with DCUS and EUS in 78.4% and 57.4% of cases, respectively (chi-square, P = .001).DCUS offers a noninvasive approach for the staging of gastric cancer. DCUS was comparable to EUS in tumor depth evaluation but offered an advantage in lymph node detection.Endosonographic tumor staging for treatment decision in resectable gastric cancer.Neoadjuvant preoperative chemotherapy is the standard of care in locally advanced resectable gastric cancer. Therefore, accurate locoregional staging is essential for treatment decision. EUS is believed to be the most performant diagnostic method for locoregional staging. However, it is questionable, if results from centers of excellence can be maintained in clinical routine.We retrospectively analyzed the data of 62 resectable gastric cancers staged by EUS during routine clinical work-up. Preoperative variables (tumor size and site, histological differentiation) were compared with the postoperative pathology.19 locally limited (T1-2, N0), and 43 locally advanced (T3-4, or N+ irrespective of T stage) were analyzed. The sensitivity of EUS for the detection of locally advanced disease was 93%, with a specificity of 78%.Even in daily routine practice, differentiation of locally limited and advanced disease with EUS can be performed with high sensitivity and good specificity. Therefore, EUS is an essential part of the diagnostic procedure in patients with gastric cancer.Usefulness and problems of endoscopic ultrasonography in prediction of the depth of tumor invasion in early gastric cancer.The objectives of this study were to evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in local and regional staging of early gastric cancer, to analyze the factors influencing the accuracy of EUS, and to reveal the usefulness and problems of EUS in pre-treatment staging of gastric cancer. We examined 105 lesions in 104 patients with histologically confirmed gastric cancer and retrospectively evaluated them with EUS. The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS were determined by comparing the pre-treatment EUS with the postoperative histopathological findings. The overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS for the depth of cancer invasion was 86%. The overall sensitivity and specificity were 60% and 96%, respectively. The accuracy significantly declined in lesions located in the upper-third of the stomach (70%). Type 0-I lesions tended to be over-staged (12&), and the upper-third lesions tended to be under-staged (23%). The accuracy significantly declined in differentiated adenocarcinoma with massive submucosal invasion (56.5%). EUS is useful for evaluating the depth of gastric cancer invasion which determines the feasibility of endoscopic treatment. However, it is noteworthy that the diagnostic accuracy of the invasion depth diminished for lesions in the upper third of the stomach.Invasion assessment in gastric carcinoma - imagistic and histopathologic combined study.Imagistic examinations have an essential role in the assessment of gastric cancer both in earlier and advanced stages. Among these, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) especially contributes to the diagnosis by direct visualization of the tumor and to the staging and prognosis assessment through the evaluation of the gastric wall and regional lymph nodes. Computer tomography (CT) examination also has an important role, especially in advanced stages, in the assessment of the prognosis, contributing to TNM staging. The aim of this study is a comparative assessment of tumor invasion degree by these two imagistic methods and the correlation of the imagistic diagnosis with histopathologic assessment results on surgical specimens.The basis of the study was represented by a group of 38 patients with gastric carcinoma investigated both by endoscopic ultrasound and computer tomography from which 15 cases with surgical excision of the tumor followed by microscopic examination were selected. Studied material was represented by: patients' medical charts, registers for ultrasound endoscopy and CT investigation, endoscopic and CT images, surgical excision samples and pathology reports. Tumor fragments were processed by classical histological techniques (fixation and paraffin wax embedding) and staining (HE).Comparing the CT examination with ultrasound endoscopy results showed that CT examination overestimated the invasion grade of the gastric wall (T) but accurately defined the grade of lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M). Comparing the results of ultrasound endoscopic examination with those from histopathological examination showed that the first method underestimated the grade of invasion of the gastric wall (T) while the latter correctly defined the grade of lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M). Comparing CT examination results with histopathological ones showed that CT overestimated both the grade of invasion of the gastric wall (T), lymph node invasion (N) and metastases (M).In the preoperative assessment of the invasion stage of gastric carcinoma (TNM), ultrasound endoscopy is the elective imagistic investigation for predicting the grade of invasion of the gastric wall while CT examination is a more accurate assessment of lymph node extension and metastases, the precise definition of invasion stage being only the result of histopathological examination on surgical specimens.Endoscopic ultrasound and gastric lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is useful in assessing gastric lesions found on endoscopy. EUS can assess the 5 layers of the gastric wall and is the most useful modality for staging tumors of the stomach, including adenocarcinoma and lymphoma. For subepithelial gastric lesions, EUS can assess the echogenicity of a lesion, which layer of the gastric wall is involved, and assess for the presence of blood flow with Doppler ultrasound. These characteristics help to determine the likely etiology of the lesion. Fine needle aspiration may also provide additional information, especially when mucosal biopsies are nondiagnostic.Endoscopic ultrasonography is valuable for identifying early gastric cancers meeting expanded-indication criteria for endoscopic submucosal dissection.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has become a reliable method for predicting the invasion depth of early gastric cancer (EGC). This study evaluated the accuracy of EUS in identifying lesions meeting expanded-indication criteria for endoscopic submucosal dissection (ESD) and analyzed clinicopathologic factors influencing the diagnostic accuracy of EUS in assessing tumor invasion depth.This study investigated 542 EGCs of 515 patients who underwent EUS pretreatment. The pretreatment EUS-determined diagnosis was compared with the final histopathologic evaluation of resected specimens, and the impact of various clinicopathologic parameters on diagnostic accuracy was analyzed.The diagnostic accuracy of EUS in identifying lesions meeting expanded-indication criteria for ESD was 87.8% (259/295) for differentiated adenocarcinoma (D-type) 30 mm in diameter or smaller, 43.5% (10/23) for D-type tumor larger than 30 mm in diameter, and 75% (42/56) for undifferentiated adenocarcinoma (UD-type) 20 mm in diameter or smaller. Using multivariate analysis, the diagnostic accuracy of EUS in predicting tumor invasion depth was determined to be decreased significantly by ulcerous change and large tumor size (diameter, 30 mm).For patients with EGC, D-type lesions 30 mm in diameter or smaller and UD-type lesions 20 mm in diameter or smaller can be diagnosed with high accuracy by EUS, but larger D-type lesions (diameter, >30 mm) should be considered carefully in terms of EUS-based treatment decisions. Findings of ulceration and large tumors are associated with incorrect diagnosis of tumor invasion depth by EUS.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and conventional endoscopy for prediction of depth of tumor invasion in early gastric cancer.This study aimed to compare the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with that of conventional endoscopy for staging depth of invasion (T staging) in early gastric cancer.A total of 955 patients with suspected early gastric cancer were prospectively registered. EUS staging was carried out prospectively by a single endoscopist using either miniprobe or radial EUS depending on the endoscopic appearance of the tumor. Conventional endoscopy staging was performed retrospectively by consensus between two endoscopists who were blinded to the EUS staging. Conventional endoscopy staging was conducted on the basis of endoscopic features such as surface nodularity and fold convergence. Patients underwent either surgical (n = 586) or endoscopic resection (n = 369) with curative intent. The staging accuracy of each test was compared with the pathological staging of the resected specimen.The presence of a T1m tumor was histologically confirmed in 644 cases (67.4 %) and that of a T1sm tumor in 311 cases (32.6 %). The overall accuracy of EUS staging was 67.4 % (644 / 955) and that of conventional endoscopy staging was 73.7 % (704 / 955) ( P < 0.001). The accuracy of miniprobe EUS was significantly higher than that of radial EUS (79.5 % vs. 59.6 %, P < 0.001), but did not differ significantly from that of conventional endoscopy (79.0 %).EUS does not substantially impact on pretreatment T staging of patients with early gastric cancer compared with conventional endoscopy. Therefore, EUS may not be necessary routinely, and conventional endoscopy may be sufficient for determining the optimal therapeutic strategy, especially in relation to endoscopic resection for early gastric cancer.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative gastric cancer staging: diagnostic yield and therapeutic impact.To evaluate the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasonography in loco-regional staging of gastric cancer in our medium and to determine the impact of this technique on later therapeutic management.This is a retrospective study carried out on patients histologically diagnosed with gastric adenocarcinoma who had been referred for endoscopic ultrasonographic examination. The technique results were compared with those obtained from surgical samples and/or from exploratory laparoscopy- laparotomy. We compared the initial therapeutic decision based on conventional diagnostic techniques with the final therapeutic management based on the endoscopic ultrasonography results.Forty-six patients with gastric adenocarcinoma were included in the study (a reference exploration was available in 36 cases). Diagnostic precision was 70% in stage T, while in stages T1, T2, T3 y T4 was 100, 38, 82, and 100%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity to differentiate T1-2 from T3-4 was 94 and 85%, respectively. We could not identify factors associated with obtaining a correct diagnosis in staging T. Diagnostic precision was 72% for stage N (N0: 58%; Nx 88%). The presence of free perigastric fluid was identified in 7 cases; the presence of peritoneal carcinomatosis was later confirmed in 5 of these. The result of endoscopic ultrasonography led to a modification in the subsequent therapeutic management in 13 patients (28%).Endoscopic ultrasonography is a useful technique for loco-regional staging of gastric adenocarcinoma, which may have important implications in the therapeutic management of these patients.Preoperative staging of gastric cancer by endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector-row computed tomography.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) for the locoregional staging of gastric cancer. EUS and computed tomography (CT) are valuable tools for the preoperative evaluation of gastric cancer. With the introduction of new therapeutic options and the recent improvements in CT technology, further evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of EUS and MDCT is needed.In total, 277 patients who underwent EUS and MDCT, followed by gastrectomy or endoscopic resection at Bundang Hospital, Seoul National University, from July 2006 to April 2008, were analyzed. The results from the preoperative EUS and MDCT were compared to the postoperative pathological findings.Among the 277 patients, the overall accuracy of EUS and MDCT for T staging was 74.7% and 76.9%, respectively. Among the 141 patients with visualized primary lesions on MDCT, the overall accuracy of EUS and MDCT for T staging was 61.7% and 63.8%, respectively. The overall accuracy for N staging was 66% and 62.8%, respectively. The performance of EUS and MDCT for large lesions and lesions at the cardia and angle had significantly lower accuracy than that of other groups. For EUS, the early gastric cancer lesions with ulcerative changes had significantly lower accuracy than those without ulcerative changes.For the preoperative assessment of individual T and N staging in patients with gastric cancer, the accuracy of MDCT was close to that of EUS. Both EUS and MDCT are useful complementary modalities for the locoregional staging of gastric cancer.Accuracy of high-frequency catheter-based endoscopic ultrasonography according to the indications for endoscopic treatment of early gastric cancer.The development of endoscopic treatment, such as endoscopic submucosal dissection, extends the indications for endoscopic resection in patients with early gastric cancer (EGC). Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the first-choice imaging modality for determining the depth of invasion of gastric cancer. The aim of the present study was to prospectively assess the accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of EGC, according to the accepted/extended indications.We prospectively included a total of 181 lesions in 178 patients, with an endoscopic diagnosis of EGC, who underwent EUS for staging the depth of tumor invasion using a 20-MHz catheter probe. We investigated the accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of endoscopically-suspected EGC and then analyzed the difference in the accuracy of EUS according to the accepted/extended indications.Of the 178 patients, five patients were dropped because of the absence of final histological results. For the 176 lesions in 173 patients, the accuracy of EUS assessment for the depth of tumor invasion was 80.7% (142 of 176 lesions). The accuracy of EUS for the lesions with accepted indications and with extended indications was 97.6% (40 of 41 lesions) and 83.6% (46 of 57 lesions), respectively (P = 0.040). Of the lesions with extended indications, the accuracy of EUS decreased especially for the lesions with ulceration and those with minute submucosal invasion (79.2% and 42.9%, respectively).The accuracy of EUS for the lesions with the extended indications was lower than that for the lesions with the accepted indications. In particular, lesions with ulceration and minute submucosal invasion should be carefully considered prior to endoscopic treatment by pretreatment EUS staging.Clinical outcomes of endoscopic submucosal dissection for undifferentiated early gastric cancer.Early gastric cancer (EGC) with undifferentiated histology has not been generally accepted as an indication for endoscopic treatment. This study was designed to evaluate the outcomes and clinicopathological factors associated with the complete resection of undifferentiated EGC using endoscopic submucosal dissection (ESD).A retrospective analysis of prospectively collected data was performed on consecutive patients who underwent ESD. Among the 456 EGCs treated using ESD at the Seoul National University Hospital, Seoul, Korea, between April 2005 and June 2008, 60 lesions (13.2%) were diagnosed as undifferentiated gastric cancer (poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma or signet ring cell carcinoma).En bloc resection was performed in all lesions without significant complications. The size discrepancy between the pretreatment endoscopy and the resected specimen was significantly higher in undifferentiated EGCs than differentiated EGCs (p = 0.002). The complete resection rate was significantly lower for undifferentiated EGC (55%) cases than differentiated EGC cases (84.1%; p < 0.001). Independent risk factors for incomplete resection of undifferentiated EGC included tumor size >20 mm, submucosal invasion, and presence of ulceration. During a mean observation time of 16 months, no recurrence developed in any of the patients with undifferentiated EGCs thought to be completely resected by ESD.ESD might be considered an alternative treatment modality in carefully selected cases of undifferentiated EGC.Endoscopic ultrasound can improve the selection for laparoscopy in patients with localized gastric cancer.The majority of newly diagnosed patients with gastric cancer have disease that is not resectable because of local extension or metastatic (M1) disease. Laparoscopy is a recommended staging evaluation to identify occult peritoneal metastatic disease. We determined if endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) could improve the selection of patients for laparoscopy.Gastric cancer patients being screened for a preoperative chemotherapy clinical trial were prospectively examined. Patients underwent standard preoperative assessment. Those without obvious metastatic disease were referred for EUS and laparoscopy. EUS divided patients into risk categories for metastatic disease: low risk (T1-2, N0) and high risk (T3-4, N+, or both). Laparoscopy categories were M1 and M0. The ability of EUS to predict subradiographic peritoneal metastatic disease was evaluated.Ninety-four patients were studied. The majority were EUS high risk (72%). Occult metastatic disease was identified in 19 patients, 18 of whom had high-risk EUS stage. The yields of identifying M1 disease by laparoscopy in EUS high- and low-risk patients were 25% (95% CI, 15% to 37%) and 4% (95% CI, 0.1% to 20%), respectively. The negative predictive value of low-risk EUS for laparoscopy and pathologic M0 was 96% (exact 95% CI, 80% to 100%).This study suggested that laparoscopy can be avoided in patients with EUS early-stage gastric cancer. Patients with more advanced disease are at higher risk of occult peritoneal disease and require laparoscopy. Validation with greater numbers is warranted, but, based on these data, we propose a new staging algorithm allowing EUS low-risk patients to proceed directly to resection.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography in determining the depth of invasion and indication for endoscopic treatment of early gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a useful method for visualizing features of gastric cancer. However, a previously reported classification system tended to result in overstaging. We investigated the usefulness of EUS for evaluation of the depth of gastric cancer invasion and indications for endoscopic treatment.Accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of invasion and incidences of a positive basal margin were assessed in 235 patients who underwent endoscopic treatment or surgery for gastric cancer. The EUS-determined depth of invasion was classified as follows: EUS-M (lesion confined to sonographic layers 1 and 2); EUS-M/SM border (lesion with changes in sonographic layer 3 but no deeper than 1 mm); EUS-SM (lesion with changes in sonographic layer 3 deeper than 1 mm); or EUS-AD (lesion with changes in sonographic layer 4 or 5).Accuracy of EUS for determining the depth of invasion was as follows: EUS-M, 99% were M and SM1 lesions; EUS-M/SM border, 87% were M and SM1 lesions; EUS-SM, 91% were SM2 lesions; EUS-AD, 100% were muscularis propria or deeper lesions. There was no EUS-M or EUS-M/SM border lesion for which endoscopic treatment resulted in a positive basal margin.EUS is useful for accurately determining the depth of invasion of gastric cancer. When there are no endoscopically determined ulcerous changes, endoscopic treatment should be considered for EUS-M and EUS-M/SM border lesions, and EUS-SM lesions should be treated surgically.Diagnostic accuracy of T and N stages with endoscopy, stomach protocol CT, and endoscopic ultrasonography in early gastric cancer.Preoperative accurate diagnosis of the T and N stages in early gastric cancer (EGC) is important in determining the application of various limited treatments. The aim of this study is to analyze the accuracy of T and N staging of EGC with esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), Stomach protocol CT (S-CT), and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), and the factors influencing the accuracy.Four hundred and thirty-four patients preoperatively diagnosed as EGC using EGD or S-CT and undergoing curative gastrectomy at Seoul National University Hospital in 2005 were included. The T and N stage reviewed by experienced personnel were compared with the surgical pathology.The predictive values for EGC of EGD, S-CT, and EUS were 87.4%, 92.2%, and 94.1%, respectively. The predictive values for node negativity of S-CT, and EUS were 90.1% and 92.6%, respectively. The factors leading to underestimation of T stage with EGD were the upper third location, the size greater than 2 cm, and diffuse type of tumor. Those with S-CT were female sex, the upper third location and lesion size greater than 2 cm.Before applying limited treatment for EGC, a surgeon should consider the risk factors of underestimation of T stage with EGD or S-CT.CT and endoscopic ultrasound in comparison to endoluminal MRI: preliminary results in staging gastric carcinoma.To prospectively compare diagnostic parameters of a newly developed endoluminal MRI (endo-MRI) concept with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and hydro-computer tomography (Hydro-CT) in T-staging of gastric carcinoma on one patient collective.28 consecutive patients (11 females, 17 males, age range 46-87 years, median 67 years) referred for surgery due to a gastric malignancy were included. Preoperative staging by EUS was performed in 14 cases and by Hydro-CT in 14 cases within a time frame of 2 weeks. Ex vivo endo-MRI examination of gastric specimens was performed directly after gastrectomy within a time interval of 2-3h. EUS data were acquired from the clinical setting whereas Hydro-CT and endo-MRI data were evaluated in blinded fashion by two experienced radiologists and one surgeon well experienced in EUS on gastric carcinomas.Histopathology resulted in 4 pT1, 17 pT2, 3 pT3 and 2 pT4 carcinomas with 2 gastric lymphomas which were excluded. Overall accuracy for endo-MRI was 75% for T-Staging of the 26 carcinomas. EUS achieved 42.9% accuracy; endo-MRI in this subgroup was accurate in 71.4%. Hydro-CT was correct in 28.6%, accuracy for endo-MRI in this subgroup was 71.4%.The direct comparison of all three modalities on one patient collective shows that endo-MRI is able to achieve adequate staging results in comparison with clinically accepted methods like EUS and Hydro-CT in classifying the extent of tumor invasion into the gastric wall. However the comparison is limited as we compared in vivo routine clinical data with experimental ex vivo data. Future investigations need to show if the potential of endo-MRI can be transferred into a clinical in vivo setting.A new diagnostic method for early gastric cancer: volume measurement by 3-dimensional endoscopic ultrasonography in early gastric cancer and its clinical significance.The objective of the present study was to measure the volume of early gastric cancer using 3-dimensional endoscopic ultrasonography (3D-EUS) and to ascertain the clinical significance of this new diagnostic method.The study comprised 100 patients with early gastric cancer who underwent preoperative 3D-EUS followed by surgical resection. The relationships of lymph node metastasis to 10 clinicopathological factors (gender, age, tumor location, ulcer, depth, macroscopic type, tumor histology, lymphatic invasion and venous invasion) and preoperative tumor volume (log tumor volume) as measured by 3D-EUS were determined.Median tumor volume was 414.75 mm3 (range, 7.8-2,683.8 mm3) and median log tumor volume was 2.617 (range, 1.444-3.429). Univariate analyses showed that three factors (lymphatic invasion, p=0.0001; venous invasion, p=0.0216; log tumor volume, p=0.0121) correlated significantly with lymph node metastasis. Multivariate analysis showed only two factors (lymphatic invasion, p=0.011, regression coefficient=0.104; log tumor volume, p=0.020, regression coefficient=30.414) representing independent predictors for lymph node metastasis.Tumor volume as measured by 3D-EUS represents an independent risk factor for lymph node metastasis in early gastric cancer. This new method can be used as a reliable diagnostic tool for early gastric cancer.Prospective comparison of endosonography, computed tomography, and histopathological stage of junctional oesophagogastric cancer.To assess the strength of agreement between the perceived preoperative stage of Siewert II (oesophagogastric junction) and Siewert III (proximal gastric tumours) as determined by computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), both alone and in combination, with histopathological stage.Forty-four patients with Siewert II (n=18) and III (n=26) adenocarcinomas of the oesophagogastric junction underwent preoperative CT at their local hospitals followed by specialist EUS, and the strengths of the agreement between the radiological stages and the histopathological stages were determined by the weighted Kappa statistic (Kw).Kw for Siewert II T and N stages was 0.491 (p=0.016) and 0.4 (p=0.087) for CT compared with 0.852 (p=0.0001) and 1 (p=0.0001) for EUS. Kw for Siewert III T and N stages was 0.181 (p=0.206) and 0.121 (p=0.376) for CT compared with 0.173 (p=0.195) and 0.263 (p=0.031) for EUS.Siewert II tumour T and N stages were more accurately predicted by EUS than CT, but Siewert III tumour T and N stages were more difficult to assess, arguably because of anatomical constraints at the oesophagogastric junction. CT and EUS are complimentary techniques, and these results highlight the importance of multidisciplinary discussion in planning treatment.Current utilization and performance status of endoscopic ultrasound in a community hospital.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an essential tool for cancer staging and investigating gastrointestinal diseases. Although it is not a widespread skill, as its expanded indications became much more advanced so did its popularity and hospital acceptance. We aimed to study the utilization and indications of upper EUS in a Hong Kong community hospital. The secondary aim was to assess our accuracy in staging of esophageal and gastric cancer and in evaluating submucosal tumors.All patients who had undergone upper EUS in Tuen Mun Hospital from January 2002 to December 2006 were recruited. Their background data, indications, radiological investigations, upper endoscopy and operation records and histopathologic results were retrieved for analysis. The accuracy of EUS in esophageal cancer staging, gastric cancer staging and evaluating submucosal tumors was assessed by comparing surgical and histopathologic findings.A total of 645 upper EUS examinations were performed and there has been a steady increase in EUS utilization in our hospital. The most common indications were evaluating submucosal tumors and staging esophageal and gastric cancer. The accuracy of T and N staging of esophageal cancer was 71.2 and 79.7%, respectively and for gastric cancer was 64.0 and 74.7%, respectively. Endoscopic ultrasound was 70% accurate in identifying lesions arising from the submucosal layer and 100% accurate in identifying lesions from the muscularis propria.Endoscopic ultrasound is an accurate method and its demand is increasing. The performance in a community hospital can be further improved and its utilization should expand to other indications.Clinicopathologic factors influence accurate endosonographic assessment for early gastric cancer.EUS has become a valuable tool for the selection of patients who are suitable for EMR of early gastric cancer (EGC). The aim of this study was to evaluate the various clinicopathologic factors affecting the diagnostic accuracy of EUS in EGC.A retrospective, single-center study.A total of 206 patients suspected of EGC endoscopically who underwent EUS examination and curative treatment for EGC at Severance Hospital, Seoul, Korea, from October 2001 to May 2005 were included.We reviewed the medical records of 206 patients and compared preoperative EUS staging with final histopathologic staging of the resected specimen according to the clinicopathologic parameters.The diagnostic accuracy of EUS for predicting tumor invasion depth was significantly affected by the histopathologic differentiation and the size of tumor. The differentiated cell types were associated with higher diagnostic accuracy in predicting the tumor invasion. Lesions located in the mid one third of the stomach larger than 3 cm had significantly higher probability of overstaging. Poorly differentiated histologic diagnosis had a significantly higher probability of understaging. There was no significant factor associated with the endosonographic prediction of lymph node metastasis.EGC with undifferentiated histopathologic features or large tumor size is more frequently associated with an incorrect diagnosis in tumor invasion depth by EUS. EGC with a size larger than 3 cm and poorly differentiated histologic diagnosis should be cautiously considered in the decision on treatment modality by pretreatment EUS staging.Endoscopic ultrasound predicts outcomes for patients with adenocarcinoma of the gastroesophageal junction.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the most accurate locoregional staging tool for gastroesophageal junction (GEJ) adenocarcinoma, and it may allow pretreatment risk stratification. The purpose of this study was to compare preoperative EUS staging with postoperative pathologic staging and to assess the ability of EUS to predict survival after resection for GEJ adenocarcinoma.Patients with GEJ adenocarcinoma, who had preoperative staging with EUS followed by resection, were identified from a prospectively maintained database. Patients receiving neoadjuvant therapy were excluded. EUS stage was compared with pathologic stage. Survival analyses were performed in patients who underwent complete gross resection.From 1985 through 2003, 209 patients underwent preoperative EUS followed by surgery without neoadjuvant therapy for GEJ adenocarcinoma. EUS correlated with pathologic T stage in 128 of 209 (61%) patients and with pathologic nodal stage in 154 of 206 (75%) patients. EUS accurately stratified patients into "early" (T0-2 N0) or "advanced" (T3-4 or N1) disease categories in 173 (83%) patients. Curative (R0) resection was performed in 184 patients: EUS "early" (n=84) and "advanced" (n=122) stages were associated with R0 rates of 100% and 82%, respectively (p=0.001). EUS "early" versus "advanced" stage was highly predictive of outcomes (p < 0.0001). The 5-year disease-specific survival for EUS "early" patients was 65% compared with 34% for EUS "advanced" stage.EUS accurately predicts pathologic stage. In addition, EUS is predictive of outcomes after complete gross resection without neoadjuvant treatment for GEJ adenocarcinoma and identifies a high-risk population that might benefit from preoperative therapy.Clinical stage after preoperative chemoradiation is a better predictor of patient outcome than the baseline stage for localized gastric cancer.For patients with localized gastric cancer (LGC) who are receiving preoperative chemoradiation (CTRT), the postsurgical pathologic stage predicts overall survival (OS) better than the baseline stage. The authors hypothesized that presurgical (postCTRT) stage would also correlate better with patient outcome than the baseline stage.The authors analyzed 74 LGC patients treated with preoperative CTRT receiving similar treatment. Patients were staged with baseline endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and laparoscopy. Patients received induction chemotherapy, then CTRT (45 Gy), and had an attempted surgery. After CTRT, patients had complete preoperative staging including EUS in 35 patients.Thirty-five had all 3 sets of staging, baseline, presurgical, and postsurgical. Baseline stage did not associate with OS (P = .16) nor disease-free survival (DFS; P = .13). However, presurgical stage was associated with OS (P = .01), and DFS (P = .05). OS was also associated with postsurgical stage and was longer for stages 0 and I than for stages III and IV (P = .01 and .04, respectively). Similarly, DFS was longer in postsurgical pathologic stages 0, I, and II than in stage III or IV (P < .001, <.001, and <.01, respectively). Baseline staging did not correlate with the proportion of patients alive at 4 years; however, presurgical staging did. Patients with stage I or II survived longer than those with stage III or IV (81% vs 25%; P < .01).Heterogeneity in clinical biology of LGC is best reflected after CTRT in presurgical and postsurgical pathologic stages rather than by the baseline stage. Correlation of outcome with presurgical staging may facilitate strategies to individualize therapy for LGC.Relationship between preoperative staging by endoscopic ultrasonography and MMP-9 expression in gastric carcinoma.To investigate the relationship between the staging by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and the expression of carcinoma metastasis associated gene in the patients with gastric carcinoma.Sixty-three patients with gastric cancer were diagnosed by electric gastroscopy and EUS. The preoperative staging of gastric cancer was measured by EUS and compared with pathologic staging and MMP-9 expression. Peripheral serum level of MMP-9 was measured with enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), while the expression of MMP-9 protein was tested with immunohistochemistry and hybridization in situ in the gastric carcinoma tissues.The total accuracy of EUS in estimating invasive depth of gastric cancer was 80.95%, while that in estimating lymphatic metastasis was 73.02%. Serum MMP-9 levels were consistent with the expression of MMP-9 protein and MMP-9 mRNA in tissue, a result closely correlated with invasive degree, staging with EUS and lymphatic metastasis in gastric cancer (P<0.05). The total accuracy of estimating invasive depth in gastric cancer was 95.22% using both EUS and MMP-9.The MMP-9 level of preoperative serum presents the reference value for preoperative staging by EUS in the patients with gastric cancer. When serum MMP-9 level in gastric cancer is significantly high, physicians should pay closer attention to the metastasis which reaches the serosa or beyond. Combining EUS and MMP-9 improves the accuracy in deciding the invasion and metastasis in the patients with gastric carcinoma.Clinical correlation of endoscopic ultrasonography with pathologic stage and outcome in patients undergoing curative resection for gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is considered valuable for preoperative staging of gastric cancer and defining patient eligibility for enrollment in neoadjuvant protocols. The aim of this study was to correlate EUS staging with pathologic evaluation and outcome in patients undergoing curative R0 resection for gastric cancer.All patients who underwent preoperative clinical assessment of T/N stage with EUS and subsequent R0 resection for gastric adenocarcinoma between 1993 and 2003 were identified from a prospective database. Patients who received neoadjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. Clinical staging results from preoperative EUS were compared with postoperative pathologic staging results and correlated with clinical outcome.Two hundred twenty-five patients with gastric cancer underwent EUS followed by R0 resection, without preoperative chemotherapy. The accuracy of the individual EUS T stage was 57% (127 of 223) and was 50% for N stage (110 of 218). Although EUS was less able to predict outcome according to individual T stage, patients with lesions <or=T2 on EUS had a significantly better outcome than patients with lesions >or=T3. Preoperative assessment of risk was not predicted by EUS N stage alone. Patients identified as high risk on EUS and those with a combination of serosal invasion and nodal disease had both the highest concordance with pathology and a significantly worse outcome (P = .02).The concordance between EUS and pathologic results was lower than expected for individual T and N stages. Patients with lesions <or=T2 had a significantly better prognosis than patients with more advanced lesions. Individual EUS N stage has limited value in preoperative risk assessment. Combined assessment of serosal invasion and nodal positivity on EUS identifies 77% of patients at risk for death from gastric cancer after curative resection.Impact of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) on surgical decision-making in upper gastrointestinal tract cancer: an international multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is an integrated part of the pretherapeutic evaluation program for patients with upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract cancer. Whether the clinical impact of EUS differs between surgeons from different countries is unknown. The same applies to the potential clinical influence of EUS misinterpretations. The aim of this study was to evaluate the interobserver agreement on predefined treatment strategies between surgeons from four different countries, with and without EUS, and to evaluate the clinical consequences of EUS misinterpretations.One hundred patients with upper GI tract cancer were randomly selected from all upper GI tract cancer patients treated at Odense University Hospital between 1997 and 2000. Based on patient records and EUS database results, a case story was created with and without the EUS result for each patient. Four surgeons were asked to select the relevant treatment strategy in each case, at first without knowledge of the EUS and thereafter with the EUS result available. Interobserver agreement and impact of EUS misinterpretations were evaluated using the actual final treatment of each patient as reference.Three of four or all four surgeons agreed on the same treatment strategy for nearly 60% of the patients with and without the EUS results. Treatment decisions were changed in 34% based on the EUS results, and the majority of these changes were toward nonsurgical and palliative treatments (85%). Interobserver agreement was relatively low, but overall EUS increased kappa values from 0.16 ("poor") to 0.33 ("fair"), thus indicating increased overall agreement after the EUS results were available. EUS conclusion regarding stage or resectability was wrong in 17% of the cases, but only one serious event would have been the clinical result of EUS misinterpretations.Despite being used in different ways by different surgeons, EUS did change patient management in one third of the cases. The impact of EUS misinterpretations seemed very low, and this study confirmed one of the strongest clinical possibilities of EUS, i.e., the ability to detect nonresectable cases. EUS is an important imaging modality for oncosurgeons from different countries.Ulcerous change decreases the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography diagnosis for the invasive depth of early gastric cancer.With the development of endoscopic submucosal dissection, an expansion of the criteria for local treatment was suggested for lesions with ulcerous changes or undifferentiated-type adenocarcinoma.To determine the efficacy of endoscopic ultrasonography for such lesions, we retrospectively analyzed factors that influenced accurate diagnosis by endoscopic ultrasonography of the depth of tumor invasion.We investigated 267 gastric adenocarcinomas for which histopathological results were obtained by endoscopic mucosal resection or gastrectomy. The lesions were divided into four groups by histological type and the presence of ulcerous changes. Five clinicopathological factors were assessed for their possible associations with incorrect diagnosis.The positive predictive value (PPV) for cancer limited within the mucosa (endoscopic ultrasonography, EUS-M) and cancer invaded into the submucosal layer (EUS-SM) were 88.0% (125 of 142 lesions) and 60.0% (30 of 50 lesions), respectively. The lesions diagnosed as EUS-M/SM borderline (37 lesions) included 19 lesions (51.4%) of M cancer and 17 lesions (45.9%) of SM cancer. In logistic analysis, ulcerous changes (p < 0.0001) and macroscopic classification (p = 0.0284) were factors that caused incorrect diagnosis by endoscopic ultrasonography. In the group having differentiated-type adenocarcinoma with ulcerous changes, the PPV of EUS-SM was 25% (3 of 12), and there was a significant difference (p < 0.05) between the EUS-SM of this group and that of the differentiated-type adenocarcinoma without ulcerous changes.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography tumor staging was not sufficient for the lesions with ulcerous changes in our study. Therefore, we should be careful to perform endoscopic submucosal dissection for lesions with ulcerous changes.The multidisciplinary team meeting improves staging accuracy and treatment selection for gastro-esophageal cancer.The object of this article is to assess current staging accuracies for individual modalities and to investigate the influence of the multidisciplinary team (MDT) on clinical staging accuracies and treatment selection for patients with gastro-esophageal cancer. Patients newly diagnosed with gastric or esophageal cancer and who were deemed suitable for surgical resection by the MDT were studied. Patients were staged with a combination of computerized tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Additionally, the MDT determined an overall clinical stage for each patient after discussion at the MDT meeting. Treatments were selected according to this final clinical stage. Final histopathological staging (pTNM) was available for all patients and was used as the gold standard for determining staging accuracy. Suitability of treatment selection was assessed once final pTNM was available. One hundred and eighteen patients were studied. Endoscopic ultrasound was the most accurate individual staging modality for the loco-regional assessment of esophageal tumors (T stage accuracy 78%, N stage accuracy 70%). Laparoscopic ultrasound was the most accurate modality in T staging of gastric cancers (91%). The MDT stage was more accurate than each individual staging modality for T and N staging for both gastric and esophageal cancers (accuracy range: 88-89%) and was better for the assessment of nodal disease than each individual modality (CT P < 0.001, EUS P < 0.01, LUS P < 0.01). Overall staging accuracy as determined at the MDT meeting was increased and resulted in only 2/118 (2%) patients being under-treated. The MDT significantly improves staging accuracy for gastro-esophageal cancer and ensures that correct management decisions are made for the highest number of individual patients.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound staging of gastric cancer in routine clinical practice in Singapore.Endoscopic ultrasound has emerged as the leading modality to assess the T and N stage in gastric cancer. This study aimed to assess the accuracy of TN staging by endoscopic ultrasound in routine clinical practice in Singapore.Over a period of 7 years, 77 patients (male: 70%; median age 62.8 years) with gastric cancer underwent preoperative staging with endoscopic ultrasound. Fifty-seven patients eventually underwent surgery with tissues available for histopathological staging and comparison.The tumor locations were: cardia: 13; corpus: 20; incisura: 19; antrum: 25. The majority was poorly differentiated (57.1%); 26% were moderately differentiated and 16.9% were well differentiated adenocarcinoma. Compared to pathological staging, the overall accuracy of T staging by endoscopic ultrasound was 77.2% (17.5% under-staged: 5.3% over-staged). The staging accuracy of T1 (92.9%) and T3 (81.8%) was higher than T2 (57.1%) and T4. For N staging, the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound was 59.6% (26.3% under-staged; 14% over-staged); this was significantly superior to computer tomography (43.9%).Endoscopic ultrasound is useful for the T staging of gastric cancer, with an overall accuracy rate of 77%, and up to 93% for T1 lesions. Under-staging may occur due to microscopic tumor infiltration, while over-staging may arise due to inflammatory reactions. The accuracy of N staging is lower at 60%, but could be further improved with the use of fine needle aspiration.MRI and endoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of gastric cancer.to determine the diagnostic precision of endoscopic ultrasounds (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the preoperative staging of gastric cancer.a prospective, blind study was carried out in 17 patients diagnosed with gastric cancer (GC) using endoscopic biopsy from November 2002 to June 2003. Patients underwent preoperative MRI and EUS. The reference test used was pathology, and laparotomy for non-resectable cases.MRI (53%) was better than EUS in the assessment of gastric wall infiltration (35%). MRI (50%) was also superior to EUS (42%) for N staging. After pooling stages T1-T2 and T3-T4 together, results improved for both MRI (67 and 87.5%, respectively) and EUS (67 and 62.5%, respectively) (p < 0.05). N staging--lymph node invasion--results were correct in 50% for MRI as compared to EUS (42%). In classifying positive and negative lymph nodes EUS was superior to MRI (73 versus 54%).MRI was the best method in the assessment of gastric wall infiltration. EUS was superior to MRI for T1 staging, and in the assessment of lymph node infiltration.EUS staging of upper GI malignancies: results of a prospective randomized trial.Electronic 270 degrees transverse-array EUS (TA-EUS) provides high-quality cross-sectional images but cannot guide FNA. Linear EUS (L-EUS) provides longitudinal images of malignancies and the ability to guide FNA.We conducted a prospective randomized comparison of TA-EUS and L-EUS for the staging of upper-GI (UGI) malignancies.Forty-three patients underwent L-EUS immediately followed by TA-EUS (N = 27, 63%) or TA-EUS immediately followed by L-EUS (N = 16, 37%).Forty-three subjects (mean age, 64 years; 37 men) with an UGI malignancy (4 stomach and 38 esophageal) were evaluated with both TA-EUS and L-EUS.Abnormal lymph nodes were sampled by FNA for cytology.There was agreement on the T stage by linear and radial techniques in 38 of 43 subjects (88%). Twenty-seven of 43 patients (63%) had abnormal lymph nodes by linear or transverse-array imaging. L-EUS demonstrated 66 abnormal lymph nodes in 27 subjects (average of 2.4 nodes/subject). TA-EUS demonstrated 90 abnormal lymph nodes in 27 subjects (average of 3.3 nodes/subject, P = .009, compared with L-EUS). In 16 of the 27 subjects, an FNA was performed, which was positive in 13 cases (81%) and negative in 3 cases (10%) for malignancy.TA-EUS and L-EUS provide similar results of T staging of UGI malignancies. However, the number of abnormal lymph nodes detected by TA-EUS was more than by L-EUS. These findings suggest that radial or transverse-array EUS imaging should be the primary method for staging of UGI malignancies.Multimodal imaging of esophagus and cardia cancer before and after treatment.Prognosis and treatment of esophagus and cardia cancer (ECC) depend on the precision with which the disease is staged according to the American Joint Committee of Cancer (AJCC) criteria. Imaging modalities normally used in clinical staging are esophagography, esophagoscopy, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), computed tomography (CT) and positron emission tomography- CT fusion (CT-PET). The combination of these methods is crucial in determining not only the right diagnosis but also the stage and follow-up after multimodal treatment. The purpose of our investigation was to define the role of each imaging modality in determining the most appropriate treatment options in patients with ECC.Fifty-six patients with ECC diagnosed by X-ray of the upper digestive tract, endoscopy and biopsy were staged using EUS, chest and abdomen CT scan, and CT-PET. Thirty-four patients in stage II and 18 patients in stage III underwent surgery after neoadjuvant chemotherapy; four patients in stage IV were treated with the positioning of an endoprosthesis after chemoradiotherapy. In the 52 patients who had surgery, follow-up included digestive tract X-ray, endoscopy and CT of the chest and abdomen every 6-8 months for the first 3 years. CT-PET was only performed in patients with a clinical suspicion of recurrence and/or CT findings suspicious of persistent disease (12 cases).In all 56 patients, endoscopy, EUS, CT and CT-PET in combination were crucial in determining the site of disease, locoregional extent and depth of esophageal wall penetration (T), and any involvement of the mediastinal lymph nodes (N1), extrathoracic lymph nodes (M1) or hepatic metastases. In the locoregional staging of ECC before chemotherapy, we were able to differentiate T2-T3 from T4 in 40 patients; T4 disease was found in 12 potentially resectable cases. We were able to distinguish N0 from N1 in 12 patients. In four cases, the presence of small lymph node and/or liver metastases prompted positioning of an endoprosthesis. The specificity of CT in detecting small lymph nodes in the mediastinum was less than 50% while for CT-PET, it was more than 80%; EUS revealed sensitivity higher than 90% but a low specificity in seven cases. Only CT-PET revealed metastatic subdiaphragmatic lymph nodes (diameter <15 mm) in three cases. Presurgical restaging of the 18 patients (stage III) who had chemotherapy was based on endoscopy, EUS, CT of the chest and abdomen and CT-PET (only in suspected cases) and was compatible with surgery. Anastomotic recurrence was diagnosed in 16 patients by endoscopy with associated biopsy; any intramediastinal spread from anastomotic recurrences was evaluated by chest CT, and CT-PET in suspected cases.X-ray of the upper digestive tract and chest and abdomen CT scan are useful in preliminary evaluation of ECC. Endoscopy is particularly indicated for evaluating tumour morphology, taking biopsies for a histological diagnosis and the early diagnosis of anastomotic recurrences. EUS is indicated mainly for evaluating T stage before and after chemotherapy or chemoradiotherapy. CT-PET is extremely useful in identifying small mediastinal metastatic lymph nodes (N1) or extrathoracic lymph nodes (M1) and hepatic metastases (</=1 cm), which may escape multislice CT. PET alone is useful for identifying residual or recurrent tumour in the esophageal wall when an endoprosthesis is in place.Does endoscopic ultrasound staging already allow individual treatment regimens in gastric cancer.The aim of our study was to evaluate the accuracy of preoperative TNM staging with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in gastric cancer patients in comparison with the pathohistological stage of the resected specimen, and to determine the possible implications of EUS for individualized treatment of gastric cancer patients at our institution.The study included 82 patients operated for resectable gastric cancer between January 1(st) 2001 and July 1(st) 2003 at the Maribor Teaching Hospital Department of Abdominal and General Surgery. The EUS stage was assessed preoperatively at the Endoscopical Unit, and the pathohistological stage in the resected specimen was determined postoperatively at the Department of Pathologic Morphology according to recommended standards.Comparison of EUS and pathohistological assessments revealed accuracy of EUS staging for locoregional tumor infiltration (category T) in 68% of patients. The accuracy of EUS staging was 68% for T1, 69% for T2, 69% for T3 and 60% for T4. Lymph nodes (category N) were correctly staged with EUS in 57% of cases. The EUS stage was correct for lymph nodes with no metastases (N-) in 40% of cases, and for lymph nodes with metastases (N+) in 90%. There was no significant difference in accuracy of EUS staging with regard to tumor site (P = 0.768) or tumor size (P = 0.766).According to our results the accuracy of EUS staging matched pathohistological staging with regard to tumor infiltration and lymph node stage in 68% and 57% of cases respectively. Underestimation of the final T2 and T3 stages as T1 stage by EUS presents a problem regarding the consistency of EUS examination at our institution, particularly with respect to individual treatment for early gastric cancer. The present uncertainty in EUS stage reliability makes it necessary to have a strategy of radical resection with D2 lymphadenectomy in patients within EUS stages T1-T3, with additional CT examinations in more advanced EUS stages in order to visualize the circumstances of tumor growth. Nevertheless, EUS provides an opportunity for the surgeon to gain more insight into the loco-regional circumstances of the gastric tumor process. For development of individual modes of treatment based on EUS staging, a more reliable assessment of EUS stage is mandatory.Endoscopic ultrasonography for gastric cancer: does it influence treatment?This study aimed to evaluate the utility and shortcomings of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in tumor node metastasis (TNM) staging of gastric cancer and its influence on treatment.The series included 126 patients (65 men and 44 women) with gastric cancer who underwent EUS from July 1997 to June 2003 at the National University Hospital, Singapore. The final analysis included 109 patients ranging in age from 29 to 97 years (mean, 63.13 years).EUS staging for primary disease: Specimen histology was available for 102 of the 109 patients who underwent surgery. The accuracy was 79% for T1, 73.9% for T2, 85.7% for T3, and 72.7% for T4. The overall accuracy was 80.4%. EUS staging for nodes: The sensitivity of EUS for detecting nodal disease was 74.2% for N0, 78% for N1, 53.8% for N2, and 50% for N3. Overall, the N staging by EUS showed a sensitivity of 82.8%, a specificity of 74.2%, a positive predictive value of 85.4%, a negative predictive value of 70.2%, and an accuracy of 77.7%. Radical gastrectomy was proposed for 95 patients on the basis of the staging with EUS and computed tomography (CT) scan, and 87 patients (91.6%) underwent the surgery. Preoperative staging accurately predicted the operative strategy for 89% of the patients. No significant predictor for accuracy was achieved by performing a logistic regression analysis for the correct staging of T stage using EUS and adjusting for tumor location (middle part/distal third/whole stomach vs proximal/cardioesophageal) (p = 0.873), operator (p = 0.546), and subject's sequence (initial 50 vs last 50 cases) (p = 0.06).Ultrasound is the most accurate and reliable method for the preoperative staging of gastric carcinomas, and it is mandatory if a tailored therapeutic approach is planned according to stage.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative TNM staging of gastric cancer.To evaluate the value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the preoperative TNM staging of gastric cancer.Forty-one patients with gastric cancer (12 early stage and 29 advanced stage) proved by esophagogastroduodenoscopy and biopsies preoperatively evaluated with EUS according to TNM (1997) classification of International Union Contrele Cancer (UICC). Pentax EG-3630U/Hitachi EUB-525 echo endoscope with real-time ultrasound imaging linear scanning transducers (7.5 and 5.0 MHz) and Doppler information was used in the current study. EUS staging procedures for tumor depth of invasion (T stage) were performed according to the widely accepted five-layer structure of the gastric wall. All patients underwent surgery. Diagnostic accuracy of EUS for TNM staging of gastric cancer was determined by comparing preoperative EUS with subsequent postoperative histopathologic findings.The overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS in preoperative determination of cancer depth of invasion was 68.3% (41/28) and 83.3% (12/10), 60% (20/12), 100% (5/5), 25% (4/1) for T1, T2, T3, and T4, respectively. The rates for overstaging and understaging were 24.4% (41/10), and 7.3% (41/3), respectively. EUS tended to overstage T criteria, and main reasons for overstaging were thickening of the gastric wall due to perifocal inflammatory change, and absence of serosal layer in certain areas of the stomach. The diagnostic accuracy of metastatic lymph node involvement or N staging of EUS was 100% (17/17) for N0 and 41.7% (24/10) for N+, respectively, and 66% (41/27) overall. Misdiagnosing of the metastatic lymph nodes was related to the difficulty of distinguishing inflammatory lymph nodes from malignant lymph nodes, which imitate similar echo features. Predominant location and distribution of tumors in the stomach were in the antrum (20 patients), and the lesser curvature (17 patients), respectively. Three cases were found as surgically unresectable (T4 N+), and included as being correctly diagnosed by EUS.EUS is a useful diagnostic method for preoperative staging of gastric cancer for T and N criteria. However, EUS evaluation of malignant lymph nodes is still unsatisfactory.Evaluation of Siewert classification in gastro-esophageal junction adenocarcinoma: What is the role of endoscopic ultrasonography?Preoperative assessment of gastro-esophageal junction (GEJ) adenocarcinoma stage and its location according to Siewert are essential for planning the therapeutic approach. The present study was aimed at analyzing the utility of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in evaluating GEJ adenocarcinoma stage and whether this modality added to EGD improves assessment of Siewert type.The results of 51 patients studied by EGD plus EUS (EGD/EUS group) were compared with the results of 54 patients studied by EGD only (EGD group).A differentiation of pT1 tumors was attempted by measurement of the tumor length using 4 cm as a criterion. This goal was not achieved because of a high rate of advanced tumors less than 4 cm (sensitivity and specificity were 81.3% and 34.2%, respectively). Conversely EUS ability in pT1 assessment was very reliable (92%). The accuracy in defining the Siewert type was 72.5% and 64.8% for EGD/EUS and EGD groups, respectively (P = 0.394). Some difficulties in distinguishing between type II and III tumors were observed in both groups with an extremely low specificity (44%) in classifying type II tumors by EGD group.EUS seems to be essential in differentiating pT1 from advanced tumors. It shows an accuracy in defining the Siewert type of 72.5%, with some difficulties in distinguishing from type II and III tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound for esophageal and gastroesophageal junction cancer: Impact of increased use of primary neoadjuvant therapy on preoperative locoregional staging accuracy.Initial treatment of locally advanced esophageal and gastroesophageal junction (GEJ) malignancies for selected patients at some institutions has recently changed from surgical resection to neoadjuvant therapy. The aim of this study is to evaluate the impact of this change in treatment strategy on both the overall disease profile and locoregional endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) staging accuracy for a cohort of patients managed with primary surgical resection over a 10-year period at our institution. All subjects at our institution who underwent primary esophagectomy from 1993 to 2002 following preoperative EUS for known or suspected esophageal and/or GEJ cancers were identified. Patients with dysplasia alone, prior upper gastrointestinal tract surgery, preoperative neoadjuvant therapy, cancer of the gastric cardia or recurrent malignancy were excluded. EUS findings and staging results were compared to surgical pathology following resection. The impact of the gradually increased use of primary chemoradiation during the second half of the study was assessed. Of the 286 operations performed, 184 subjects were excluded. The remaining 102 underwent primary surgical resection a median of 18 days following EUS staging for adenocarcinoma (88%) or squamous cell carcinoma (12%) of the esophagus (69%) or GEJ (31%). Overall EUS locoregional T and N staging accuracy was 72% and 75% respectively; accuracy for T1, T2, T3 and T4 cancer was 42%, 50%, 88% and 50% respectively. Despite an increased frequency of pathologically confirmed T1 and T2 cancers (P = 0.005) and an insignificant trend toward increased N0 malignancy (P = 0.05) during the second half of the study period, no statistically significant changes in T (P = 0.07) or N (P = 0.82) staging accuracies for EUS or disease characteristics were noted between the first and second half of the study period. Despite both inaccurate radial EUS staging and increased relative use of primary surgery for early cancers, recent increased use of primary neoadjuvant therapy did not change overall disease characteristics and accuracy of locoregional EUS staging of esophageal and GEJ cancers managed with primary surgical resection.Influence of tumor characteristics on the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography in staging cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the most accurate method of assessing the locoregional extent of cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction. The aim of this study was to evaluate the influence of tumor-related factors such as length and location on the accuracy of EUS in staging these tumors.Between January 1997 and September 2002, 280 consecutive patients underwent preoperative EUS for staging cancer of the esophagus and esophagogastric junction. The influence of histopathology, the presence of Barrett's dysplasia or stenosis, and the location and length of the primary tumor on the accuracy of EUS for T, N, and M staging were studied.The overall accuracy rates of EUS for assessing the T, N, and M stages were 73 %, 80 %, and 78 %, respectively. The influence of the tumor's histopathology and the presence of Barrett's dysplasia or stenosis was minimal. The accuracy of EUS was greater in tumors 5 cm or less in size than in tumors larger than 5 cm (82 % vs. 52 % for the T stage, P < 0.05; 88 % vs. 59 % for the N stage, P < 0.05; and 92 % vs. 56 % for the M stage, P < 0.001). The low accuracy of T staging in larger tumors may be due to the exclusion of patients with local unresectability or distant metastases. EUS was also significantly better in esophageal tumors, particularly for identifying celiac trunk metastases (93 % vs. 63 %; P < 0.001).The accuracy of EUS for staging esophageal cancer is lower in tumors larger than 5 cm and in esophagogastric junction tumors than in tumors 5 cm in size or less and in esophageal tumors. These findings should be considered when treatment decisions are being taken.Multi-institutional trial of preoperative chemoradiotherapy in patients with potentially resectable gastric carcinoma.In the West, curative (R0) resection is achieved in approximately 50% of patients with localized gastric carcinoma, and more than 60% die of cancer following an R0 resection. A multi-institutional study of preoperative chemoradiotherapy was done to assess the R0 resection rate, pathologic complete response (pathCR) rate, safety, and survival in patients with resectable gastric carcinoma.Operable patients with localized gastric adenocarcinoma were eligible. Staging also included a laparoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Patients received up to two 28-day cycles of induction chemotherapy of fluorouracil, leucovorin, and cisplatin, followed by 45 Gy of radiation plus concurrent fluorouracil. Patients were then staged and surgery was attempted.Thirty-four patients were registered at three institutions. One ineligible patient was excluded. Most patients had a promixal cancer and EUST3N1 designation. Twenty-eight (85%) of 33 patients underwent surgery. The R0 resection rate was 70% and pathCR rate was 30%. A pathologic partial response (< 10% residual carcinoma in the primary) occurred in eight patients (24%). EUS T plus N and postsurgery T plus N correlation showed significant downstaging (P = <.01). The median survival time for 33 patients was 33.7 months. Patients achieving a pathCR or pathPR had a significantly longer median survival time (63.9 months) than those achieving less than pathPR (12.6 months; P =.03). There were two treatment-related deaths.Our data suggest that the three-step strategy of preoperative induction chemotherapy followed by chemoradiotherapy resulted in substantial pathologic response that resulted in durable survival time. This strategy is worthy of a direct comparison with postoperative adjuvant chemoradiotherapy.Endosonography versus helical computed tomography for locoregional staging of gastric cancer.Endosonography (EUS) has been shown to be more accurate than incremental computed tomography (CT) in the local (T) and regional (N) staging of gastric carcinoma; however, EUS has never been compared with helical CT (HCT). The fifth edition of the TNM classification changed the guidelines for N-staging of gastric carcinoma. The accuracy of imaging methods in this new system remains unknown.Staging accuracy of EUS and HCT were compared prospectively with pathological or intraoperative findings in 88 gastric carcinoma patients. Staging was done according to the fourth and fifth editions of the TNM classification. EUS was done with a radial echo endoscope, and HCT with a scanner with two rows of detectors (two-phase contrast-enhanced scanning of a water-filled stomach).The T-staging accuracy of EUS (63 %, CI 52 - 73 %) was superior to the accuracy of HCT (44 %, CI 34 - 55 %; P = 0.021). N-staging accuracy of both methods was similar when the fourth edition of the TNM classification was used (EUS 47 %, CI 34 - 60 %; HCT 52 %, CI 38 - 65 %). However, HCT was more accurate than EUS when the fifth edition of the classification was applied (EUS 30 %, CI 18 - 43 %, HCT 47 %, CI 34 - 60 %; P = 0.044). The accuracy of detection of lymph node metastases was similar for both methods (EUS 67 %, CI 54 - 78 %; HCT 77 %, CI 64 - 86 %).EUS is more accurate than HCT in the T-staging of gastric carcinoma. Both methods are comparable for N-staging, when this is done according to the older, fourth edition of the TNM classification. If the fifth edition is used, EUS is less accurate than HCT.Impact of miniprobe ultrasonography on planning of minimally invasive surgery for gastric and colonic tumors.The use of minimally invasive procedures for the management of gastrointestinal cancer is increasing. The aim of this study was to investigate the role of high-frequency miniprobe endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) for therapeutic decisions making in patients with gastric or colonic tumors.A total of 137 patients underwent EUS with a 12.5-MHz miniprobe for preoperative staging of tumors of the stomach ( n = 49) or colon ( n = 88). After resection, the surgical path was reviewed to analyze the role of preoperative staging with miniprobes.Miniprobe EUS enabled accurate assessment of the infiltration depth of gastric and colonic tumors. The overall accuracy rates were 88% and 87%, respectively. The lymph node status was predicted correctly in 82% of the patients (sensitivity, 61%, specificity, 94%). Based on the results of miniprobe EUS, patients with gastric cancer were accurately selected to undergo endoscopic mucosal resection, laparoscopic resection, or open surgery in 100%, 91%, and 86% of the cases, respectively. In patients with colonic tumors, the treatment decision analysis showed that the stratification was correct in 90% of the patients.Miniprobe EUS is a reliable method for validating treatment decisions for patients undergoing minimally invasive procedures for gastric and colonic tumors. This method is particularly valuable in the management of colon cancer, because endoscopic and laparoscopic resections can be offered to selected patients as an alternative to open surgery.Preoperative staging of gastric adenocarcinoma: comparison of helical CT and endoscopic US.To compare the performance of helical computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (US) in the preoperative staging of gastric cancer.Fifty-one consecutive patients with a primary malignant gastric tumor (stage T2-T4) were preoperatively evaluated with both helical CT and endoscopic US within 3 days. Each tumor was staged according to the TNM classification system with both modalities. All patients subsequently underwent surgery. Results of CT and endoscopic US were compared with histologic staging of tumor invasion depth and regional lymph node metastasis. For comparison of CT and endoscopic US data, the marginal homogeneity test was used, and a P value of less than.05 was determined to indicate statistical significance.In comparison with histologic results, CT achieved correct T staging in 39 patients (76%) and correct N staging in 35 patients (70%). The corresponding results for endoscopic US achieved correct T staging in 44 patients (86%) and correct N staging in 45 patients (90%). There was no significant difference between T staging (P =.55) and N staging (P >.99). Because of challenging detection of wall layers, correct T staging was difficult for CT and endoscopic US in the differentiation of T2 and T3 lesions.Compared with endoscopic US, helical CT focused on the stomach provides valuable results regarding T and N staging in patients with gastric cancer.Positron emission tomography using 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose for response monitoring in locally advanced gastroesophageal cancer; a comparison of different analytical methods.To determine the ability of 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) to monitor response in locally advanced gastroesophageal cancer (LAGEC). Additionally, optimal FDG-PET methods for response monitoring were selected.Sequential dynamic FDG-PET scans were performed in 13 patients with LAGEC (T2-3N0-1M0-1a) treated with neoadjuvant cisplatin and gemcitabine plus granulocyte macrophage colony stimulating growth factor at a three weekly schedule. The standard FDG-PET method, nonlinear regression (NLR), was compared with computed tomography (CT), endoscopic-ultrasound (EUS), and histopathology as well as with 21 simplified analytical FDG-PET methods.Five out of 12 operated tumors responded histopathologically with less than 10% residual tumorcells (42%). These had a higher decrease in FDG uptake compared with nonresponders (P=0.008). Early (after two cycles) and late (after completed induction therapy) response evaluation showed a specificity of 86% and 100%, respectively, and a sensitivity of 100%. Both FDG-PET and EUS were superior to CT. From 21 methods analyzing FDG uptake, the quantitative Patlak analysis, the simplified kinetic method (SKM), and the semiquantitative standardized uptake value corrected for bodyweight (SUV-BW) seemed to correlate best with NLR.FDG-PET reliably predicted response in LAGEC. FDG-PET measurements using Patlak analysis or the more clinical applicable SKM and SUV-BW were acceptable alternatives to NLR.[Endoscopic ultrasound in routine clinical practice for staging adenocarcinomas of the stomach and distal esophagus].Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an important diagnostic tool for determining the best therapeutic strategy (primary resection, neoadjuvant therapy or palliation only) to offer esophageal or gastric cancer patients.In the present study (1992-2001),we evaluated the accuracy of EUS in adenocarcinomas of the distal esophagus and stomach and compared our results with pathologists findings as the gold standard.Of the 222 patients studied, the precise examination of 11% EUS was not completely possible due to severe tumor stenosis. The accuracy of EUS with respect to T, N+/- and TN+/- amounted to 51%, 65% and 34% in 131 patients with adenocarcinomas of the esophageal gastric junction and to 50%, 66% and 37% in 91 patients with adenocarcinomas located in the fundus, corpus or antrum of the stomach respectively. With respect to T-stage, the overstaging of tumors was more common than understaging, especially in pT2b-carcinomas. The subgroup analysis of the 131 EGJ adenocarcinoma patients showed that the results obtained by EUS were slightly better in type I (distal esophageal cancer) than in type II and III cardia carcinomas (proximal gastric cancer).When comparing two observation periods (1992-1996 and 1997-2001), the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound staging was very similar in both periods for T-category (51% vs 49%) and N-category (63% vs 64%) as well as for combined TN-staging (36% vs 35%) respectively.In clinical routine examinations of adenocarcinomas of the stomach and the distal esophagus, the accuracy of EUS is not as good as the excellent results in the past--mostly obtained under study conditions--may suggest.Endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric cancer: determination of tumor invasion depth, nodal involvement and surgical resectability.Current study was aimed to evaluate the usefulness of EUS in TNM staging of gastric cancer by comparing EUS preoperative staging with pathological findings, and the preliminary exploration of possible reasons for overstaging and understaging phenomenon was especially intended.A total of 35 patients with histologically confirmed gastric adenocarcinoma were referred to EUS and staged preoperatively by using the TNM system. The preoperative endosonographic results were compared with the histopathological staging.The overall accuracy of EUS for determination of the T stage was 80.0 %, and for T1, T2, T3, and T4 was 100 %, 71.4 %, 87.5 % and 72.7 %, respectively. For N stage, EUS had the accuracy of 68.6 %, with sensitivity and specificity of 66.7 % and 73.7 %, respectively. Resectability was predicted with sensitivity and specificity of 87.5 % and 100 %, respectively.EUS is an accurate staging modality in most cases, with a few exceptions of overstaging and understaging. Patients with gastric cancers can benefit from preoperative EUS staging for establishing individualized therapy. However, EUS criteria to differentiate benign from malignant nodes still need to be further defined by future studies.Prospective comparison of endoscopy, endosonography and computed tomography for staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia.Local and multimodal therapeutic strategies for tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia, require precise preoperative staging. Endosonography is considered the most accurate staging method, while computed tomography (CT) has limitations especially in the evaluation of local infiltration. Macroscopic endoscopic evaluation was reported to be accurate in selected series, but no study has yet compared all three staging modalities.One hundred and seventeen unselected patients with tumours of the oesophagus and gastric cardia were prospectively staged first by the endoscopic macroscopic appearance and then by endosonography. All patients had preoperative CT scans, however, only the 36 patients receiving the scans at our institution were included in the study. The preoperative staging results were then compared to postoperative histology which was available as the gold standard in all included patients. Kappa statistics were used to exclude chance agreement of the clinical staging results with the pathohistological findings. Differences between the resulting kappa values for the different staging modalities were analysed with a jack-knife test.Endoscopic macroscopic staging and endosonography (accuracy 67 and 69%, weighted kappa 0.78 and 0.84) were significantly more accurate than CT (accuracy 33%, weighted kappa 0.44) for determination of the T category (p = 0.006 and p = 0.001). After exclusion of tumours of the cardia (n = 33), the accuracy of macroscopic and endosonographic staging (accuracy 72 and 75%, weighted kappa 0.86 and 0.88) increased and remained more accurate than CT (accuracy 50%, weighted kappa 0.62). The main pitfall in our series in staging the T category was the overestimation of T2 tumours in the cardia as T3 or even as T4 tumours due to the inability to visualise the serosa. The accuracy of predicting lymph node metastasis was 68% for macroscopic endoscopic, 79% for endosonographic, and 67% for CT staging. Only endosonographic staging was significantly different from chance agreement with histology (weighted kappa = 0.56). Endosonographic staging was significantly more accurate than endoscopic macroscopic and CT staging (p = 0.03).Endosonography is the most accurate staging modality for overall preoperative staging of oesophageal and cardial tumours. Endoscopic macroscopic staging allows a reasonably accurate assessment of the T category.Is endoscopic ultrasonography indispensable in assessing the appropriateness of endoscopic resection for gastric cancer?Endoscopic resection is increasingly being used in the treatment of early gastric cancer. The aim of the present study was to investigate the accuracy of pretherapeutic staging techniques for assessing the appropriateness of endoscopic resection.Both endoscopy and endosonography were carried out at our institution in the treatment of 234 early gastric cancers, with histological confirmation of malignancy following surgical resection (137 lesions) or endoscopic resection (97 lesions). The accuracy in detecting intramucosal cancer with each of the diagnostic procedures was assessed.The accuracy rates for detecting intramucosal cancer using endoscopy and endosonography were calculated as 84 % (197 of 234) and 78 % (182 of 234), respectively. The accuracy tended to be lower in lesions located in the upper third of the stomach, in those measuring 2 cm or more in diameter, and in those with an undifferentiated histology with ulcer fibrosis. However, there were no significant differences in the accuracy rates between endoscopy and endosonography. Precise staging was achieved by endoscopy alone in 103 of 109 differentiated adenocarcinomas without ulcer fibrosis, where the lesions measured less than 2 cm in diameter.Endoscopic resection is indicated in intramucosal gastric cancer lesions showing differentiated histology, no ulcer fibrosis and a diameter of less than 2 cm. EUS may additionally be used for further evaluation in these patients.Preoperative staging of gastric cancer by endoscopic ultrasound: the prognostic usefulness of ascites detected by endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the standard modality in local preoperative staging of gastric cancers and is reputedly able to detect ascites. However, the association between ascites detected by EUS and local tumor staging, peritoneal carcinomatosis, or survival after surgery is not well documented.To assess the accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EUS in the preoperative staging and detection of ascites in gastric cancers. We also try to correlate ascites with histologic staging, tumor differentiation, and survival rate of gastric carcinoma after surgery.The retrospective analysis was made in 57 consecutive patients with histologically confirmed gastric adenocarcinomas that underwent EUS before surgery. The accuracy of EUS was compared with the final surgical-pathologic findings. We estimated the prognostic usefulness by analyzing the clinicopathologic features of gastric adenocarcinomas and following up their survival rates.The overall T staging was 88% accurate by EUS. The accuracy for T staging was as follows: T1, 100%; T2, 33%; T3, 93%; and T4, 100%. About 50% of T2 cases were overstaged. The overall accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of detecting lymph node metastasis by EUS were 79%, 79%, and 80%, respectively. One of the seven T1 cancers had regional lymph node metastasis, and it was missed by EUS, although the T classification was precisely staged based on finding submucosal invasion. A total of 22 patients (39%) had ascites detected by EUS; both the sensitivity and specificity of EUS in demonstrating ascites were 100% in our study. Ascites was significantly correlated with the depth of tumor invasion ( = 0.036), lymph node metastasis ( = 0.008), and poor cellular differentiation ( = 0.007), but it was not significantly correlated with macroscopic peritoneal carcinomatosis. The survival rate after surgical treatment was poor in those with gastric cancers with lymph node metastasis, ascites, or poorly differentiated tumors ( < 0.05). However, multivariate analysis showed that lymph node metastasis was the only significant prognostic predictor ( = 0.004).Endoscopic ultrasound is a valuable diagnostic tool in the local staging of gastric cancers and demonstration of ascites. Although the surgical treatment of gastric cancers with lymph node metastasis, ascites, or poor differentiation had poorer survival rate, only lymph node metastasis was proved to be a significant prognostic predictor in multivariate analysis.You get what you expect? A critical appraisal of imaging methodology in endosonographic cancer staging.After an initial period of excellent results with newly introduced imaging procedures, the accuracy of most imaging methods declines in later publications. This effect may be due to various methodological factors involved in the research. Using the example of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), this study aimed to elucidate one of the factors possibly concerned--namely, the extent to which the examiners are adequately blinded.Well documented videotapes of EUS examinations of 101 patients with resected tumours of the oesophagus (n=32), stomach (n=33), or pancreas (n=36) were evaluated in three different ways: firstly, retrospective analysis under routine clinical conditions; secondly, evaluation of EUS videotapes in a strictly blinded fashion; and thirdly, evaluation of the same videotapes but with additional information from the video endoscopic appearance (oesophageal/gastric cancer) or from computed tomography results (pancreatic cancer). Histopathological T staging was used as the reference method.The accuracy of EUS in T staging was 73% under routine conditions. This value fell significantly to 53% for the blinded evaluation but increased again to 62% for the unblinded evaluation. The sensitivity of staging T1/T2 tumours was 72% (routine EUS), 59% (blinded EUS), and 70% (unblinded EUS). The respective values for advanced tumours were 85%, 74%, and 72%.The accuracy of EUS for T staging in clinical practice appears to be lower than has previously been reported. In addition, blinded analysis produced significantly poorer results, which improved when another test was added. It may be speculated that better results with routine EUS obtained in a clinical setting are due to additional sources of information.A comparison of computerised tomography, laparoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound in the preoperative staging of oesophago-gastric carcinoma.Oesophago-gastric carcinoma is associated with a poor prognosis despite advances in diagnosis and treatment. Accurate preoperative staging of gastro-oesophageal carcinoma is, therefore, essential in order to determine patient selection for potentially curative resection. The aim of this study was to evaluate and compare the role of computerised tomography (CT), laparoscopic ultrasound (LapUS) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the staging of oesophago-gastric carcinoma.Thirty-six patients with histologically proven carcinoma of the oesophagus or stomach who were considered fit for surgical resection were identified from a prospectively collected database. All patients underwent spiral CT, LapUS and EUS as part of their preoperative staging investigations. RESULTS from the staging modalities were compared retrospectively with final histopathology where available and to intraoperative findings where the tumour was irresectable.Locally advanced tumours (T3/T4) were accurately identified by CT in 15/16 (94%) and by EUS in 14/16 (88%). LapUS was unable to detect 11 tumours (of which five were T3/T4) because they were above the diaphragm, but in the locally advanced cases where the tumour could be seen the accuracy was 10/12 (83%). EUS was the best modality for assessing early tumours and locoregional nodal involvement with accuracies of 8/13 (62%) and 21/29 (72%), respectively. EUS accuracies rose to 64, 92 and 83% for T1/T2, T3/T4 and N staging with the exclusion of those patients (n=6) in whom strictures prevented full assessment. LapUS had a specificity of 100%, compared to 90% for CT and was more accurate than CT for assessing distant metastases (accuracy of 26/32 (81%) compared to 23/32 (72%) for CT).Although this study is small it has confirmed that CT, EUS and LapUS act in a complimentary manner to provide the most complete preoperative staging for patients with oesophago-gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the preoperative staging of gastric cancer: accuracy and impact on surgical therapy.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a standard procedure in the preoperative staging of patients with gastric carcinomas. Herein we present our experience with EUS and discuss the results and their implications for surgical therapy.A total of 116 patients with histologically confirmed gastric adenocarcinoma were referred to EUS and classified prospectively by the TNM system. The results of the preoperative endosonographic staging were compared with the definitive histopathological results after the operation.The overall accuracy of EUS for determination of the T stage was 78%. The accuracy for the T1 and T2 stages was 80% and 63%, respectively. With 20% and 30%, there was a relatively high rate of overstaging in these cases. The accuracy for T3 and T4 tumors was 95% and 83%, respectively. The accuracy of EUS for determination of the N stage was 77%, with a sensitivity of 91% and a specificity of 84%. Resectability was predicted correctly with a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 83%.Generally accepted standards for the therapy of advanced gastric carcinomas do not exist. In cases where the therapeutic strategy is surgical exploration, no preoperative staging is necessary. In cases with differentiated treatment strategies, the accuracy of EUS is not sufficient for the selection of patients for endoscopic resection. Its accuracy for submucosal cancer invasion and for the detection of lymph node metastases needs to be further enhanced. If only multimodal therapy is considered, EUS staging seems to be absolutely mandatory. Patients classified preoperatively as T1 to T3 can be operated on primarily with sufficient security. In patients where radical resection of the tumor seems doubtful, we recommend that a diagnostic laparoscopy be performed to confirm the diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasound in the staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastro-oesophageal junction.Modern management of upper gastro-intestinal cancer demands accurate pre-operative staging. In continental Europe and Japan, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is established as the investigation of choice for local staging of these cancers, but British experience with this technique is limited.A retrospective review of the medical records of patients with oesophageal or gastro-oesophageal junction tumours during our first 3.5 years' experience with EUS was undertaken and the findings at EUS correlated with the pathology of the resected specimen.A total of 124 patients (86 males), with a mean age of 64.5 years, underwent EUS: 84 had adenocarcinoma and 26 squamous cell carcinoma. There were 3 failed EUS examinations, 42 patients did not have surgery for a variety of reasons, and 10 patients had pre-operative chemoradiotherapy. In the remaining 69 patients, correlation for T stage showed an accuracy of EUS of 80% and for N staging of 54% overall. Comparison of the initial 2 years with the final 18 months showed no change in the T staging accuracy but an improvement in the N staging accuracy from 50% to 60%.Once initial experience has been gained, EUS is an accurate procedure for T and N staging of tumours of the oesophagus and gastro-oesophageal junction. It should be included with other imaging modalities, such as CT scanning, in the pre-operative assessment of these tumours.Video-endoscopic ultrasonography in staging gastric carcinoma.Clinical staging of gastric carcinoma is important in designing the strategy of treatment. Early gastric carcinomas can be treated by minimally invasive therapy, whereas advanced gastric carcinomas should be treated by surgery with or without combined chemotherapy. This study was undertaken to evaluate the accuracy and limitations of video type endoscopic ultrasound in preoperative staging of gastric cancer and assessing lymph node metastasis.Seventy-four patients with gastric carcinoma were preoperatively staged using video-endoscopic ultrasonography, performed by the same gastroenterologist.Sixty-three out of the 74 (85%) patients were correctly staged by endoscopic ultrasonography. The diagnostic accuracy rate was 100% for T1, 74% for T2, 87% for T3, and 86% for T4. Overstaging occurred in 11% due to peritumoral inflammation. Understaging occurred in 4% due to microinvasion of carcinomatous tissue or deeper organ invasion. The diagnosis of lymph node metastasis was confirmed in 72% of cases. Sensitivity and specificity was 74% and 86%, respectively.Endoscopic ultrasonography has a high accuracy rate in staging gastric carcinoma but still has its limitations in evaluating regional lymph node metastasis, despite using a new generation video-endoscopic ultrasonography.Morphometric analysis of regional lymph nodes with and without metastasis from early gastric carcinoma.To the authors' knowledge detailed morphometric changes in lymph nodes with and without metastasis in patients with early gastric carcinoma remain undocumented.Histologic slides of 1847 lymph nodes dissected from 115 consecutive patients who underwent gastrectomy for early gastric carcinoma were examined histologically and measured using computer morphometry with the public domain National Institutes of Health Image program. Quantitative data were analyzed in relation to preoperative and intraoperative clinical assessments and postoperative pathologic diagnosis.Metastasis was found in 11 lymph nodes (0.6%) from 8 patients (7.0%). Metastatic lymph nodes showed a mean maximum dimension of 4.8 mm, a mean area of 14.4 mm(2), and a mean ratio of maximum/minimum dimension of 1.36; the corresponding values for nonmetastatic lymph nodes were 4.7 mm (P = 0.45), 13.2 mm(2) (P = 0. 13), and 1.66 (P = 0.10), respectively. The lymph node with a metastasis was not necessarily the largest of the dissected lymph nodes from each patient, and histologically each lymph node with a metastasis showed pericancerous fibrosis in > 10% of its area. The sensitivities of preoperative computed tomography, abdominal ultrasonography (US), endoscopic US, and intraoperative assessments to diagnose metastasis were 0%, 13%, 0%, and 13%, respectively, and the sensitivities of these modalities to detect lymph nodes > 10 mm in dimension were 18%, 10%, 3%, and 10%, respectively.Digital quantitative analysis is useful and widely applicable to clinicopathologic evaluation. The diagnostic sensitivity of lymph node metastasis in patients with early gastric carcinoma in the current study was very low with preoperative and intraoperative assessments because lymph node metastases were small and showed subtle histologic changes of pericancerous fibrosis.Preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography in patients with gastric cancer.There is a need to assess the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and staging of gastric cancer, especially in the early and very advanced stages of the disease when the therapeutic approach is still controversial.A retrospective study was performed on 79 patients with gastric cancer in order to compare the stage defined by preoperative EUS with that assessed histopathologically. All patients underwent laparotomy for final diagnosis, staging, and eventually treatment. The results of EUS were correlated with the histologic findings of the resected specimens.In the uT1 group, which corresponds to early gastric cancer, the diagnosis was histologically confirmed in 85.7% of the cases. In patients with advanced tumors defined as uT3-uT4, i.e., tumors infiltrating the serosa or neighboring structures, the diagnostic concordance was 91.1%. In contrast, concordance for less advanced lesions confined to the muscular layer was only 31.2%. As regards the lymph nodes, they were defined metastatic in 31 patients and confirmed to be histologically involved in 77.4%. In contrast, when the lymph nodes were assessed as negative at EUS, they proved to be metastatic in more than half the cases.From the data it appears that EUS has proven to be valuable in correctly staging most of the patients. EUS shows not only tumor depth and local spread but also the passage from a pathologic to a normal wall and lymph node metastasis. EUS appears to represent an important advance in the staging and follow-up of patients with gastric cancer. Instruments and techniques will continue to evolve, but the next level of research should be designed to show that the improved staging provided by EUS has clinical utility and can affect patient outcome. It is noteworthy that the highest accuracy of EUS has been shown in those conditions (uT1 and uT3-4) which currently are under consideration for a therapeutic approach that differs from the standard one.Experience of endoscopic ultrasound in staging adenocarcinoma of the cardia.The introduction of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has generally resulted in a more accurate assessment of gastrointestinal regional tumour stage. Knowing the stage and the extent of oesophageal involvement is extremely important as a guide to the choice of surgical approach in cardia cancer. The aim of this study was to evaluate the ability of EUS to accurately predict depth of tumour invasion (T), node involvement (N) and the tumour's invasion length along the oesophagus.Thirty-five patients with adenocarcinoma of the cardia were studied by EUS and the EUS pre-operative findings were compared with the pathology findings.The overall accuracy in T staging was 55.2% (16/29 cases). The sensitivity in evaluating T1, T2 and T3 classes was 80%, 38.5% and 70%, respectively. The sensitivity was excellent in evaluating N0 class (100%) (5 cases), but it fell to 66.7% in N1 cases. EUS correctly determined the extent of oesophagus invasion in 75.9% (22/29) of cases; moreover, it had a very high accuracy in distinguishing between tumours with an oesophageal invasion greater or lower than 2 cm (93.1%) (27/29 cases).EUS proved to be useful in pre-operative staging of cardia adenocarcinoma and, in particular, in the pre-operative identification of the extent of oesophageal invasion.The utility of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopy in the endoscopic mucosal resection of early gastric cancer.To clarify the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and endoscopy in the endoscopic mucosal resection (EMR) of early gastric cancer. Patients/Methods-EMR was performed in 61 patients with early gastric cancer over the past five years. The accuracy of the assessment of the depth of cancerous invasion was studied in 49 patients who had EUS before EMR. Forty eight patients were treated with endoscopy alone; in these patients, EUS and endoscopic findings correlated with the clinical course.Forty six patients showed no changes in the submucosal layer or deeper structures on EUS. Pathologically these included 37 patients with mucosal cancer and nine with submucosal cancer showing very slight submucosal infiltration. Three patients showed diffuse low echo changes in the submucosal layer on EUS; pathologically, these included two with submucosal cancer and one with mucosal cancer with a peptic ulcer scar within the tumour focus. Of 48 patients receiving endoscopic treatment alone, 45 showed no tumour recurrence or evidence of metastases on EUS and endoscopy. Three cases of recurrence were observed. Two of these patients had a surgical gastrectomy, and one was re-treated endoscopically. In the former cases, the surgical results correlated well with assessment by EUS and endoscopy. In addition, the latter patient who was re-treated endoscopically after evaluation with EUS and endoscopy has so far had no recurrence.The combined use of EUS and endoscopy is effective in diagnosing the depth of cancerous invasion in patients undergoing EMR as well as in clarifying changes both within and between anatomic levels during follow up.Gastric carcinoma confined to the muscularis propria: how can we detect, evaluate, and cure intermediate-stage carcinoma of the stomach?The most important surgical strategy for advanced gastric cancer is its detection at the curative stage. The aim of this study was to characterize the curable intermediate-stage gastric carcinomas.Of 1120 consecutive patients who underwent gastric resection for primary gastric cancer from 1979 through 1996, 94 patients were histologically diagnosed as having cancer confined to the muscularis propria (mp cancer), analyzed clinicopathologically, and compared with patients with early and serosal cancers.The operative incidence of mp cancer was around 8% among cases of gastrectomy, and the ratio of mp cancer to advanced cancer began to increase in 1991. Mp cancer was at a statistically intermediate stage, between early and serosal cancers in terms of symptoms, surgical curability (96%), size and histology of the tumor, and the rate of lymph node metastasis (46%). Preoperative assessments of tumor depth were unclear using radiology and endoscopy; however, 35% of 31 cases studied were diagnosed precisely by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Accuracy of lymph node metastasis diagnosis was the same (65%) by preoperative EUS and by surgeon; however, sensitivity of the surgeon's assessment was higher (69% vs 38%) and specificity of EUS was higher (83% vs 39%). The 5-yr survival rate was 85%, which was significantly better than that of serosal cancer and similar to that of early cancer. Patient outcome was not affected by lymph node metastasis or macroscopic type of tumor.Mp cancer should be considered an intermediate-stage cancer. Surgery with level 2 lymph node dissection should provide a cure rate similar to that for early cancer.The utility and limitations of an ultrasonic miniprobe in the staging of gastric cancer.To determine the utility and limitations of an ultrasonic miniprobe (UMP) in the staging of gastric cancer, we evaluated 46 patients who underwent endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) using an UMP and who were histologically determined to have gastric cancers. In every case, UMP findings were compared with histopathological findings after treatment. The total accuracy of UMP relative to the depth of tumor invasion was 71.7% (33/46 cases). Accuracy with respect to T1-m tumor diagnosis was 75.7% (22/29 cases), and for T1-sm, 76.9% (10/13 cases), but accuracy for T2 tumor diagnosis was low, due to ultrasound attenuation. When the analysis was carried out based on the size of tumor, the accuracy for UMP was 50.0% (9/18 cases) for all tumors over 20 mm and 85.7% (24/28 cases) for all tumors smaller than 20 mm. We conclude that UMP is suitable for investigation of tumor extension when the lesion is superficial and/or small gastric cancers which do not cause ultrasonic attenuation, but not when the tumor is large or located in certain sites, although conventional EUS is useful in some of these cases.An early gastric carcinoma treatment strategy based on analysis of lymph node metastasis.Newly developed therapies for early gastric carcinoma attempt to consider patients' quality of life, but the applicability and effectiveness of these treatments remain undetermined.Clinicopathologic data of 612 consecutive patients with early gastric carcinoma, all of whom were treated by D1 and D2 gastrectomy, were analyzed. Patients with and without lymph node metastases were compared in relation to age and gender distributions, surgical procedures, histopathology of the tumors, 5-year prognosis, and in reference to the preoperative and intraoperative assessments.The overall incidence of lymph node metastases was 5.7%. Tumor depth and size were related to lymph node metastases judged by univariate and multivariate analyses. Patients with mucosal tumors showed no relation between metastatic rate and tumor size, whereas those with submucosal tumors showed an increasing metastatic rate with tumor size. In all cases but one, lymph node metastases were confined to lymph node stations defined as Group 1 locations. Preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography showed a 55% diagnostic accuracy in determining tumor depth and a 15% sensitivity in diagnosing lymph node metastases.Patients with early gastric carcinoma may be candidates for endoscopic mucosal resection if their tumor is confined to the mucosa and measures < 1 cm in greatest dimension. Other limited resections including D1 gastrectomy or standard D2 gastrectomy based on tumor depth and size are appropriate. Based on the current study findings, the authors propose a useful algorithm for managing such patients.A blind comparison of the effectiveness of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopy in staging early gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography is expected to be useful for invasion depth staging of early gastric cancer. A prospective blind study of the staging characteristics of endoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography for early gastric cancer was performed.Findings of endoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography using a 20 MHz thin ultrasound probe were independently reviewed and the results of 52 early gastric cancer lesions analysed.The overall accuracy rates in invasion depth staging of early gastric cancer were 63% for endoscopy and 71% for endoscopic ultrasonography. No statistically significant differences were observed in overall accuracy. Endoscopic ultrasonography tended to overstage, and lesions that were classified as mucosal cancer by endoscopic ultrasonography were very likely (95%) to be limited to the mucosa on histological examination. All 16 lesions staged as mucosal cancer independently but coincidentally by both methods were histologically limited to the mucosa.Endoscopic ultrasonography is expected to compensate for the understaging of lesions with submucosal invasion that are endoscopically staged as mucosal cancer.Staging of gastric cancer with endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic mucosal resection.Since it was found that the gastrointestinal wall is visualized as a five-layered structure corresponding to the histological layers of the wall, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has become recognized clinically as the most accurate method for diagnosing and assessing the local staging of gastric cancer. However, some problems have remained, including how to differentiate between cancer invasion and ulcer fibrosis, how to detect microinvasion, and how to recognize malignant lymph nodes. Using the pattern analysis for depressed-type gastric cancer, it is usually possible to distinguish between cancer invasion and ulcer fibrosis, except in cases of microinvasion into ulcer fibrosis or inadequate scanning. However, the sensitivity of EUS for evaluating metastatic lymph nodes is still problematic. Endoscopic mucosal resection (EMR) for early gastric cancer has been widely accepted as a standard treatment in Japan due to its minimal invasiveness. According to our data, the overall rate of radical resection was 68.3% (168 of 246), and 31.7% of the remaining patients additionally received laser treatment, surgery, or heater-probe treatment. There were no deaths owing to gastric cancer. Some lesions in which there was microinvasion of the submucosa were incorrectly diagnosed by EUS. It may be possible to solve this problem using three-dimensional EUS (3D-EUS) in the near future.Endoscopic ultrasonography for preoperative locoregional staging and assessment of resectability in gastric cancer.We performed a prospective study from November 1989 to December 1996 to assess the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the locoregional staging and resectability of patients with gastric carcinoma. One hundred and nineteen patients with gastric cancer who received preoperative assessment by EUS underwent subsequent surgery. The endosonographic tumor-node-metastasis (TNM) classification was used for comparison with the histopathologic findings of the resected specimens. The ability of EUS to accurately predict the T stage (depth of tumor invasion) and N stage (involvement of lymph node) was 70% and 65%, respectively. EUS displayed a tendency to overestimate T stage and underestimate N state. The differentiation of early gastric cancer from advanced gastric cancer showed a concordance rate of 89% and underestimation rate of 8% and underestimation rate of 3%. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the stage T1 to T3, which correspond to D0 resectability (no macroscopic or microscopic tumor remains), was 91%. In conclusion, these results revealed EUS as a valuable tool for evaluating the local staging and resectability of gastric cancer. We suggest that EUS should be introduced in the preoperative assessment of patients with gastric cancer.[How accurate is preoperative staging as a basis for treatment decisions in gastric carcinoma?].The treatment of advanced gastric carcinoma by various neoadjuvant and adjuvant multimodal therapy regimes is under current investigation to improve the poor outcome of these patients. Therefore, pretherapeutic tumor staging according to the TNM classification is essential for the optimal application of various therapeutic modalities. According to recent studies, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is the most sensitive technique in measuring tumor infiltration (T-staging). In addition, although less reliable compared to the T-staging, the sensitivity of EUS in assessing lymph node status (N-staging) is superior to computed tomography and conventional ultrasound. Pretherapeutic laparoscopic investigation may give additional important information about tumor stage. This overview describes the significance of various diagnostic techniques that can be applied in tumor staging investigations.Endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopy for staging depth of invasion in early gastric cancer: a pilot study.We compared the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for staging depth of invasion of early gastric cancer with that of conventional endoscopy.We assessed the depth of invasion of 108 lesions (104 patients) using EUS with a thin 20 MHz probe and compared the results with those of conventional endoscopy and of histologic examination of endoscopically or surgically resected specimens.The overall accuracy rates for staging depth of invasion for conventional endoscopy and EUS were 72.2% and 64.8%, respectively. Lesions that were classified as limited to the mucosa on both conventional endoscopy and EUS were very likely (92.2%) to be limited to the mucosa on histologic examination. The rates for understaging and overstaging were 16.7% and 11.1%, respectively, for conventional endoscopy; and 7.4% and 24.1%, respectively, for EUS. The highest rate for understaging based on conventional endoscopy occurred for lesions in the gastric body (including cardia, 23.9%).EUS appears to be useful in combination with conventional endoscopy for staging depth of invasion of early gastric cancer. In particular, the two techniques in tandem may accurately predict that a lesion is limited to the mucosa, and EUS may be useful to overcome the potential for understaging by conventional endoscopy, particularly in the gastric body.Pre-operative TN staging of gastric cancer using a 15 MHz ultrasound miniprobe.The aim of the study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with a new endoscopically guided ultrasound miniprobe, used for pre-operative staging of gastric cancers. 59 cases of gastric cancer were prospectively examined with a 15 MHz ultrasound miniprobe. The results of the ultrasound imaging were compared with the histological findings of the resected specimens. The accuracy of the miniprobe for depth of invasion (T category) was 61% for all tumours, and 72% and 40%, respectively, for T1 and T2 to T4 lesions. If indeterminate cases due to ultrasound attenuation were excluded, the accuracy was improved to 82% for T1 and 57% for T2 to T4 tumours, respectively. The accuracy of the miniprobe for nodal staging (N category) was 69% overall, and 86%, 25% and 14% for stages N0, N1 and N2, respectively. In tumours classified on the basis of endoscopic types, the miniprobe staged early type gastric cancers (T category = 73%, N category = 80%) significantly (p < 0.01) more accurately than advanced ones (T category = 21%, N category = 36%). This study suggests that the miniprobe is indicated for pre-operative TN staging when endoscopy reveals an early gastric cancer.Relationship between histological type and endosonographic detection of regional lymph node metastases in gastric cancer.The aim of the study was to compare the ability of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in detecting lymph node metastases in differentiated and undifferentiated gastric adenocarcinoma. EUS was performed in 149 patients with differentiated or undifferentiated gastric cancer. Histopathological findings were compared with pre-operative EUS findings in a total of 2961 resected lymph nodes. The EUS detection rates of metastasis to individual nodes in relation to node size, the ratio of the metastasized area to the cross-sectional area of the node and to the depth of primary tumour invasion, were also investigated. The accuracy and negative predictive values of EUS for detecting metastatic lymphadenopathy in each patient were significantly higher for differentiated (87%, 94%) than for undifferentiated (71%, 71%) tumours. The detection rate of individual node metastasis was higher for differentiated (31%) than for undifferentiated (21%) tumours. For differentiated lesions, EUS detected more small nodal metastases (< 5 mm in diameter) (p < 0.01) and more nodes involved with a relatively small proportion of the metastasized area to the cross-sectional area of the node (< 1/3 involvement) (p < 0.05). In relatively superficial lesions, such as pT1 and pT2, the pre-operative EUS detection rate of metastatic nodes was higher for differentiated than for undifferentiated tumours. In conclusion, the ability of EUS to detect nodal metastases is related to the histological type of gastric cancer.Endosonography and endosonography-guided biopsy of upper-GI-tract tumors using a curved-array echoendoscope.The purpose of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with a curved-array transducer and to determine the value of endosonography-guided biopsy.EUS was performed in 162 consecutive patients for preoperative staging of gastric or esophageal cancer (n = 122) or for EUS-guided biopsy (n = 40). All patients were examined using a flexible echoendoscope (Pentax FG32-UA) equipped with a 7.5-MHz curved-array transducer. A specially designed fine needle was used for EUS-guided biopsy of submucosal or extrinsic lesions.Surgery was performed in 19 of 48 patients with esophageal cancer and 60 of 74 patients with gastric cancer. The accuracy in the assessment of the infiltration depth of esophageal cancer and in the determination of lymph node involvement was 84% and 88%, respectively. In gastric cancer the tumor infiltration depth was assessed correctly in only 65% of the patients. The identification of early gastric cancer proved to be a major problem. The accuracy in the detection of lymph node involvement was 73%. Obstructing tumors were examined in 17 patients with carcinoma of the esophagus or the gastric cardia. The accuracy of EUS in determining the T-stage and the N-stage of stenotic tumors was 88% and 86%, respectively. Endosonography-guided needle biopsy was successfully performed in all 40 patients. Histologic analysis revealed malignancy in 50% of the patients. Only two biopsy specimens contained nonrepresentative material (accuracy: 95%). No complications were observed related to the procedure.EUS with a curved-array transducer provides high accuracy rates in staging of esophageal carcinoma. Evaluation of gastric cancer with this technique appears to be more difficult than with radial transducers. A major advantage of the linear transducer is the ability to perform EUS-guided biopsies of submucosal or extamural lesions.Preoperative endosonographic staging of cancer of the cardia.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of endosonography (ES) in a prospective series of cancer of the cardia.Thirty-five patients with cancer of the cardia were investigated by ES; 29 underwent surgery. ES staging for the surgery patients was compared with histopathologic findings. Tumors were staged according to the 1987 TNM classification.ES had a diagnostic accuracy of 79% for the T category, 79% for the N category, 89% for the M category, and 72% for prognostic TNM staging.ES is an excellent paraclinical modality for the staging of local-regional spread of cancer of the cardia and a useful complement to computed tomography for evaluation of these tumors.Pre-operative staging of gastro-oesophageal junction carcinoma: comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography.Fifteen patients with carcinoma of the gastro-oesophageal junction were pre-operatively staged with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT). The accuracy of tumour and nodal staging using both modalities was compared to the final histological staging of the resected specimens. In staging depth of tumour growth, EUS was significantly more accurate (87% of lesions correctly staged) than CT (40% correctly staged). In staging nodal involvement, EUS was again significantly more accurate (73% correctly staged) than CT (33%). Two-thirds of the lesions were traversable with the endoscopic probe, but most of the nontraversed lesions were correctly staged on EUS. In this study, CT has performed poorly as a staging modality for carcinoma at the gastro-oesophageal junction. Other studies have shown CT to be less accurate at this location than at other oesophageal sites. The orientation of the gastro-oesophageal junction, lack of surrounding fat planes, proximity of adjacent organs and patient motion contribute to the poor staging performance of CT at this location. In contrast, EUS has been an accurate staging modality at the gastro-oesophageal junction in this study and compares well with other studies evaluating EUS in the more proximal oesophagus. Endoscopic ultrasound is therefore a necessary modality if accurate pre-operative staging of gastro-oesophageal junction carcinoma is to be achieved.Endoscopic ultrasonography for preoperative staging of gastric carcinoma.To assess the accuracy and limitation of endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric cancer, we performed a prospective study on 99 patients.Ninety-nine patients with gastric cancer had preoperative staging with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and CT.The depth of infiltration (T parameter) was correctly defined by EUS in 58/65 patients (89%). The lymph node involvement (N parameter) was correctly classified in 44/65 patients (68%), the sensitivity was 74% and the specificity was 54%. The most frequent cause of understaging T parameter was microscopic tumor invasion, whereas overstaging was due to peri-tumor inflammation.We believe that EUS is a reliable method, superior to all diagnostic tools, in the evaluation of locoregional extension of gastric cancer.Computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraoperative assessment in TN staging of gastric carcinoma.In a prospective study from November 1989 to December 1993, the accuracy of computed tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and intraoperative surgical assessment were compared for the evaluation of the depth of invasion (T category) and involvement of lymph nodes (N category) in patients with gastric carcinoma. Sixty-nine consecutive patients who received preoperative CT and EUS underwent subsequent surgery. CT and EUS results were compared with histopathologic staging of tumor invasion depth and regional lymph node metastasis (pT and pN categories). T categories were staged correctly in 42% of the cases by CT, 71% by EUS and 55% by intraoperative surgical assessment. CT correctly staged 49% of N1 and N2 lymph nodes compared with 65% for EUS and 45% for intraoperative surgical assessment. CT was more accurate for advanced cancer but had a tendency to understage the T and N categories. EUS was more accurate for serosal cancer and displayed a tendency to overstage T categories and understage N categories. Intraoperative surgical assessment overstaged early T stages, understaged the T4 stage and had a tendency to overstage N categories. CT and intraoperative surgical assessment of T and N categories were of limited value in the staging of gastric carcinoma compared to EUS. EUS is a valuable form of assessment to evaluate gastric cancer staging before surgery.Computed tomography or endoscopic ultrasonography in preoperative staging of gastric and esophageal tumors.Accurate preoperative staging of tumors of the esophagus and stomach is important in selecting treatment and determining prognosis. To date, no exact preoperative test has been useful in assessing stage of these tumors. Until recently, computed tomographic (CT) scanning has been the most frequently used examination to predict operative findings. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a relatively new modality used by some centers to assess extramural anatomy of tumors in these two locations.We described 28 patients with tumors involving the esophagus and gastroesophageal junction, and the stomach, who underwent both EUS and CT before surgical exploration. We compared these two tests with the final pathologic interpretation and paid particular attention to presence of lymph nodes and wall penetration by primary tumor.For wall penetration by an esophageal-gastroesophageal junction carcinoma, EUS was 85% accurate versus 15% for CT. For absence of nodal spread by these tumors, EUS was 100% accurate versus 67% for CT. In the presence of nodal spread EUS was 60% accurate versus 50% for CT. For wall penetration by a gastric carcinoma, EUS was 71% accurate versus 0% for CT. In the absence of nodal spread EUS and CT were both 100% accurate. In the presence of nodal spread EUS was 50% accurate versus 25% for CT.EUS is more accurate than CT in the preoperative staging of upper gastrointestinal malignancies.Endoscopic ultrasonography for early gastric cancer.Endosonography for preoperative locoregional staging of esophageal and gastric cancer.To assess the accuracy and limitations of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the preoperative staging of esophageal and gastric carcinoma, we performed a prospective controlled study over a five year period. Data from 63 patients with esophageal cancer and 147 patients with gastric cancer who underwent surgery were available for comparison of the endosonographic TNM classification to the histophathological findings of the resected specimens. The overall accuracy of EUS in the assessment of tumor infiltration depth was 85.7% and 78% in esophageal and gastric cancer, respectively. The sensitivity of EUS in the detection of regional lymph node metastases was 90% in esophageal and 87% in gastric carcinoma. The most frequent causes of misdiagnoses by endosonography were microscopic tumor invasion and peritumorous inflammatory changes. The inability to traverse a tumor stenosis restricted the endosonographic evaluation in 31.6 and 14% of the cases with esophageal and gastric cancer, respectively.Role of endoscopic ultrasonography in gastric carcinoma.Two hundred and fifty four consecutive patients with gastric adenocarcinoma who underwent surgery were preoperatively evaluated with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The results were compared with the post-operative histo-pathological staging. EUS was correct in determining the T and N stage in 83% and 66%, respectively. Although EUS was accurate in determining the absence of lymph node metastases (accuracy in stage N0: 93%), it was not reliable in determining stages N1 and N2 (64% and 52%, respectively). Since 88% of all T3 and T4 tumors had lymph node metastases, the concomitant T stage may be an important criterion for assessing the nature of endosonographically visualized lymph nodes. The actual R0-resection rate (78%) was almost identical to the rate predicted preoperatively by EUS (81%). We therefore consider EUS a valuable pretherapeutic procedure in patients with gastric carcinoma.[Electronic sectorial ultrasound endoscopy in benign and malignant tumoral pathology of the stomach. Results in 30 patients].From October 1991 to July 1992, endoscopic ultrasound examination (EUS) was performed preoperatively in 30 patients with gastrointestinal disease with a new forward-view fiber optic gastroscope with a 5 and 7.5 MHz curved-array linear transducer mounted directly behind the lens. Before EUS examination, endoscopy with biopsy had established the diagnosis of gastric disease in 22 cases: 16 adenocarcinoma, 4 lymphoma, 1 carcinoid tumor and 1 gastric metastasis of a chorionic tumor. In the 8 other cases, endoscopic diagnosis with non productive biopsy was gastric ulcer (1 case), submucosal tumor (5 cases), and large fold gastritis (2 cases). EUS established a correct diagnosis in 6 of these 8 cases (2 leiomyoma, 1 lipoma, 1 lymphoma, 2 gastric linitis). Correct preoperative TN staging was accomplished by EUS in 83.3% and correct preoperative staging for N was accomplished by EUS in 90%. This study shows that EUS a curved-array transducer is useful in preoperative TN staging of gastric tumors.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of gastric cancer and lymphoma.There is a need to assess the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and staging of gastric cancer and lymphoma.A prospective study was performed on 86 patients with endoscopic gross appearance suspicious for cancer or lymphoma. Biopsies with endoscopic forceps were always carried out before EUS. All patients underwent laparotomy for final diagnosis, staging, and eventually treatment. The results of EUS were correlated with the histologic findings of the resected specimens, when possible, or with the surgical findings. There were 42 gastric cancers and 44 primary gastric lymphomas.EUS made a correct diagnosis of cancer in 35 of 42 patients, with a sensitivity of 83%. Positive predictability was 87%, specificity was 97%, and negative predictability was 96%. Diagnostic accuracy was 95%. In the evaluation of cancer depth invasion, EUS was correct in 91% of cases. EUS displayed perigastric metastatic lymph nodes in 14 of 25 patients, with a sensitivity of 56%. Positive predictive value was 93%, specificity was 93%, and negative predictive value was 54%. Diagnostic accuracy was 69%. EUS made a correct diagnosis of lymphoma in 39 of 44 patients, with a sensitivity of 89%. Positive predictability was 87%, specificity was 97%, and negative predictability was 97%. Diagnostic accuracy was 95%. In the evaluation of lymphoma depth invasion, EUS was correct in 92% of cases. EUS displayed metastatic perigastric lymph nodes in 8 of 18 patients, with a sensitivity of 44%. Positive predictability was 100%, specificity was 100%, and negative predictability was 72%. Diagnostic accuracy was 77%.From these data it appears that in these diseases EUS has demonstrated specific ultrasonographic features that allow correct diagnosis and staging in the majority of patients. In difficult cases EUS may help to achieve the correct diagnosis. EUS also appear to be a useful tool for staging of gastric cancer and lymphoma. It shows not only tumor depth and local spread but also the passage from a pathologic to a normal wall and lymph node metastasis. With this accurate noninvasive staging procedure, in the near future many patients will no longer undergo exploratory laparotomy for surgical staging. Thanks to EUS, the choice of conservative or surgical treatment can be strongly affected. In case of surgery, EUS can orient the kind of surgical approach. Moreover, the use of EUS for evaluation of therapy during follow-up will probably become of major importance.Regional lymph node metastasis in gastric cancer: evaluation with endoscopic US.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) was performed in 83 patients with gastric cancer to evaluate regional lymph node metastasis. Histopathologic findings were compared with preoperative EUS findings in a total of 1,519 resected lymph nodes. In lymph node staging, the prevalence of metastatic adenopathy was 31.3% (26 of 83 patients); EUS had an accuracy of 83.1% (69 of 83 patients), sensitivity of 53.8% (14 of 26 patients), specificity of 96.5% (55 of 57 patients), positive predictive value of 87.5% (14 of 16 patients), and negative predictive value of 82.1% (55 of 67 patients). The greater the maximum diameter of the node with metastasis, or the larger the ratio of the metastatic area to the cross-sectional area of the node, the higher the detection rate. In tumors classified on the basis of depth of invasion according to the 1987 TNM system, the rate of detection of metastasis in individual nodes was 0% in pT1 tumors (none of five nodes), 20% in pT2 tumors (17 of 85 nodes), 29% in pT3 tumors (20 of 70 nodes), and 10% in pT4 tumors (three of 31 nodes). It is concluded that the most important use of EUS will be in diagnosis of regional lymph node metastasis.Enlarged lymph nodes: malignant or not?Prospective controlled data of lymph node evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound in esophageal, gastric and pancreatic cancer is presented. Lymph node pattern, changes of boundaries and echogenicity were considered. Preoperative findings of endoscopic ultrasound were classified according to TNM staging. Only those cases with subsequent histologic examination of the resected specimen were entered into the study. Sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was 90% for esophageal and 87% for gastric cancer. The specificity was 72% and 88%, respectively. In spite of the overall satisfactory results of EUS in evaluation of lymph nodes, further improvement in detection and differentiation of benign and malignant nodes is required.[Preoperative staging of gastric carcinoma using endosonography (EUS)].Accurate staging of gastric malignancy can only be obtained at surgery and after detailed histological examination of the resection specimen. Endoscopic ultrasonography may provide accurate detection and staging of gastric cancer because of its ability to visualize both the intramural and extramural extent of the lesion and any adjacent lymph node involvement. From february 90 to april 91, 29 patients with a gastric carcinoma were studied endosonographically before surgery. All studies were performed with an Olympus EU-M3. Preoperative TNM classification and a prediction of the resectability of gastric cancer were done in every patient. The results were matched with those obtained with the histology of resected specimens according to the TNM classification 1987. Endoscopic ultrasonography was accurate in assessing the extent and depth of tumor infiltration. The overall accuracy rate was 90.5% (19 out of 21 patients). Overstaging occurred in 9.5% of the cases (2 patients); none understaging occurred. EUS was less accurate in assessment of lymph node metastasis; the overall accuracy rate was 57.1%. Distinction between reactive lymph node and small micrometastatic lymph node involvement could be hard. Local resectability was correctly diagnosed with EUS in each of 23 patients; in two patients an intramural mass with a deep infiltration into the surrounding tissue was correctly diagnosed. In our opinion EUS is an essential diagnostic procedure in the clinical staging of the gastric cancer.Preoperative evaluation of gastric cancer by endoscopic ultrasound.The preoperative use of endoscopic ultrasound was evaluated in 74 patients with confirmed gastric cancer. It was used in diagnosing the depth of invasion in the gastric wall, the infiltration to the adjacent organs, and the involvement of the perigastric lymph nodes. Results were compared with histological findings in resected specimens. Accuracy in staging gastric cancer using the T grade of the 1987 TNM system was 81.1% (60 of 74 patients). Endoscopic ultrasound provided excellent results compared with computed tomography and conventional ultrasound, particularly in evaluating perigastric lymph node metastasis and direct infiltration to the adjacent organs. The success rate in detecting lymph node metastasis was 50% (11 of 22 patients); the accuracy in diagnosing direct infiltration to the adjacent organs was 60% (three of five patients). This technique is useful in diagnosing malignant invasion and lymph node metastasis of gastric carcinomas but requires further refinement for use in diagnosing the disease itself. Its preoperative use is recommended for establishing surgical and other treatment plans, as well as in predicting the prognosis of gastric cancer.Preoperative staging of gastric cancer: comparison of endoscopic US and dynamic CT.Fifty consecutive patients with gastric adenocarcinoma proved by means of biopsy underwent preoperative staging with endoscopic ultrasonography (US). Dynamic computed tomography (CT) of the chest and abdomen was performed before surgery in 33 of the patients. In all 50 patients, the TNM classification of the American Joint Committee on Cancer was used to compare the imaging findings with pathologic findings in specimens resected at surgery. When the depth of tumor penetration was evaluated, the findings at endoscopic US and those at pathologic examination were concordant in 46 of 50 patients (92%), and the findings at dynamic CT and those at pathologic examination, in 14 of 33 patients (42%) (P less than .00042). Evaluation of regional lymph node metastases showed a concordance of 78% with endoscopic US and 48% with dynamic CT (P less than .038). Overall determination of stage with both dynamic CT and endoscopic US showed a concordance of 73%, compared with a concordance of 45% for dynamic CT alone (P less than .028).The use of endoscopic ultrasound in determining the depth of cancer invasion in patients with gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed in 110 patients with gastric cancer to examine the depth of cancer invasion. The normal gastric wall has a five-layer structure on EUS. In 19 lesions, changes on EUS were limited to the first and/or second layers, suggesting that invasion was limited within the mucosa. In 91 lesions, changes were evident in the third or deeper layers. Alterations in the EUS appearance could be divided into two types: type A, with destruction of the layered structure and type B with thickening of the layers. The amount of interstitial tissue in cancer was classified as medullary or intermediate in 90% of type A, and as scirrhous in 82% of type B tumor. The EUS diagnosis of invasion was 95% accurate for stage M cancers, 75% for SM, 64% for PM, 100% for SS, 79% for SE, and 100% for SI lesions. The overall accuracy was 81%. Accompanying fibrosis and metastatic perigastric nodes were the main reasons for overestimating the extent of disease.Analysis of gastric carcinoma growth by endoscopic ultrasonography.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed preoperatively in 82 patients with gastric carcinoma (40 with early and 42 advanced malignancy). Measurements of wall thickness were performed in each case and showed good correlation with histological findings. Wall thickening was found to consist of both tumorous and accompanying ulcerous tissue. Thus, increasing wall thickness, as demonstrated by EUS, may not necessarily mean progressive tumor growth. The EUS features of gastric carcinoma were analyzed and four distinct growth patterns found: predominantly intramural (IM) or intraluminal (IL) growth with preservation (Type 1) or destruction (Type 2) of the submucosal echo-rich layer. All early carcinomas displayed the IL-type growth pattern on EUS (98% IL1-type) and 81% of advanced tumors showed IM-type features. EUS was able to differentiate between early and advanced carcinoma in 98% of cases. The EUS pattern of submucosal destruction (type IM2 or IL2) corresponded to the expanding type tumor according to Ming's histopathological classification. On the other hand, 24 of 26 infiltrative tumors according to Ming were found on EUS to have an intramural growth pattern with preservation of the submucosa (type IM1). It is concluded that EUS is highly sensitive in predicting the tumor growth pattern in gastric carcinoma, providing important additional information to the currently used TNM staging system. Measurements of wall thickness are reliable but differentiation between tumorous growth and peritumorous changes is not possible.Comparison of the efficacy of endoscopic ultrasonography and submucosography in diagnosing the depth of gastric cancer invasion.Diagnosis of the depth of the cancer invasion is necessary to select the indication of endoscopic treatment. We used endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and Submucosography (SMG) to diagnose the depth of cancer invasion and compared their efficacy against 63 lesions in 60 cases of gastric and esophageal cancers. SMG could diagnose the invasion correctly in 97% of m (mucosa) cancers, 88% of sm (submucosa) cancers and 100% of advanced cancers. On the other hand, linear-type EUS could diagnose the cancer invasion correctly in 60% of the m cancers, 83% of the sm cancers and 100% of advanced cancers. The results of the comparison of radial-type EUS and SMG showed similar results. Both EUS and SMG are appropriate for the judgement of endoscopic treatments. However, for the selection of the indication of endoscopic treatment which is applied to relatively small sized lesions in general, SMG appears to be superior to EUS in both resolution power and accuracy in shooting.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of invasive gastric cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonographic (EUS) images of 174 cases of gastric cancer were examined to assess the depth of tumor invasion. Comparison was made between the depth of the changes shown in the multi-layered image produced by ultrasonography and the actual depth of invasion. Cases showing ultrasonographic changes extending deeper than the actual tumor were found to have fibrosis associated with peptic ulceration within the tumor focus. In such cases the echo images chiefly depicted the form and nature of the fibrosis, and the images were so characteristic that they could be classified into patterns. In the other cases the depth of tumor invasion could be almost precisely determined by detecting to which layer the changes shown by EUS extended.[Progress in image diagnosis: endoscopic ultrasonography].Endoscopic ultrasonography of the upper gastrointestinal tract.Endoscopic ultrasonography was used for assessment of the extent of tumour invasion of the upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract, including analysis of submucosal tumour and detection of lymph-node metastasis. The normal oesophageal and gastric wall was depicted as five layers by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The outer layer invaded by cancer was defined as the depth of tumour invasion. In 173 cases of oesophageal cancer, the depth of cancer invasion was diagnosed correctly in 88%. In 146 cases of gastric cancer, it was diagnosed correctly in 79%. In submucosal tumours of the GI tract, the site of tumour in the wall was diagnosed correctly in 99% and the histological type of tumour was predicted. EUS can also be used to detect small lymph nodes. According to the criteria, used in this study, EUS had a sensitivity of 84%, a specificity of 88% and an overall accuracy of 88% for detection of lymph-node metastases.